CHAPTER I.
Come apace, good Audrey; I will fetch
Up your goats, Andrey: and how, Audrey? am
I the man yet? Doth my simple features content
You.
As You Like It
.
While
the mummeries related were exhibiting
in the great square, Maso, Pippo, Conrad, and the
others concerned in the little disturbance
connected
with the affair of the dog, were eating their
discontent
within the walls of the guard-house. V
evey
has several squares, and the various
ceremonies
of the gods and demigods were now to be
repeated
in the smaller areas. On one of the latter
stands the town-house and prison. The offenders
in question had been summarily transferred to the
gaol, in obedience to the command of the officer
charged with preserving the peace. By an act of
grace, however, that properly belonged to the day,
as well as to the character of the offence, the
prisoners
were permitted to occupy a part of the
edifice
that commanded a view of the square, and
consequently were not precluded from all
participation
in the joyousness of the festivities. This
indulgence had been accorded on the condition
that the parties should cease their wrangling, and
otherwise conduct themselves in a way not to
bring scandal on the exhibition in which the pride
of every Vvaisan was so deeply enlisted. All
the captives, the innocent as well as the guilty,
gladly
subscribed to the terms; for they found
themselves
in a temporary duresse which did not admit
of any fair argument of the merits of the case,
and there is no leveller so effectual as a common
misfortune.
The anger of Maso, though sudden and violent,
the effect of a hot temperament, had quickly
subsided
in a calm which more probably belonged to
his education and opinions, in all of which he was
much superior to his profligate antagonist.
Contempt
,
therefore, soon took the place of resentment;
and though too much accustomed to rude contact
with men of the pilgrim's class to be ashamed of
what had occurred, the mariner strove to forget
the occurrence. It was one of those moral
disturbances
to which he was scarcely less used than
he was accustomed to encounter physical contests
of the elements like that in which he had lately
rendered so essential service on the Leman.
Give me thy hand, Conrad; he said, with the
frank forgiveness which is apt to distinguish the
reconciliation of men who pass their lives amid
the violent, but sometimes ennobling, scenes of
adventure
and lawlessness. Thou hast thy humors
and habits, and I have mine. If thou findest this
traffic in penances and prayers to thy fancy,
follow
the trade, of Heaven's sake, and leave me and
my dog to live by other means!
Thou ought'st to have bethought thee how
much reason we pilgrims have to prize the mastiffs
of the mountain, answered Conrad, and how
likely it was to stir my blood to see another cur
devouring that which was intended for old Uberto.
Thou hast never toiled up the sides of St. Bernard,
friend Maso, loaded with the sins of a whole
parish, to say nothing of thine own, and therefore
canst not know the value of these brutes, who so
A 2
often stand between us pilgrims and a grave of
snow.
Il Maledetto smiled grimly, and muttered a
sentence
between his teeth; for, in perfect consonance
with the frank lawlessness of his own life, there
was a reckless honesty in his nature, which caused
him to despise hypocrisy as unworthy of the bold
attributes of manhood.
Have it as thou wilt, pious Conrad, he said
sneeringly, so there be peace between us. I am,
as thou knowest, an Italian, and though we of the
south seek revenge occasionally of those who
wrong us, it is not often that we do violence after
giving a willing palmI trust ye of Germany are
no less honest?
May the Virgin be deaf to every ave I have
sworn to repeat, and the good fathers of Loretto
refuse absolution, if I think more of it! 'Twas
but the gripe of a throat, and I am not so tender
in that part of the body as to fear it is to be the
forerunner of a closer squeeze. Didst ever hear
of a churchman that suffered in this way?
Men often escape with less than their deserts;
Maso drily answered. Well, fortune, or the
saints, or Calvin, or whatever power most suits
your tastes, good friends, has at length put a roof
over our heads,an honor that rarely arrives to
most of us, if I may judge by appearances and
some little knowledge of the different trades we
follow. Thou wilt have a fair occasion to suffer
Policinello to rest from his uneasy antics, Pippo,
while his master breathes the air through a
window
for the first time in many a day, as I will
answer.
The Neapolitan had no difficulty in laughing at
this sally; for his was a nature that took all things
pleasantly, though it took nothing under the
corrective
of principle or a respect for the rights of
others.
Were this Napoli, with her gentle sky and hot
volcano, he said, smiling at the allusion, no one
would have less relish for a roof than myself.
Thou wast born beneath the arch of some
Duca's gateway, returned Maso, with a sort of
reckless sarcasm, that as often cut his friends as
his enemies; thou wilt probably die in the
hospital
of the poor, and wilt surely be shot from the
death-cart into one of the daily holes of thy Campo
Santo, among a goodly company of Christians, in
which legs and arms will be thrown at random
like jack-straws, and in which the wisest among
ye all will be puzzled to tell his own limbs from
those of his neighbors, at the sound of the last
trumpet.
Am I a dog, to meet this end! demanded
Pippo, fiercelyor that I should not know my
own bones from those of some infidel rascal, who
may happen to be my neighbor?
We have had one disturbance about brutes,
let us not have another; sarcastically rejoined
Il Maledetto. Princes and nobles, he added,
with affected gravity, we are here bound by the
heels, during the good pleasure of those who rule
in Vvey; the wisest course will be to pass the
time in good-humor with each other, and as
pleasantly
as our condition will allow. The reverend
Conrad shall have all the honors of a cardinal,
Pippo shall have the led horse at his funeral, and,
as for these worthy Vaudois, who, no doubt, are
men of substance in their way, they shall be bailiffs
sent by Berne to rule between the four walls of
our palace! Life is but a graver sort of
mummery
,
gentlemen, and the second of its rarest
secrets
is to make others fancy us what we wish to
appearthe first being, without question, the
faculty
of deceiving ourselves. Now each one has
only to imagine that he is the high personage I
have just named, and the most difficult part of the
work is achieved to his hands.
Thou hast forgotten to name thine own quality,
cried Pippo, who was too much used to buffoonery
not to relish the whim of Maso, and who, with
Neapolitan fickleness, forgot his anger the instant
he had given it vent.
I will represent the sapient public, and, being
well disposed to be duped, the whole job is
complete
.
Practise away, worthies, and ye shall see
with what open eyes and wide gullet I am ready
to admire and swallow all your philosophy.
This sally produced a hearty laugh, which rarely
fails to establish momentary good fellowship. The
Vaudois, who had the thirsty propensities of
mountaineers
,
ordered wine, and, as their guardians
looked upon their confinement more as a measure
of temporary policy than of serious moment, the
command was obeyed. In a short time, this little
group of worldlings were making the best of
circumstances
,
by calling in the aid of physical
stimulants to cheer their solitude. As they
washed
their throats with the liquor, which was both
good and cheap and by consequence doubly
agreeable
,
the true characters of the different
individuals
began to show themselves in stronger colors.
The peasants of Vaud, of whom there were
three and all of the lowest class, became confused
and dull in their faculties though louder and more
vehement in speech, each man appearing to balance
the increasing infirmities of his reason by stronger
physical demonstrations of folly.
Conrad, the pilgrim, threw aside the mask
entirely
,
if, indeed, so thin a veil as that he ordinarily
wore when not in the presence of his employers
deserved such a name, and appeared the miscreant
he truly was,a strange admixture of cowardly
superstition, (for few meddle with superstition
without getting more or less entangled in its
meshes,) of low cunning, and of the most abject
and gross sensuality and vice. The invention and
wit of Pippo, at all times ready and ingenious,
gained increased powers, but the torrent of animal
spirits that were let loose by his potations swept
before it all reserve, and he scarce opened his
mouth but to betray the thoughts of a man long
practised in frauds and all other evil designs on
the rights of his fellow-creatures. On Maso the
wine produced an effect that might almost be
termed characteristic, and which it is in some sort
germane to the moral of the tale to describe.
Il Maledetto had indulged freely and with
apparent
recklessness in the frequent draughts. He
was long familiarized to the habits of this wild and
uncouth fellowship, and a singular sentiment, that
men of his class choose to call honor, and which
perhaps deserves the name as much as half of the
principles that are described by the same
appellation
,
prevented him from refusing to incur an
equal risk in the common assault on their faculties,
inducing him to swallow his full share of the
intoxicating
fluid as the cup passed from one
reeking
mouth to another. He liked the wine, too,
and tasted its perfume, and cherished its glowing
influence, with the perfect good-will of a man who
knew how to profit by the accident which placed
such generous liquor at his command. He had
also his designs in wishing to unmask his
companions
,
and he thought the moment favorable to
such an intention. In addition to these motives,
Maso had his especial reasons for being uneasy at
finding himself in the hands of the authorities, and
he was not sorry to bring about a state of things
that might lead to his being confounded with the
others in a group of vulgar devotees of Bacchus.
But Maso yielded to the common disposition in
a manner peculiar to himself. His eyes became
even more lustrous than usual, his face reddened,
and his voice even grew thick, while his senses
retained their powers. His reason, instead of
giving
way, like those of the men around him, rather
brightened under the excitement, as if it foresaw
the danger it incurred, and the greater necessity
there existed for vigilance. Though born in a
southern clime, he was saturnine and cold when
unexcited, and such temperaments rather gain
their tone than lose their powers by stimulants
under which men of feebler organizations sink.
He had passed his life amid wild adventure and
in scenes of peril which suited such a disposition,
and it most probably required either some strong
motive of danger, like that of the tempest on the
Leman, or a stimulant of another quality, to draw
out the latent properties of his mind, which so well
fitted him to lead when others were the most
disposed
to follow. He was, therefore, without fear
for himself while he aroused his companions; and
he was free of his purse, which did not, however,
appear to be sufficiently stored to answer very
heavy demands, by ordering cup after cup to
supply
the place of those which were so quickly
drained to the dregs. In this manner an hour
or two passed swiftly, they who were charged
with the care of the jolly party in the town-house
being much more occupied in noting the festivities
without, than those within, the prison.
Thou hast a merry life of it, honest Pippo,
cried Conrad with swimming eyes, answering a
remark of the buffoon. Thou art but a laugh at
the best, and wilt go through the world grinning
and making others grin. Thy Policinello is a rare
fellow, and I never meet one of thy set that weary
legs and sore feet are not forgotten in his
fooleries
!
Corpo di Bacco!I wish this were so; but thou
hast much the best of the matter, even in the way
of amusement, reverend pilgrim, though to the
looker-on it would seem otherwise. The difference
between us, pious Conrad, is just thisthat thou
laughest in thy sleeve without seeming to be merry,
whereas I yawn ready to split my jaws while I
seem to be dying with fun. Your often-told joke
is a bad companion, and gets at last to be as
gloomy as a dirge. Wine can be swallowed but
once, and laughter will not come for ever for the
same folly. Cospetto! I would give the earnings
of a year for a set of new jokes, such as might
come fresh from the wit of one who never saw a
mountebank, and are not worn threadbare with
being rubbed against the brains of all the jokers in
Europe.
There was a wise man of old, of whom it is
not probable that any of you have ever heard,
observed Maso, who has said there was nothing
new under the sun.
He who said that never tasted of this liquor,
which is as raw as if it were still running from the
press, rejoined the pilgrim. Knave, dost think
that we are unknowing in these matters, that thou
darest bring a pot of such lees to men of our
quality
?
Go to, and see that thou doest us better justice
in the next!
The wine is the same as that which first
pleased
you, but it is the nature of drunkenness to change
the palate; and therein Solomon was right as in
all other points, coolly remarked Il Maledetto.
Nay, friend, thou wilt scarce bring thy liquors
again to those who do not know how to do them
proper honor.
Maso thrust the lad who served them from the
room, and he slipped a small coin in his hand,
ordering him not to return. Inebriety had made
sufficient ravages for his ends, and he was now
desirous of stopping farther excesses.
Here come the mummersgods and
goddesses
,
shepherds and their lasses and all the other
pleasantries, to keep us in humor! To do these
Vvaisans justice, they treat us rarely; for ye see
they send their players to amuse our retirement!
Wine! liquor! raw or ripe, bring us liquor!
roared Conrad, Pippo, and their pot-companions,
who were much too drunk to detect the agency of
Maso in defeating their wishes, though they were
just drunk enough to fancy that what he said of
the attention of the authorities was not only true
but merited.
How now, Pippo! art ashamed to be outdone
in thine own craft, that thou bellowest for wine at
the moment when the actors have come into the
square to exhibit their skill? cried the mariner.
Truly, we shall have a mean opinion of thy
merit, if thou art afraid to meet a few Vaudois
peasants in thy trade,and thou a buffoon of
Napoli
!
Pippo swore with pot-oaths that he defied the
cleverest of Switzerland; for that he had not only
acted on every mall and mole of Italy, but that he
had exhibited in private before princes and
cardinals
,
and that he had no superior on either side of
the Alps. Maso profited by his advantage, and,
by applying fresh goads to his vanity, soon
succeeded
in causing him to forget the wine, and in
drawing him, with all the others, to the windows.
The processions, in making the circuit of the
city, had now reached the square of the
town-house
,
where the acting and exhibition were
repeated
,
as has been already related in general
terms to the reader. There were the officers of the
abbaye, the vine-dressers, the shepherds and the
shepherdesses, Flora, Ceres, Pales, and Bacchus,
with all the others, attended by their several trains,
and borne in state as became their high attributes.
Silenus rolled from his ass, to the great joy of a
thousand shouting blackguards, and to the infinite
scandal of the prisoners at the windows, the latter
affirming to a man that there was no acting in the
case, but that the demigod was shamefully under
the influence of too many potations that had been
swallowed in his own honor.
We shall not go over the details of these scenes,
which all who have ever witnessed a public
celebration
will readily imagine, nor is it necessary to
record the different sallies of wit that, under the
inspiration of the warm wines of Vvey and the
excitement of the revels, issued from the group
that clustered around the windows of the prison.
All who have ever listened to low humor, that is
rather deadened than quickened by liquor, will
understand their character, and they who have
not will scarcely be losers by the omission.
At length the different allegories drawn from the
heathen mythology ended, and the procession of
the nuptials came into the square. The meek and
gentle Christine had appeared nowhere that day
without awakening strong sympathy in her youth,
beauty, and apparent innocence. Murmurs of
approbation accompanied her steps, and the
maiden
,
more accustomed to her situation, began to
feel, probably for the first time since she had known
the secret of her origin, something like that
security
which is an indispensable accompaniment of
happiness. Long used to think of herself as one
proscribed of opinion, and educated in the
retirement
suited to the views of her parents, the praises
that reached her ear could not but be grateful,
Vol. II. B
and they went warm and cheeringly to her heart,
in spite of the sense of apprehension and uneasiness
that had so long harbored there. Throughout the
whole of the day, until now, she had scarce dared
to turn her eyes to her future husband,him who,
in her simple and single-minded judgment, had
braved prejudice to do justice to her worth; but,
as the applause, which had been hitherto
suppressed
,
broke out in loud acclamations in the square of
the town-house, the color mantled brightly on her
cheek, and she looked with modest pride at her
companion, as if she would say in the silent
appeal
,
that his generous choice would not go
entirely
without its reward. The crowd responded to
the sentiment, and never did votaries of Hymen
approach the altar seemingly under happier
auspices
.
The influence of innocence and beauty is
universal
.
Even the unprincipled and half-intoxicated
prisoners were loud in praise of the gentle
Christine
.
One praised her modesty, another extolled
her personal appearance, and all united with the
multitude in shouting to her honor. The blood of
the bridegroom began to quicken, and, by the time
the train had halted in the open space near the
building, immediately beneath the windows
occupied
by Maso and his fellows, he was looking about
him in the exultation of a vulgar mind, which finds
its delight in, as it is apt to form its judgments
from, the suffrages of others.
Here is a grand and beautiful festa! said the
hiccoughing Pippo, and a most willing bride!
San Gennaro bless thee, bella sposina, and the
worthy man who is the stem of so fair a rose!
Send us wine, generous groom and happy bride,
that we may drink to the health of thee and
thine!
Christine changed color, and looked furtively
around, for they who lie under the weight of the
world's displeasure, though innocent, are
sensitively
jealous of allusions to the sore points in their
histories. The feeling communicated itself to her
companion, who threw distrustful glances at the
crowd, in order to ascertain if the secret of his
bride's birth were not discovered.
A braver festa never honored an Italian
corso
,
continued the Neapolitan, whose head was
running on his own fancies, without troubling itself
about the apprehensions and wishes of others. A
gallant array and a fair bride! Send us wine,
felicissimi
sposi, that we may drink to your eternal
fame and happiness! Happy the father that calls
thee daughter, bella sposa, and most honored the
mother that bare so excellent a child! Scellerati,
ye of the crowd, why do ye not bear the worthy
parents in your arms, that all may see and do
homage to the honorable roots of so rich a branch!
Send us wine, buona gente, send us cups of merry
wine!
The cries and figurative language of Pippo
attracted
the attention of the multitude, who were
additionally amused by the mixture of dialects in
which he uttered his appeals. The least
important
trifles, by giving a new direction to popular
sympathies, frequently become the parents of grave
events. The crowd, which followed the train of
Hymen, had begun to weary with the repetition of
the same ceremonies, and it now gladly lent itself
to the episode of the felicitations and entreaties of
the half-intoxicated Neapolitan.
Come forth, and act the father of the happy
bride, thyself, reverend and grave stranger; cried
one in derision, from the throng. So excellent
an example will descend to thy children's children,
in blessings on thy line!
A shout of laughter rewarded this retort. It
put the quick-witted Neapolitan on his mettle, to
produce a prompt and suitable reply.
My blessing on the blushing rose! he
answered
in an instant. There are worse parents than
Pippo, for he who lives by making others laugh
deserves well of men, whereas there is your
medico
,
who eats the bread of colics, and rheumatisms,
and other foul diseases, of which he pretends to
be the enemy, though, San Gennaro to aid!who
is there so silly, as not to see that the knavish
doctor and the knavish distemper play into each
others hands, as readily as Policinello and the
monkey.
Hast thou another worse than thyself that can
be named, cried he of the crowd.
A score, and thou shalt be of the number.
My blessing on the fair bride! thrice happy is she
that hath a right to receive the benediction from
one of so honest life as the merry Pippo. Speak
not I the truth, figligiola?
Christine perceived that the hand of her
companion
was coldly releasing her own, and she felt
the creeping sensation of the blood which is the
common attendant of extreme and humiliating
shame. Still she bore up against the weakness,
with that deep reliance on the justice of others
which is usually the most strongly seated in those
who are the most innocent; and she followed the
procession, in its circuit, with a step whose
trembling
was mistaken for no more than the
embarrassment
natural to her situation.
At this moment, as the mummers were wheeling
past the town-house, and the air was filled with
music, while a general movement stirred the
multitude
,
a cry of alarm arose in the building. It
was immediately succeeded by such a rush of
bodies
towards the spot, as indicates, in a throng, a
sudden and general interest in some new and
extraordinary
event.
The crowd was beaten back and dispersed,
the procession had disappeared, and there was an
unusual appearance of activity and mystery among
the officials of the place, before the cause of this
disturbance began to be whispered among the few
who remained in the square. The rumor ran that
one of the prisoners, an athletic Italian mariner,
had profited by the attention of all the other
guardians
of the place being occupied by the
ceremonies
,
to knock down the solitary sentinel, and to
effect his escape, followed by all the drunkards
who were able to run.
The evasion of a few lawless blackguards from
their prison was not an event likely long to divert
the attention of the curious from the amusements
of the day, especially as it was understood that
their confinement would have terminated of itself
with the setting sun. But when the fact was
communicated
to Peter Hofmeister, the sturdy bailiff
swore fifty harsh oaths at the impudence of the
knaves, at the carelessness of their keepers, and in
honor of the good cause of justice in general.
After which he incontinently commanded that the
runaways should be apprehended. This material
part of the process achieved, he moreover ordered
that they should be brought forthwith into his
presence, even should he be engaged in the most
serious of the ceremonies of the day, The voice
of Peter speaking in anger was not likely to be
unheard, and the stern mandate had scarcely
issued
from his lips, when a dozen of the common
thief-takers of Vaud set about the affair in good
earnest, and with the best possible intentions to
effect their object. In the mean time the sports
continued, and, as the day drew on, and the hour
for the banquet approached, the good people began
B 2
to collect once more in the great square to witness
the closing scenes, and to be present at the nuptial
benediction, which was to be pronounced over
Jacques Colis and Christine by a real servitor of
the altar, as the last and most important of the
ceremonies of that eventful day.
CHAPTER II.
Ay, marry; now unmuzzle your wisdom.
Rosalind
The
hour of noon was past, when the stage was
a second time filled with the privileged. The
multitude
was again disposed around the area of the
square, and the bailiff and his friends once more
occupied the seats of honor in the centre of the
long estrade. Procession after procession now
began to reappear, for all had made the circuit of
the city, and each had repeated its mummeries so
often that the actors grew weary of their sports.
Still, as the several groups came again into the
high presence of the bailiff and the lite not only
of their own country but of so many others, pride
overcame fatigue, and the songs and dances were
renewed with the necessary appearance of good
will and zeal. Peter Hofmeister and divers others
of the magnates of the canton, were particularly
loud in their plaudits on this repetition of the games,
for, by a process that will be easily understood,
they, who had been revelling and taking their
potations in the marquees and booths while the
mummers were absent, were more than qualified
to supply the deficiencies of the actors by the
warmth and exuberance of their own warmed
imaginations. The bailiff, in particular, as became
his high office and determined character, was
unusually
talkative and decided, both as respects the
criticisms and encomiums he uttered on the various
performances, making as light of his own peculiar
qualifications to deal with the subject, as if he were
a common hack-reviewer of our own times, who
is known to keep in view the quantity rather than
the quality of his remarks, and the stipulated price
he is to receive per line. Indeed the parallel would
hold good in more respects than that of knowledge,
for his language was unusually captious and
supercilious
,
his tone authoritative, and his motive the
desire to exhibit his own endowments, rather than
the wish he affected to manifest of setting forth the
excellences of others. His speeches were more
frequently than ever directed to the Signor
Grimaldi
,
for whom there had suddenly arisen in his
mind a still stronger gusto than that he had so
liberally
manifested, and which had already drawn so
much attention to the deportment of this pleasing
but modest stranger. Still he never failed to compel
all, within reach of a reasonable exercise of his
voice, to listen to his oracles.
Those that have passed, brother Melchior,
said the bailiff, addressing the Baron de Willading
in the fraternal style of the brgerschaft, while his
eye was directed to the Genoese, in whom in reality
he wished to excite admiration for his readiness in
Heathen lore, are no more than shepherds and
shepherdesses of our mountains, and none of your
gods and demigods, the former of which are to be
known in this ceremony from all others by the fact
that they are carried on men's shoulders, and the
latter that they ride on asses, or have other
conveniences
natural to their wants. Ah! here we
have the higher orders of the mummers in person
this comely creature is, in reality, Mariette
Marron
of this country, as strapping a wench as there
is in Vaud, and as impudentbut no matter! She
is now the Priestess of Flora, and I'll warrant you
there is not a horn in all our valleys that will bring
a louder echo out of the rocks than this very
priestess
will raise with her single throat! That yonder
on the throne is Flora herself, represented by a
comely young woman, the daughter of a warm
citizen here in Vvey, and one able to give her all
the equipments she bears, without taxing the
abbaye
a doit. I warrant you that every flower
about her was culled from their own garden!
Thou treatest the poetry of the ceremonies
with so little respect, good Peterchen, that the
goddess and her train dwindle into little more than
vine-dressers and milk-maids beneath thy tongue.
Of Heaven's sake, friend Melchior,
interrupted
the amused Genoese, do not rob us of the
advantage of the worthy bailiff's graphic remarks.
Your Heathen may be well enough in his way, but
surely he is none the worse for a few notes and
illustrations, that would do credit to a Doctor of
Padova. I entreat you to continue, learned Peter,
that we strangers may lose none of the niceties of
the exhibition.
Thou seest, baron, returned the well-warmed
bailiff, with a look of triumph, a little explanation
can never injure a good thing, though it were even
the law itself. Ah! yon is Ceres and her company,
and a goodly train they appear! These are the
harvest-men and harvest-women, who represent
the abundance of our country of Vaud, Signor
Grimaldi, which, truth to say, is a fat land, and
worthy of the allegory. These knaves, with the
stools strapped to their nether parts, and carrying
tubs, are cowherds, and all the others are more or
less concerned with the dairy. Ceres was a
personage
of importance among the ancients, beyond
dispute, as may be seen by the manner in which
she is backed by the landed interest. There is no
solid respectability, Herr von Willading, that is
not fairly bottomed on broad lands. Ye perceive
that the goddess sits on a throne whose ornaments
are all taken from the earth; a sheaf of wheat
tops the canopy; rich ears of generous grain are
her jewels, and her sceptre is the sickle. These
are but allegories, Signor Grimaldi, but they are
allusions that give birth to wholesome thoughts in
the prudent. There is no science that may not
catch a hint from our games; politics, religion, or
law't is all the same for the well-disposed and
cunning.
An ingenious scholar might even find an
argument
for the brgerschaft in an allegory that is
less clear; returned the amused Genoese. But
you have overlooked, Signor Bailiff, the
instrument
that Ceres carries in the other hand, and
which is full to overflowing with the fruits of the
earth;that which so much resembles a bullock's
horn, I mean.
That is, out of question, some of the utensils
of the ancients; perhaps a milking vessel in use
among the gods and goddesses, for your deities of
old were no bad housewives, and made a merit of
their economy; and Ceres here, as is seen, is not
ashamed of a useful occupation. By my faith, but
this affair has been gotten up with a very
creditable
attention to the moral! But our dairy-people
are about to give us some of their airs.
Peterchen now put a stop to his classic lore,
while the followers of Ceres arranged themselves
in order, and began to sing. The contagious and
wild melody of the Ranz des Vaches rose in the
square, and soon drew the absorbed and delighted
attention of all within hearing, which, to say the
truth, was little less than all who were within the
limits of the town, for, the crowd chiming in with
the more regular artists, a sort of musical
enthusiasm
seized upon all present who came of Vaud
and her valleys. The dogmatical, but
well-meaning
bailiff, though usually jealous of his Bernese
origin, and alive on system to the necessity of
preserving the superiority of the great canton by
all the common observances of dignity and
reserve
,
yielded to the general movement, and
shouted
with the rest, under favor of a pair of lungs
that nature had admirably fitted to sustain the
chorus of a mountain song. This condescension
in the deputy of Berne was often spoken of
afterwards
with admiration, the simple-minded and
credulous ascribing the exaltation of Peterchen to
a generous warmth in their happiness and
interests
,
while the more wary and observant were apt
to impute the musical excess to a previous excess
of another character, in which the wines of the
neighboring ctes were fairly entitled to come in
for a full share of the merit. Those who were
nearest the bailiff were secretly much diverted
with his awkward attempts at graciousness, which
one fair and witty Vaudoise likened to the antics
of one of the celebrated animals that are still
fostered
in the city which ruled so much of
Switzerland
,
and from whom, indeed, the town and canton
are both vulgarly supposed to have derived their
common name; for, while the authority of Berne
weighed so imperiously and heavily on its
subsidiary
countries, as is usual in such cases, the people
of the latter were much addicted to taking an
impotent
revenge, by whispering the pleasantest
sarcasms
they could invent against their masters.
Notwithstanding this and many more criticisms on
his performance, the bailiff enacted his part in the
representation to his own entire satisfaction; and
he resumed his seat with a consciousness of
having
at least merited the applause of the people, for
having entered with so much spirit into their
games, and with the hope that this act of grace
might be the means of causing them to forget
some fifty, or a hundred, of his other acts, which
certainly had not possessed the same melodious
and companionable features.
After this achievement the bailiff was
reasonably
quiet, until Bacchus and his train again entered
the square. At the appearance of the laughing
urchin who bestrode the cask, he resumed his
dissertations
with a confidence that all are apt to feel
who are about to treat on a subject with which
they have had occasion to be familiar.
This is the god of good liquor, said
Peterchen
,
always speaking to any who would listen,
although, by an instinct of respect, he chiefly
preferred
favoring the Signor Grimaldi with his
remarks, as may plainly be seen by his seat; and
these are dancing attendants to show that wine
gladdens the heart;yonder is the press at work,
extracting the juices, and that huge cluster is to
represent the grapes which the messengers of
Joshua brought back from Canaan when sent to
spy out the land, a history which I make no doubt
you Signore, in Italy, have at your fingers' ends.
Gaetano Grimaldi looked embarrassed, for,
although well skilled in the lore of the heathen
mythology, his learning as a male papist and a laic
was not particularly rich in the story of the
Christian
faith. At first he supposed that the bailiff had
merely blundered in his account of the mythology,
but, by taxing his memory a little, he recovered
some faint glimpses of the truth, a redemption of
his character as a book-man for which he was
materially
indebted to having seen some celebrated
pictures on this very subject, a species of
instruction
in holy writ that is sufficiently common among
those who inhabit the Catholic countries of the
other hemisphere.
Thou surely hast not overlooked the history of
the gigantic cluster of grapes, Signore!
exclaimed
Peterchen, astonished at the apparent hesitation
of the Italian. 'Tis the most beautiful of all the
legends of the holy book. Ha! as I live, there is
the ass without his rider;what has become of
the blackguard Antoine Giraud? The rogue has
alighted to swallow a fresh draught from some
booth, after draining his own skin to the bottom.
This comes of neglect; a sober man, or at least
one of a harder head, should have been put to the
part;for, look you, 'tis a character that need
stand at least a gallon, since the rehearsals alone
are enough to take a common drinker off his
centre.
The tongue of the bailiff ran on in
accompaniment
,
during the time that the followers of
Bacchus
were going through with their songs and
pageants, and when they disappeared, it gained a
louder key, like the rolling river that murmuring
flows and flows for ever, rising again on the ear,
after the din of any adventitious noise has ceased.
Now we may expect the pretty bride and her
maids, continued Peterchen, winking at his
companions
,
as the ancient gallant is wont to make a
parade of his admiration of the fair; the solemn
ceremony is to be pronounced here, before the
authorities, as a suitable termination to this happy
day. Ah! my good old friend Melchior, neither
of us is the man he was, or these skipping hoydens
would not go through their pirouettes without some
aid from our arms! Now, dispose of yourselves,
friends; for this is to be no acting, but a
downright
marriage, and it is meet that we keep a
graver
air. How! what means the movement among
the officers?
Peterchen had interrupted himself, for just at
that moment the thief-takers entered the square in
a body, inclosing in their centre a group, who had
the mien of captives too evidently to be mistaken
for honest men. The bailiff was peculiarly an
executive officer; one of that class who believe
that the enactment of a law is a point of far less
interest than its due fulfilment. Indeed, so far did
he push his favorite principle, that he did not
hesitate
sometimes to suppose shades of meaning in
the different ordinances of the great council that
existed only in his own brain, but which were, to
do him justice, sufficiently convenient to himself in
carrying out the constructions which he saw fit to
put on his own duties. The appearance of an
affair of justice was unfortunate for the progress
of the ceremonies, Peterchen having some such
relish for the punishment of rogues, and more
especially
for such as seemed to be an eternal
reproach to the action of the Bernese system by
their incorrigible misery and poverty, as an old
coachman is proverbially said to retain for the
crack of the whip. All his judicial sympathies
were not fully awakened, on the present occasion,
however; the criminals, though far from
belonging
to the more lucky of their fellow-creatures, not
being quite miserable enough in appearance to
awaken all those powers of magisterial reproach
and severity that lay dormant in the bailiff's moral
temperament, ready, at any time, to vindicate the
right of the strong against the innovations of the
feeble and unhappy. The reader will at once
have anticipated that the prisoners were Maso and
his companions, who had been more successful in
escaping from their keepers, than fortunate in
evading
Vol. II. C
the attempts to secure their persons a second
time.
Who are these that dare affront the ruling
powers on this day of general good-will and
rejoicing
?
sternly demanded the bailiff, when the minions
of the law and their captives stood fairly before
him. Do ye not know, knaves, that this is a
solemn, almost a religious ceremony at Vveyfor
so it would be considered by the ancients at least
and that a crime is doubly a crime when
committed
either in an honorable presence, on a solemn
and dignified occasion, like this, or against the
authorities;this last being always the gravest
and greatest of all?
We are but indifferent scholars, worshipful
bailiff, as you may easily perceive by our outward
appearance, and are to be judged leniently,
answered
Maso. Our whole offence was a hot but
short quarrel touching a dog, in which hands were
made to play the part of reason, and which would
have done little harm to any but ourselves, had it
been the pleasure of the town authorities to have
left us to decide the dispute in our own way. As
you well say, this is a joyous occasion, and we
esteem it hard that we of all Vvey should be shut
up on account of so light an affair, and cut off from
the merriment of the rest.
There is reason in this fellow, after all, said
Peterchen, in a low voice. What is a dog more
or less to Berne, and a public rejoicing to produce
its end should go deep into the community. Let
the men go, of God's name! and look to it, that
all the dogs be beaten out of the square, that we
have no more folly.
Please you, these are the men that have
escaped
from the authorities, after knocking down their
keeper; the officer humbly observed.
How is this! Didst thou not say, fellow, that
it was all about a dog?
I spoke of the reason of our being shut up. It
is true that, wearied with breathing pent air, and a
little heated with wine, we left the prison without
permission; but we hope this little sally of spirit
will be overlooked on account of the extraordinary
occasion.
Rogue, thy plea augments the offence. A
crime committed on an extraordinary occasion
becomes an extraordinary crime, and requires
an extraordinary punishment, which I intend to
see inflicted, forthwith. You have insulted the
authorities, and that is the unpardonable sin in
all communities. Draw nearer, friends, for I
love to let my reasons be felt and understood by
those who are to be affected by my decisions, and
this is a happy moment, to give a short lesson to
the Vvaisanslet the bride and bridegroom wait
draw nearer all, that ye may better hear what
I have to say.
The crowd pressed more closely around the
foot of the stage, and Peterchen, assuming a
didactic
air, resumed his discourse.
The object of all authority is to find the means of
its own support, continued the bailiff; for unless
it can exist, it must fall to the ground; and you all
are sufficiently schooled to know that when a thing
becomes of indifferent value, it loses most of its
consideration. Thus government is established in
order that it may protect itself; since without this
power it could not remain a government, and there
is not a man existing who is not ready to admi
that even a bad government is better than none.
But ours is particularly a good government, its
greatest care on all occasions being to make itself
respected, and he who respects himself is certain to
have esteem in the eyes of others. Without this
security we should become like the unbridled
steed, or the victims of anarchy and confusion, ay,
and damnable heresies in religion. Thus you see,
my friends, your choice lies between the
government
of Berne, or no government at all; for when
only two things exist, by taking one away the
number
is reduced half, and as the great canton will
keep its own share of the institutions, by taking
half away, Vaud is left as naked as my hand.
Ask yourselves if you have any government but
this? You know you have not. Were you quit
of Berne, therefore, you clearly would have none
at all. Officer, you have a sword at your side,
which is a good type of our authority; draw it
and hold it up, that all may see it. You perceive,
my friends, that the officer hath a sword; but that
he hath only one sword. Lay it at thy feet, officer.
You perceive, friends, that having but one sword,
and laying that sword aside, he no longer hath a
sword at all! That weapon represents our
authority
,
which laid aside becomes no authority,
leaving
us with an unarmed hand.
This happy comparison drew a murmur of
applause
;
the proposition of Peterchen having most
of the properties of a popular theory, being
deficient
in neither a bold assertion, a brief exposition,
nor a practical illustration. The latter in
particular
was long afterwards spoken of in Vaud, as an
exposition little short of the well-known judgment
of Solomon, who had resorted to the same
keen-edged
weapon in order to solve a point almost as
knotty as this settled by the bailiff. When the
approbation had a little subsided, the warmed
Peterchen
continued his discourse, which possessed
the random and generalized logic of most of the
dissertations that are uttered in the interests of
things as they are, without paying any particular
deference to things as they should be.
What is the use of teaching the multitude to
read and write? he asked. Had not Franz
Kauffman known how to write, could he have
imitated his master's hand, and would he have lost
his head for mistaking another man's name for his
own? a little reflection shows us he would not.
Now, as for the other art, could the people read
bad books had they never learned the alphabet?
If there is a man present who can say to the
contrary
,
I absolve him from his respect, and invite
him to speak boldly, for there is no Inquisition in
Vaud, but we invite argument. This is a free
government, and a fatherly government, and a
mild government, as ye all know; but it is not
a
government that likes reading and writing;
reading
that leads to the perusal of bad books, and
writing that causes false signatures.
Fellow-citizens
,
for we are all equal, with the exception
of certain differences that need not now be named,
it is a government for your good, and therefore it
is a government that likes itself, and whose first
duty it is to protect itself and its officers at all
hazards, even though it might by accident commit
some seeming injustice. Fellow, canst thou read?
Indifferently, worshipful bailiff, returned Maso.
There are those who get through a book with
less trouble than myself.
I warrant you, now, he means a good book;
but, as for a bad one, I'll engage the varlet goes
through it like a wild boar! This comes of
education
among the ignorant! There is no more
certain method to corrupt a community, and to
rivet it in beastly practices, than to educate the
ignorant
.
The enlightened can bear knowledge, for
rich food does not harm the stomach that is used
to it, but it is hellebore to the ill-fed. Education
is an arm, for knowledge is power, and the
ignorant
man is but an infant, and to give him
knowledge
C 2
is like putting a loaded blunderbuss into the
hands of a child. What can an ignorant man do
with knowledge? He is as likely to use it wrong
end uppermost as in any other manner. Learning
is a ticklish thing; it was said by Festus to have
maddened even the wise and experienced Paul,
and what may we not expect it to do with your
downright ignoramus? What is thy name, prisoner?
Tommaso Santi; sometimes known among my
friends as San Tommaso; called by my enemies,
Il Maledetto, and by my familiars, Maso.
Thou hast a formidable number of aliases, the
certain sign of a rogue. Thou hast confessed that
thou canst read.
Nay, Signor Bailiff, I would not be taken to
have said
By the faith of Calvin, thou didst confess it,
before all this goodly company! Wilt thou deny
thine own words, knave, in the very face of
justice
?
Thou canst readthou hast it in thy
countenance
,
and I would go nigh to swear, too, that
thou hast some inkling of the quill, were the truth
honestly said. Signor Grimaldi, I know not how
you find this affair on the other side of the Alps,
but with us, our greatest troubles come from these
well-taught knaves, who, picking up knowledge
fraudulently, use it with felonious intent, without
thought of the wants and rights of the public.
We have our difficulties, as is the fact wherever
man is found with his selfishness and passions,
Signor Bailiff; but are we not doing an ungallant
act towards yonder fair bride, by giving the
precedency
to men of this cast? Would it not be
better to dismiss the modest Christine, happy in
Hymen's chains, before we enter more deeply into
the question of the manacles of these prisoners?
To the amazement of all who knew the bailiff's
natural obstinacy, which was wont to increase
instead of becoming more manageable in his cups.
Peterchen assented to this proposition with a
complaisance
and apparent good-will, that he rarely
manifested towards any opinion of which he did
not think himself legitimately the father; though,
like many others who bear that honorable title, he
was sometimes made to yield the privileges of
paternity
to other men's children. He had shown
an unusual deference to the Italian, however,
throughout the whole of their short intercourse,
and on no occasion was it less equivocal, than in
the promptness with which he received the present
hint. The prisoners and officers were commanded
to stand aside, but so near as to remain beneath
his eye, while some of the officials of the abbaye
were ordered to give notice to the train, which
awaited these arrangements in silent wonder, that
it might now approach.
CHAPTER III.
Go, wiser thou! and in thy scale of sense
Weigh thy opinion against Providence;
Call imperfection what thou fanciest such;
Say, here he gives too little, there too much;
Destroy all creatures for thy sport or gust,
And say, if man's unhappy, God's unjust.
Pope
.
It
is unnecessary to repeat the list of characters
that acted the different parts in the train of the
village nuptials. All were there at the close of the
ceremonies, as they had appeared earlier in the
day, and as the last of the legal forms of the
marriage
was actually to take place in presence of
the bailiff, preparatory to the more solemn rites
of the church, the throng yielded to its curiosity,
breaking through the line of those who were
stationed
to restrain its inroads, and pressing about
the foot of the estrade in the stronger interest
which reality is known to possess over fiction.
During the day, a thousand new inquiries had been
made concerning the bride, whose beauty and
mien were altogether so superior to what might
have been expected in one who could consent to
act the part she did on so public an occasion, and
whose modest bearing was in such singular
contradiction
to her present situation. None knew,
however, or, if it were known, no one chose to
reveal
,
her history; and, as curiosity had been so
keenly whetted by mystery, the rush of the
multitude
was merely a proof of the power which
expectation, aided by the thousand surmises of
rumor, can gain over the minds of the idle.
Whatever might have been the character of the
conjectures made at the expense of poor Christine
and they were wanting in neither variety nor
malicemost were compelled to agree in
commending
the diffidence of her air, and the gentle
sweetness of her mild and peculiar beauty. Some,
indeed, affected to see artifice in the former, which
was pronounced to be far too excellent, or too
much overdone, for nature. The usual amount of
common-place remarks were made, too, on the
lucky diversity that was to be found in tastes, and
on the happy necessity there existed of all being
able to find the means to please themselves. But
these were no more than the moral blotches that
usually disfigure human commendation. The
sentiment
and the sympathies of the mass were
powerfully
and irresistibly enlisted in favor of the unknown
maiden  feelings that were very unequivocally
manifested as she drew nearer the estrade, walking
timidly through a dense lane of bodies, all of which
were pressing eagerly forward to get a better view
of her person.
The bailiff, under ordinary circumstances, would
have taken in dudgeon this violation of the rules
prescribed for the government of the multitude;
for he was perfectly sincere in his opinions, absurd
as so many of them were, and, like many other
honest men who defeat the effects they would
produce
by forced constructions of their principles,
he was a little apt to run into excesses of discipline.
But in the present instance, he was rather pleased
than otherwise to see the throng within the reach
of his voice. The occasion was, at best, but
semi-official
,
and he was so far under the influence of
the warm liquors of the ctes as to burn with the
desire of putting forth still more liberally his flowers
of eloquence and his stores of wisdom. He
received
the inroad, therefore, with an air of perfect
good-humor, a manifestation of assent that
encouraged
still greater innovations on the limits,
until the space occupied by the principal actors in
this closing scene was reduced to the smallest
possible
size that was at all compatible with their
movements
and comforts. In this situation of things
the ceremonies proceeded.
The gentle flow of hope and happiness which
was slowly increasing in the mild bosom of the
bride, from the first moment of her appearance in
this unusual scene to that in which it was checked
by the cries of Pippo, had been gradually lessening
under a sense of distrust, and she now entered the
square with a secret and mysterious dread at the
heart, which her inexperience and great ignorance
of life served fearfully to increase. Her imagination
magnified the causes of alarm into some prepared
and designed insult. Christine, fully aware of the
obloquy that pressed upon her race, had only
consented
to adopt this unusual mode of changing her
condition, under a sensitive apprehension that any
other would have necessarily led to the exposure
of her origin. This fear, though exaggerated, and
indeed causeless, was the result of too much
brooding
of late over her own situation, and of that
morbid
sensibility in which the most pure and innocent
are, unhappily, the most likely to indulge. The
concealment, as has already been explained, was
that of her intended husband, who, with the
subterfuge
of an interested spirit, had hoped to mislead
the little circle of his own acquaintances and gratify
his cupidity at the cheapest possible rate to himself.
But there is a point of self-abasement beyond which
the perfect consciousness of right rarely permits
even the most timid to proceed. As the bride
moved up the lane of human bodies, her eye grew
less disturbed and her step firmer,for the pride
of rectitude overcame the ordinary girlish
sensibilities
of her sex, and made her the steadiest at the
very instant that the greater portion of females
would have been the most likely to betray their
weakness. She had just attained this forced but
respectable tranquillity, as the bailiff, signing to the
crowd to hush its murmurs and to remain
motionless
,
arose, with a manner that he intended to be
dignified, and which passed with the multitude for
a very successful experiment in its way, to open
the business in hand by a short address. The
reader is not to be surprised at the volubility of
honest Peterchen, for it was getting to be late in
the day, and his frequent libations throughout the
ceremonies would have wrought him up to even a
much higher flight of eloquence, had the occasion
and the company at all suited such a display of
his powers.
We have had a joyous day, my friends, he
said; one whose excellent ceremonies ought to
recall to every one of us our dependence on
Providence
,
our frail and sinful dispositions, and
particularly
our duties to the councils. By the types
of plenty and abundance, we see the bounty of
nature, which is a gift from Heaven; by the different
little failures that have been, perhaps, unavoidably
made in some of the nicer parts of the exhibition
and I would here particularly mention the besotted
drunkenness of Antoine Giraud, the man who has
impudently undertaken to play the part of Silenus,
as a fit subject of your attention, for it is full of
profit to all hard-drinking knaveswe may see our
own awful imperfections; while, in the order of
the whole, and the perfect obedience of the
subordinates
,
do we find a parallel to the beauty of a
vigilant and exact police and a well-regulated
community
.
Thus you see, that though the ceremony
hath a Heathen exterior, it hath a Christian moral;
God grant that we all forget the former, and
remember
the latter, as best becomes our several
characters and our common country. And now,
having done with the divinities and their legends
with the exception of that varlet Silenus, whose
misconduct, I promise you, is not to be so easily
overlookedwe will give some attention to mortal
affairs. Marriage is honorable before God and
man, and although I have never had leisure to enter
into this holy state myself, owing to a variety of
reasons, but chiefly from my being wedded, as it
were, to the State, to which we all owe quite as
much, or even greater duty, than the most faithful
wife owes to her husband, I would not have you
suppose that I have not a high veneration for
matrimony. So far from this, I have looked on no
part of this day's ceremonies with more satisfaction
than these of the nuptials, which we are now called
upon to complete in a manner suitable to the
importance
of the occasion. Let the bridegroom and
the bride stand forth, that all may the better see
the happy pair.
At the bidding of the bailiff, Jacques Colis led
Christine upon the little stage prepared for their
reception, where both were more completely in
view of the spectators than they had yet been.
The movement, and the agitation consequent on
so public an exposure, deepened the bloom on the
soft cheeks of the bride, and another and a still
less equivocal murmur of applause arose in the
multitude. The spectacle of youth, innocence,
and feminine loveliness, strongly stirred the
sympathies
of even the most churlish and rude; and
most present began to feel for her fears, and to
participate in her hopes.
This is excellent! continued the well-pleased
Peterchen, who was never half so happy as when
he was officially providing for the happiness of
others; it promises a happy
mnage
. A loyal,
frugal, industrious, and active groom, with a fair
and willing bride, can drive discontent up any
man's chimney. That which is to be done next,
being legal and binding, must be done with proper
gravity and respect. Let the notary advance
not him who hath so aptly played this character,
but the commendable and upright officer who is
rightly charged with these respectable functions
and we will listen to the contract. I recommend
a decent silence, my friends, for the true laws and
real matrimony are at the bottoma grave affair
at the best, and one never to be treated with
levity
;
since a few words pronounced now in haste
may be repented of for a whole life hereafter.
Every thing was conducted according to the
wishes of the bailiff, and with great decency of
form. A true and authorized notary read aloud
the marriage-contract, the instrument which
contained
the civic relations and rights of the parties,
and which only waited for the signatures to be
complete. This document required, of course,
that the real names of the contracting parties, their
ages, births, parentage, and all those facts which
are necessary to establish their identity, and to
secure the rights of succession, should be clearly
set forth in a way to render the instrument valid
at the most remote period, should there ever
arrive
a necessity to recur to it in the way of
testimony
.
The most eager attention pervaded the
crowd as they listened to these little particulars,
and Adelheid trembled in this delicate part of the
proceedings, as the suppressed but still audible
breathing of Sigismund reached her ear, lest
something
might occur to give a rude shock to his
feelings
.
But it would seem the notary had his cue.
The details touching Christine were so artfully
arranged
,
that while they were perfectly binding in
law, they were so dexterously concealed from the
observation of the unsuspecting, that no attention
was drawn to the point most apprehended by their
exposure. Sigismund breathed freer when the
notary
drew near the end of his task, and Adelheid
heard the heavy breath he drew at the close, with
the joy one feels at the certainty of having passed
an imminent danger. Christine herself seemed
relieved, though her inexperience in a great
degree
prevented her from foreseeing all that the
greater practice of Sigismund had led him to
anticipate
.
This is quite in rule, and naught now remains
but to receive the signatures of the respective
parties
and their friends, resumed the bailiff. A
happy mnage is like a well-ordered state, a
foretaste
of the joys and peace of Heaven; while a
discontented household and a turbulent community
may be likened at once to the penalties and the
pains of hell! Let the friends of the parties step
Vol. II. D
forth, in readiness to sign when the principals
themselves
shall have discharged this duty.
A few of the relatives and associates of Jacques
Colis moved out of the crowd and placed
themselves
at the side of the bridegroom, who
immediately
wrote his own name, like a man impatient
to be happy. A pause succeeded, for all were
curious to see who claimed affinity to the
trembling
girl on this the most solemn and important
event of her life. An interval of several minutes
elapsed, and no one appeared. The respiration
of Sigismund became more difficult; he seemed
about to choke, and then yielding to a generous
impulse, he arose.
For the love of God!for thine own sake!
for mine! be not too hasty! whispered the
terrified
Adelheid; for she saw the hot glow that
almost blazed on his brow.
I cannot desert poor Christine to the scorn of
the world, in a moment like this! If I die of shame,
I must go forward and own myself.
The hand of Mademoiselle de Willading was
laid upon his arm, and he yielded to this silent but
impressive entreaty, for just then he saw that his
sister was about to be relieved from her distressing
solitude. The throng yielded, and a decent pair,
attired in the guise of small but comfortable
proprietors
,
moved doubtingly towards the bride. The
eyes of Christine filled with tears, for terror and
the apprehension of disgrace yielded suddenly to
joy. Those who advanced to support her in that
moment of intense trial were her father and
mother
.
The respectable-looking pair moved slowly
to the side of their daughter, and, having placed
themselves one on each side of her, they first
ventured
to cast furtive and subdued glances at the
multitude.
It is doubtless painful to the parents to part
with so fair and so dutiful a child, resumed the
obtuse Peterchen, who rarely saw in any emotion
more than its most common-place and vulgar
character
;
Nature pulls them one way, while the
terms of the contract and the progress of our
ceremonies pull another. I have often weaknesses
of this sort myself, the most sensitive hearts being
the most liable to these attacks. But my
children
are the public, and do not admit of too much
of what I may call the detail of sentiment, else,
by the soul of Calvin! were I but an indifferent
bailiff for Berne!Thou art the father of this fair
and blushing maiden, and thou her mother?
We are these, returned Balthazar mildly.
Thou art not of Vvey, or its neighborhood,
by thy speech?
Of the great canton, mein Herr; for the
answer
was in German, these contracted districts
possessing nearly as many dialects as there are
territorial divisions. We are strangers in Vaud.
Thou hast not done the worse for marrying
thy daughter with a Vvaisan, and, more
especially
,
under the favor of our renowned and liberal
Abbaye. I warrant me thy child will be none
the poorer for this compliance with the wishes of
those who lead our ceremonies!
She will not go portionless to the house of her
husband, returned the father, coloring with secret
pride; for to one to whom the chances of life left
so few sources of satisfaction, those that were
possessed
became doubly dear.
This is well! A right worthy couple! And I
doubt not, a meet companion will your offspring
prove. Monsieur le Notaire, call off the names of
these good people aloud, that they may sign, at
least, with a decent parade.
It is settled otherwise, hastily answered the
functionary of the quill, who was necessarily in the
secret of Christine's origin, and who had been well
bribed to observe discretion. It would altogether
derange the order and regularity of the
proceedings
.
As thou wilt; for I would have nothing illegal,
and least of all, nothing disorderly. But o'
Heaven's
sake! let us get through with our
penmanship
,
for I hear there are symptoms that the meats
are likely to be overbaked. Canst thou write,
good man?
Indifferently, mein Herr; but in a way to make
what I will binding before the law.
Give the quill to the bride, Mr. Notary, and
let us protract the happy event no longer.
The bailiff here bent his head aside and
whispered
to an attendant to hurry towards the
kitchens
and to look to the affairs of the banquet.
Christine took the pen with a trembling hand and
pallid cheek, and was about to apply it to the
paper, when a sudden cry from the throng diverted
the attention of all present to a new matter of
interest
.
Who dares thus indecently interrupt this grave
scene, and that, too, in so great a presence?
sternly demanded the bailiff.
Pippo, who with the other prisoners had
unavoidably
been inclosed in the space near the estrade
by the pressure of the multitude, staggered more
into view, and removing his cap with a
well-managed
respect, presented himself humbly to the
sight of Peterchen.
It is I, illustrious and excellent governor,
returned the wily Neapolitan, who retained just
enough of the liquor he had swallowed to render
him audacious, without weakening his means of
observation. It is I, Pippo; an artist of
humble
pretensions, but, I hope, a very honest man,
and, as I know, a great reverencer of the laws and
a true friend to order.
Let the good man speak up boldly. A man
of these principles has a right to be heard. We
live in a time of damnable innovations, and of most
atrocious attempts to overturn the altar, the state,
and the public trusts, and the sentiments of such a
man are like dew to the parched grass.
The reader is not to imagine, from the language
of the bailiff, that Vaud stood on the eve of any
great political commotion, but, as the Government
was in itself an usurpation, and founded on the
false principle of exclusion, it was quite as usual
then, as now, to cry out against the moral throes
of violated right, since the same eagerness to
possess
,
the same selfishness in grasping, however
unjustly obtained, and the same audacity of
assertion
with a view to mystify, pervaded the
Christian
world a century since as exist to-day. The
cunning Pippo saw that the bait had taken, and,
assuming a still more respectful and loyal mien, he
continued:
Although a stranger, illustrious governor, I
have had great delight in these joyous and
excellent
ceremonies. Their fame will be spread far and
near, and men will talk of little less for the coming
year but of Vvey and its festival. But a great
scandal hangs over your honorable heads which it
is in my power to turn aside, and San Gennaro
forbid! that I, a stranger, that hath been well
entertained in your town, should hesitate about
raising his voice on account of any scruples of
modesty. No doubt, great governor, your
eccellenza
believes that this worthy Vvaisan is about
to wive a creditable maiden, whose name could be
honorably mentioned with those of the ceremonies
and your town, before the proudest company in
Europe?
D 2
What of this, fellow? The girl is fair, and
modest enough, at least to the eye, and if thou
knowest aught else, whisper thy secret to her
husband
or her friends, but do not come in this rude
manner to disturb our harmony with thy raven
throat, just as we are ready to sing an
epithalamium
in honor of the happy pair. Your excessive
particularity is the curse of wedlock, my friends,
and I have a great mind to send this knave, in
spite of all this profession of order, which is like
enough to produce disorder, for a month or two
into our Vvey dungeon for his pains.
Pippo was staggered, for, just drunk enough to
be audacious, he had not all his faculties at his
perfect command, and his usual acumen was a
little at fault. Still, accustomed to brave public
opinion, and to carry himself through the failures
of his exhibitions by heavier drafts on the patience
and credulity of his audience, he determined to
persevere as the most likely way of extricating
himself from the menaced consequences of his
indiscretion.
A thousand pardons, great bailiff; he
answered
.
Naught, but a burning desire to do
justice
to your high honor, and to the reputation of
the abbaye's festival, could have led me so far,
but
Speak thy mind at once, rogue, and have done
with circumlocution.
I have little to say, Signore, except that the
father of this illustrious bride, who is about to
honor Vvey by making her nuptials an occasion
for all in the city to witness and to favor, is the
common headsman of Bernea wretch who lately
came near to prove the destruction of more
Christians
than the law has condemned, and who is
sufficiently
out of favor with Heaven to bring the fate
of Gomorrah upon your town!
Pippo tottered to his station among the prisoners,
with the manner of one who had delivered himself
of an important trust, and was instantly lost to
view. So rapid and unlooked for had been the
interruption, and so vehement the utterance of the
Italian while delivering his facts, that, though
several present saw their tendency when it was
too late, none had sufficient presence of mind to
prevent the exposure. A murmur arose in the
crowd, which stirred like a vast sheet of fluid on
which a passing gust had alighted, and then
became
fixed and calm. Of all present, the bailiff
manifested the least surprise or concern, for to
him the last minister of the law was an object, if
not precisely of respect, of politic good-will rather
than of dishonor.
What of this! he answered, in the way of
one who had expected a far more important
revelation
.
What of this, should it be true! Harkee,
friend,art thou, in sooth, the noted Balthazar, he
to whose family the canton is indebted for so much
fair justice?
Balthazar saw that his secret was betrayed, and
that it were wiser simply to admit the facts, than
to have recourse to subterfuge or denial. Nature,
moreover, had made him a man with strong and
pure propensities for the truth, and he was never
without the innate consciousness of the injustice of
which he had been made the victim by the
unfeeling
ordinance of society. Raising his head, he
looked around him with firmness, for he too,
unhappily
,
had been accustomed to act in the face of
multitudes, and he answered the question of the
bailiff, in his usual mild tone of voice, but with
composure.
Herr Bailiff, I am by inheritance the last
avenger
of the law.
By my office! I like the title; it is a good one!
The last avenger of the law! If rogues will offend,
or dissatisfied spirits plot, there must be a hand to
put the finishing blow to their evil works, and why
not thou as well as another! Harkee, officers, shut
me up yonder Italian knave for a week on bread
and water, for daring to trifle with the time and
good-nature of the public in this impudent manner.
And this worthy dame is thy wife, honest
Balthazar
;
and that fair maiden thy childHast thou
more of so goodly a race?
God has blessed me in my offspring, mein
Herr.
Ay; God hath blessed thee!and a great
blessing
it should be, as I know by bitter experience
that is, being a bachelor, I understand the misery
of being childlessI would say no more. Sign
the contract, honest Balthazar, with thy wife and
daughter, that we may have an end of this.
The family of the proscribed were about to obey
this mandate, when Jacques Colis abruptly threw
down the emblems of a bridegroom, tore the
contract
in fragments, and publicly announced that he
had changed his intention, and that he would not
wive a headsman's child. The public mind is
usually caught by any loud declaration in favor of
the ruling prejudice, and, after the first brief pause
of surprise was past, the determination of the
groom was received with a shout of applause that
was immediately followed by general, coarse, and
deriding laughter. The throng pressed upon the
keepers of the limits in a still denser mass,
opposing
an impenetrable wall of human bodies to the
passage of any in either direction, and a dead
stillness
succeeded, as if all present breathlessly awaited
the result of the singular scene.
So unexpected and sudden was the purpose of
the groom, that they who were most affected by
it, did not, at first, fully comprehend the extent of
the disgrace that was so publicly heaped upon them.
The innocent and unpractised Christine stood
resembling
the cold statue of a vestal, with the pen
raised ready to affix her as yet untarnished name
to the contract, in an attitude of suspense, while
her wondering look followed the agitation of the
multitude, as the startled bird, before it takes wing,
regards a movement among the leaves of the
bush. But there was no escape from the truth.
Conviction of its humiliating nature came too soon,
and, by the time the calm of intense curiosity had
succeeded to the momentary excitement of the
spectators, she was standing an exquisite but
painful
picture of wounded feminine feeling and of
maiden shame. Her parents, too, were stupified
by the suddenness of the unexpected shock, and it
was longer before their faculties recovered the
tone proper to meet an insult so unprovoked and
gross.
This is unusual; drily remarked the bailiff,
who was the first to break the long and painful
silence
.
It is brutal! warmly interposed the Signor
Grimaldi. Unless there has been deception
practised
on the bridegroom, it is utterly without
excuse.
Your experience, Signore, has readily
suggested
the true points in a very knotty case, and I shall
proceed without delay to look into its merits.
Sigismund resumed his seat, his hand releasing
the sword-hilt that it had spontaneously grasped,
when he heard this declaration of the bailiff's
intentions
.
For the sake of thy poor sister, forbear!
whispered the terrified Adelheid. All will yet
be wellall must be wellit is impossible that
one so sweet and innocent should long remain with
her honor unavenged!
The young man smiled frightfully, at least so it
seemed to his companion: but he maintained the
appearance of composure. In the mean time
Peterchen, having secretly dispatched another
messenger to the cooks, turned his serious
attention
to the difficulty that had just arisen.
I have long been intrusted by the council with
honorable duties, he said, but never, before
to-day
,
have I been required to decide upon a
domestic
misunderstanding, before the parties were
actually wedded. This is a grave interruption of
the ceremonies of the abbaye, as well as a slight
upon the notary and the spectators, and needs be
well looked to. Dost thou really persist in putting
this unusual termination to a marriage-ceremony,
Herr Bridegroom?
Jacques Colis had lost a little of the violent
impulse
which led him to the precipitate and
inconsiderate
act of destroying an instrument he had legally
executed; but his outbreaking of feeling was
followed
by a sullen and fixed resolution to persevere
in the refusal at every hazard to himself.
I will not wive the daughter of a man hunted
of society, and avoided by all; he doggedly
answered
.
No doubt the respectability of the parent is
the next thing to a good dowry, in the choice of a
wife, returned the bailiff, but one of thy years
has not come hither, without having first inquired
into the parentage of her thou wert about to wed?
It was sworn to me that the secret should be
kept. The girl is well endowed, and a promise
was solemnly made that her parentage should
never be known. The family of Colis is esteemed
in Vaud, and I would not have it said that the
blood of the headsman of the canton hath mixed
in a stream as fair as ours.
And yet thou wert not unwilling, so long as the
circumstance was unknown? Thy objection is
less to the fact, than to its public exposure.
Without the aid of parchments and tongues,
Monsieur le Bailli, we should all be equal in birth.
Ask the noble Baron de Willading, who is seated
there at your side, why he is better than another.
He will tell you that he is come of an ancient and
honorable line; but had he been taken from his
castle in infancy, and concealed under a feigned
name, and kept from men's knowledge as being
that he is, who would think of him for the deeds
of his ancestors? As the Sire de Willading would,
in such a case, have lost in the world's esteem, so
did Christine gain; but as opinion would return to
the baron, when the truth should be published, so
does it desert Balthazar's daughter, when she is
known to be a headsman's child. I would have
married the maiden as she was, but, your pardon,
Monsieur le Bailli, if I say, I will not wive her as
she is.
A murmur of approbation followed this
plausible
and ready apology, for, when antipathies are
active and bitter, men are easily satisfied with a
doubtful morality and a weak argument.
This honest youth hath some reason in him,
observed the puzzled bailiff, shaking his head. I
would he had been less expert in disputation, or
that the secret had been better kept! It is
apparent
as the sun in the heavens, friend Melchior,
that hadst thou not been known as thy father's
child, thou wouldst not have succeeded to thy
castle
and landsnay, by St. Luke! not even to the
rights of the brgerschaft.
In Genoa we are used to hear both parties,
gravely rejoined the Signor Grimaldi, that we
may first make sure that we touch the true merits
of the case. Were another to claim the Signor
de Willading's honors and name, thou wouldst
scarce grant his suit, without questioning our friend
here, touching his own rights to the same.
Better and better! This is justice, while that
which fell from the bridegroom was only
argument
.
Harkee, Balthazar, and thou good woman,
his wifeand thou too, pretty Christinewhat
have ye all to answer to the reasonable plea of
Jacques Colis?
Balthazar, who, by the nature of his office, and
by his general masculine duties, had been so much
accustomed to meet with harsh instances of the
public hatred, soon recovered his usual calm
exterior
,
even though he felt a father's pang and a
father's
just resentment at witnessing this open
injury
to one so gentle and deserving as his child.
But the blow had been far heavier on Marguerite,
the faithful and long-continued sharer of his
fortunes
.
The wife of Balthazar was past the prime
of her days, but she still retained the presence, and
some of the personal beauty, which had rendered
her, in youth, a woman of extraordinary mien
and carriage. When the words which announced
the slight to her daughter first fell on her ears, she
paled to the hue of the dead. For several minutes
she stood looking more like one that had taken a
final departure from the interests and emotions of
life, than one that, in truth, was a prey to one of
the strongest passions the human breast can ever
entertain, that of wounded maternal affection. Then
the blood stole slowly to her temples, and, by the
time the bailiff put his question, her entire face was
glowing under a tumult of feeling that threatened
to defeat its own wishes, by depriving her of the
power of speech.
Thou canst answer him, Balthazar, she said
huskily, motioning for her husband to arouse his
faculties; thou art used to these multitudes and
to their scorn. Thou art a man, and canst do us
justice.
Herr Bailiff, said the headsman, who seldom
lost the mild deportment that characterized his
manner, there is much truth in what Jacques
hath urged, but all present may have seen that the
fault did not come of us, but of yonder heartless
vagabond. The wretch sought my life on the
lake, in our late unfortunate passage hither; and,
not content with wishing to rob my children of
their father, he comes now to injure me still more
cruelly. I was born to the office I hold, as you
well know, Herr Hofmeister, or it would never
have been sought by me; but what the law wills,
men insist upon as right. This girl can never be
called upon to strike a head from its shoulders,
and, knowing from childhood up the scorn that
awaits all who come of my race, I sought the
means of releasing her, at least, from some part
of the curse that hath descended on us.
I know not if this were legal! interrupted the
bailiff, quickly. What is your opinion, Her von
Willading? Can any in Berne escape their
heritable
duties, any more than hereditary privileges can
be assumed? This is a grave question; innovation
leads to innovation, and our venerable laws and
our sacred usages must be preserved, if we would
avert the curse of change!
Balthazar hath well observed that a female
cannot exercise the executioner's office.
True, but a female may bring forth them that
can. This is a cunning question for the
doctors-in-law
,
and it must be examined; of all damnable
offences, Heaven keep me from that of a wish for
change. If change is ever to follow, why
establish
?
Change is the unpardonable sin in politics,
Signor Grimaldi; since that which is often
changed
becomes valueless in time, even if it be coin.
Vol. II. E
The mother hath something she would utter,
said the Genoese, whose quick but observant eye
had been watching the workings of the
countenances
of the repudiated family, while the bailiff
was digressing in his usual prolix manner on things
in general, and who detected the throes of feeling
which heaved the bosom of the respectable
Marguerite
,
in a way to announce a speedy birth to
her thoughts.
Hast thou aught to urge, good woman?
demanded
Peterchen, who was well enough disposed to
hear both sides in all cases of controversy, unless
they happened to touch the supremacy of the great
canton. To speak the truth, the reasons of
Jacques
Colis are plausible and witty, and are likely
to weigh heavy against thee.
The color slowly disappeared from the brow of
the mother, and she turned such a look of
fondness
and protection on her child, as spoke a
complete
condensation of all her feelings in the
engrossing
sentiment of a mother's love.
Have I aught to urge! slowly repeated
Marguerite
,
looking steadily about her at the curious
and unfeeling crowd which, bent on the indulgence
of its appetite for novelty, and excited by its
prejudices
,
still pressed upon the halberds of the
officers
Has
a mother aught to say in defence of
her injured and insulted child! Why hast thou not
also asked, Herr Hofmeister, if I am human?
We come of proscribed races, I know, Balthazar
and I, but like thee, proud bailiff, and the
privileged
at thy side, we come too of God! The
judgment and power of men have crushed us from
the beginning, and we are used to the world's
scorn and to the world's injustice!
Say not so, good woman, for no more is
required
than the law sanctions. Thou art now talking
against thine own interests, and I interrupt thee,
in pure mercy. 'Twould be scandalous in me to
sit here and listen to one that hath bespattered the
law with an evil tongue.
I know naught of the subtleties of thy laws,
but well do I know their cruelty and wrongs, as
respects me and mine! All others come into the
world with hope, but we have been crushed from
the beginning. That surely cannot be just which
destroys hope. Even the sinner need not despair,
through the mercy of the Son of God! but we,
that have come into the world under thy laws, have
little before us in life but shame and the scorn of
men!
Nay, thou quite mistakest the matter, dame;
these privileges were first bestowed on thy families
in reward for good services, I make no doubt, and
it was long accounted profitable to be of this
office.
I do not say that in a darker age, when
oppression
stalked over the land, and the best were
barbarous
as the worst to-day, some of those of whom
we are born may not have been fierce and cruel
enough to take upon themselves this office with
good will; but I deny that any short of Him who
holds the universe in his hand, and who controls
an endless future to compensate for the evils of the
present time, has the power to say to the son, that
he shall be the heritor of the father's wrongs!
How! dost question the doctrine of descents?
We shall next hear thee dispute the rights of the
brgerschaft!
I know nothing, Herr Bailiff, of the nice
distinctions
of your rights in the city, and wish to
utter naught for or against. But an entire life of
contumely and bitterness is apt to become a life of
thoughtfulness and care; and I see sufficient
difference
between the preservation of privileges fairly
earned, though even these may and do bring with
them abuses hard to be borne, and the unmerited
oppression of the offspring for the ancestors' faults.
There is little of that justice which savors of
Heaven in this, and the time will come when a
fearful return will be made for wrongs so sore!
Concern for thy pretty daughter, good
Marguerite
,
causes thee to speak strongly.
Is not the daughter of a headsman and a
headsman's wife their offspring, as much as the fair
maiden who sits near thee is the child of the noble
at her side? Am I to love her less, that she is
despised
by a cruel world? Had I not the same
suffering
at the birth, the same joy in the infant smile,
the same hope in the childish promise, and the same
trembling for her fate when I consented to trust
her happiness to another, as she that bore that
more fortunate but not fairer maiden hath had in
her? Hath God created two naturestwo
yearnings
for the mothertwo longings for our
children's
wealthose of the rich and honored, and
those of the crushed and despised?
Go to, good Marguerite; thou puttest the
matter
altogether in a manner that is unusual. Are
our reverenced usages nothingour solemn edicts
our city's ruleand our resolution to govern,
and that fairly and with effect?
I fear that these are stronger than the right,
and likely to endure when the tears of the
oppressed
are exhausted, when they and their fates shall
be forgotten!
Thy child is fair and modest, observed the
Signor Grimaldi, and will yet find a youth who
will more than atone for this injury. He that has
rejected her was not worthy of her faith.
Marguerite turned her look, which had been
glowing with awakened feeling, on her pale and
still motionless daughter. The expression of her
eyes softened, and she folded her child to her
bosom, as the dove shelters its young. All her
aroused feelings appeared to dissolve in the
sentiment
of love.
My child is fair, Herr Peter; she continued,
without adverting to the interruption; but better
than fair, she is good! Christine is gentle and
dutiful, and not for a world would she bruise the
spirit of another as hers has been this day bruised.
Humbled as we are, and despised of men, bailiff,
we have our thoughts, and our wishes, and our
hopes, and memory, and all the other feelings of
those that are more fortunate; and when I have
racked my brain to reason on the justice of a fate
which has condemned all of my race to have
little
other communion with their kind but that of
blood, and when bitterness has swollen at my
heart, ay, near to bursting, and I have been ready
to curse Providence and die, this mild, affectionate
girl hath been near to quench the fire that
consumed
me, and to tighten the cords of life, until
her love and innocence have left me willing to live
even under a heavier load than this I bear. Thou
art of an honored race, bailiff, and canst little
understand
most of our suffering; but thou art a
man, and shouldst know what it is to be wounded
through another, and that one who is dearer to thee
than thine own flesh.
Thy words are strong, good Marguerite,
again interrupted the bailiff, who felt an uneasiness,
of which he would very gladly be rid. Himmel!
Who can like any thing better than his own flesh?
Besides, thou shouldst remember that I am a
bachelor
,
and bachelors are apt, naturally, to feel more
for their own flesh than for that of others. Stand
aside, and let the procession pass, that we may go
to the banquet, which waits. If Jacques Colis will
none of thy girl, I have not the power to make
him. Double the dowry, good woman, and thou
E 2
shalt have a choice of husbands, in spite of the axe
and the sword that are in thy escutcheon. Let the
halberdiers make way for those honest people there,
who, at least, are functionaries of the law, and are
to be protected as well as ourselves.
The crowd obeyed, yielding readily to the ad
vance of the officers, and, in a few minutes, the
useless attendants of the village nuptials, and the
train of Hymen, slunk away, sensible of the ridicule
that, in a double degree, attaches itself to folly,
when it fails of effecting even its own absurdities.
CHAPTER IV.
The weeping blood in woman's breast
Was never known to thee;
Nor the balm that drops on wounds of woe
From woman's pitying e'e.
Burns
.
A
large
portion of the curious followed the
disconcerted
mummers from the square, while others
hastened to break their fasts at the several places
selected for this important feature in the business
of the day. Most of those who had been on the
estrade now left it, and, in a few minutes, the living
carpet of heads around the little area in front of
the bailiff was reduced to a few hundreds of those
whose better feelings were stronger than their
self-indulgence
.
Perhaps this distribution of the
multitude
is about in the proportion that is usually found,
in those cases in which selfishness draws in one
direction, while feeling or sympathy with the
wronged pulls in another, among all masses of
human beings that are congregated as spectators
of some general and indifferent exhibition of
interests
in which they have no near personal concern.
The bailiff and his immediate friends, the
prisoners
,
and the family of the headsman, with a
sufficient number of the guards, were among those
who remained. The bustling Peterchen had lost
some of his desire to take his place at the banquet,
in the difficulties of the question which had arisen,
and in the certainty that nothing material, in the
way of gastronomy, would be attempted until he
appeared. We should do injustice to his heart,
did we not add, also, that he had troublesome
qualms of conscience, which intuitively admonished
him that the world had dealt hardly with the family
of Balthazar. There remained the party of Maso,
too, to dispose of, and his character of an upright
as well as of a firm magistrate to maintain. As
the crowd diminished, however, he and those near
him descended from their high places, and mixed
with the few who occupied the still guarded area
in front of the stage.
Balthazar had not stirred from his riveted posture
near the table of the notary, for he shrunk from
encountering, in the company of his wife and
daughter, the insults to which he should be exposed
now his character was known, by mingling with
the crowd, and he waited for a favorable moment
to withdraw unseen. Marguerite still stood folding
Christine to her bosom, as if jealous of farther
injury
to her beloved. The recreant bridegroom
had taken the earliest opportunity to disappear,
and was seen no more in Vvey during the
remainder
of the revels.
Peterchen cast a hurried glance at this group,
as his foot reached the ground, and then turning
towards the thief-takers he made a sign for them
to advance with their prisoners.
Thy evil tongue has balked one of the most
engaging rites of this day's festival, knave;
observed
the bailiff, addressing Pippo with a certain
magisterial reproof in his voice. I should do
well to send thee to Berne, to serve a month among
those who sweep the city streets, as a punishment
for thy raven throat. What, in the name of all
thy Roman saints and idols, hadst thou against the
happiness of these honest people, that thou must
come, in this unseemly manner, to destroy it?
Naught but the love of truth, eccellenza, and
a just horror of the man of blood.
That thou and all like thee should have a horror
of the ministers of the law, I can understand; and
it is more than probable that thy dislike will extend
to me, for I am about to pronounce a just judgment
on thee and thy fellows for disturbing the harmony
of the day, and especially for having been guilty
of the enormous crime of an outrage on our agents.
Couldst thou grant me a moment's leave?
asked the Genoese in his ear.
An hour, noble Gaetano, if thou wilt.
The two then conversed apart, for a minute or
more. During the brief dialogue, the Signor
Grimaldi
occasionally looked at the quiet and
apparently
contrite Maso, and stretched his arm towards
the Leman, in a way to give the observers an
inkling of his subject. The countenance of the
Herr Hofmeister changed from official sternness
to an expression of decent concern as he listened,
and ere long it took a decidedly forgiving laxity
of muscle. When the other had done speaking,
he bowed a ready assent to what he had just heard,
and returned to the prisoners.
As I have just observed, he resumed, it is
my duty now to pronounce finally on these men
and their conduct. Firstly they are strangers, and
as such are not only ignorant of our laws, but
entitled
to our hospitality; next, they have been
punished sufficiently for the original offence, by
being abridged of the day's sports; and as to the
crime committed against ourselves, in the person
of our agents, it is freely forgiven, for forgiveness
is a generous quality, and becomes a paternal form
of rule. Depart therefore, of God's name! all of
ye to a man, and remember henceforth to be
discreet
.
Signore, and you, Herr Baron, shall we to
the banquet?
The two old friends had already moved onward,
in close and earnest discourse, and the bailiff was
obliged to seek out another companion. None
offered
,
at the moment, but Sigismund, who had
stood, since quitting the stage, in an attitude of
complete indecision and helplessness,
notwithstanding
his great physical energy and his usual moral
readiness to act. Taking the arm of the young
soldier, with the disregard of ceremony that
denotes
a sense of condescension, the bailiff drew
him away from the spot, heedless himself of the
other's reluctance, and without observing that, in
consequence of the general desertion, for few were
disposed to indulge their compassion unless it were
in company with the honored and noble, Adelheid
was left absolutely alone with the family of
Balthazar
.
This office of a headsman, Herr Sigismund,
commenced the unobservant Peterchen, too full of
his own opinions, and much too sensible of his
right to be delivered of them in the presence of his
junior and inferior, to note the youth's trouble, is
at the best but a disgusting affair; though we, of
station and authority, are obliged prudently to
appear
to deem it otherwise before the people, in our
own interest. Thou hast had occasion to remark
often, in the discipline of thy military followers,
that a false coloring must be put upon things, lest
they who are very necessary to the state should
not think the state quite so necessary to
them-What
is thy opinion, Captain Sigismund, as a man
who has yet his hopes and his views on the softer
sex, of this act of Jacques Colis?Is it conduct
to be approved of, or to be condemned?
I deem him a heartless, mercenary, miscreant!
The suppressed energy with which these
unexpected
words were uttered caused the bailiff to
stop and to look up in his companion's face, as if
to ask its reason. But there all was already calm,
for the young man had too long been accustomed
to drill its expression, when the sensitive sore of
his origin was probed, as so frequently happened,
to permit the momentary weakness long to
maintain
its ascendency.
Ay, this is the opinion of thy years; resumed
Peterchen. Thou art at a time of life when we
esteem a pretty face and a mellow eye of more
account even than gold. But we put on our
interested
spectacles after thirty, and seldom see any
thing very admirable, that is not at the same time
very lucrative. Here is Melchior de Willading's
daughter, now, a woman to set a city in a blaze,
for she hath wit, and lands, and beauty, besides
good blood;what, for instance, is thy opinion of
her merit?
That she is deserving of all the happiness that
every human excellence ought to confer!
Humthou art nearer to thirty than I had
thought thee, Herr Sigismund! But touching this
Balthazar, thou art not to believe, on account of
the few words of grace which fell from me, that
my aversion for the wretch is less than thine, or
than that of any other honest man; but it would
be unseemly and unwise in a bailiff to desert the
last minister of the law's decrees in the face of
the public. There are feelings and sentiments
that are natural to us all, and among them are to
be classed respect and honor for the well and
nobly born, (the discourse was in German,) and
hatred and contempt for those who are
condemned
of men. These are feelings which belong to
human nature itself, and God forbid that I, a man
already past the age of romance, should really
entertain
any sentiments that are not strictly human.
Do they not rather belong to abusesto our
prejudices?
The difference is not material, in a practical
view, young man. That which is fairly bred into
the mind, by discipline and habit, gets to be stronger
than instinct, or even than one of the senses. Let
there be an unseemly sight, or a foul smell near
thee, and thou hast only to turn thy eyes, or hold
thy nose, to be rid of it; but I could never find
the means to lessen a prejudice that was once
fairly seated in the mind. Thou mayest look
whither
thou wilt, and shut out the unsavory odors of
the imagination by all the means thou canst
invent
,
but if a man is, in truth, condemned of opinion,
he might as well make his appeal to God at once
for justice, as to any mercy he is likely to receive
from men. This much have I learned in my
experience
as a public functionary.
I should hope that these are not the legal
dogmas
of our ancient canton, returned the youth,
conquering his feelings, though it cost him a severe
effort.
As far from it as Basle is from Coire. We
hold no such discreditable doctrines. I challenge
the world to show a state that possesses a fairer
set of maxims than ourselves, and we even
endeavor
to make our practice chime in with our
opinions, whenever it can be done in safety. No,
in these particulars, Berne is a paragon of a
community
,
and as rarely says one thing and does
another, as any government you shall see. What
I now tell thee, young man, is said to thee in the
familiarity of a fte, as thou know'st, in which
there have been some fooleries, to open confidence
and to loosen the tongue. We openly and loudly
profess great truth and equality before the law,
saving the city's rights, and take holy, heavenly,
upright justice for our guide in all matters of
theory. Himmel! If thou would'st have thy
affair decided on principle, go before the councils,
or the magistracy of the canton, and thou shalt
hear such wisdom, and witness such
keen-sightedness
into chicanery, as would have honored
Solomon
himself!
And notwithstanding this, prejudice is a
general
master.
How canst thou have it otherwise? Is not a
man a man? Will he not lean as he has been
weighed
upon?does not the tree grow in the way the
twig is bent? No, while I adore justice, Herr
Sigismund
,
as becomes a bailiff, I confess to both
prejudice
and partiality, mentally considered. Now,
vonder maiden, the pretty Christine, lost some of
her grace in my eyes, as no doubt she did in
thine, when the truth came to be known that she
was Balthazar's child. The girl is fair and modest
and winning in her way; but there is something
I cannot tell thee whatbut a certain damnable
somethinga tainta colora hueaaa
that showed her origin the instant I heard who
was her parentwas it not so with thee?
When her origin was proved, but not
previously
.
Ay, of a certainty; I mean not otherwise. But
a thing is not seen any the worse because it is seen
thoroughly, although it may be seen falsely when
there are false covers to conceal its ugliness.
Particularity
is necessary to philosophy. Ignorance
is a mask to conceal the little details that are
necessary
to knowledge. Your Moor might pass for a
Christian in a mask, but strip him of his covering
and the true shade of the skin is seen. Didst thou
not observe, for instance, in all that touches
feminine
grace and perfection, the manifest difference
between the daughter of Melchior de Willading
and the daughter of this Balthazar?
There was the difference between a maiden of
most honored and happy extraction and a maiden
most miserably condemned!
Nay, the Demoiselle de Willading is the fairer.
Nature has certainly been most bountiful to the
heiress of Willading, Herr Bailiff, who is scarcely
less attractive for her female grace and goodness,
than she is fortunate in the accidents of birth and
condition.
I knew thou couldst not, in secret, be of a
different
mind from the rest of men! exclaimed
Peterchen in triumph, for he took the warmth of
his companion's manner to be a reluctant and
half-concealed assent to his own proposition.
Here the discourse ended: for, the earnest
conference
between Melchior and the Signor Grimaldi
having terminated, the bailiff hastened to join his
more important guests, and Sigismund was
released
from an examination that had harrowed every
feeling of his soul, while he even despised the
besotted
loquacity of the man who had been the
instrument of his torture.
The separation of Adelheid from her father was
anticipated and previously provided for; since the
men were expected to resort to the banquet at this
hour. She had continued near Christine and her
mother, therefore, without attracting any unusual
attention to her movements, even in those who
were the objects of her sympathy, a feeling that
was so natural in one of her years and sex. A
male attendant, in the livery of her father's house,
Vol. II. F
remained near her person, a protector who was
certain to insure not only her safety in the
thronged
streets of the town, but to exact from those
whose faculties were beginning to yield to the
excesses of the occasion the testimonials of
respect
that were due to her station. It was under
these circumstances, then, that the more honored,
and, to the eyes of the uninstructed, the happier of
these maidens, approached the other, when
curiosity
was so far appeased as to have left the
family
of Balthazar nearly alone in the centre of the
square.
Is there no friendly roof near, to which thou
canst withdraw? asked the heiress of Willading
of the mother of the pallid and scarcely conscious
Christine; thou wouldst do better to seek some
shelter and privacy for thy unoffending and much
injured child. If any that belong to me can be of
service, I pray that thou wilt command as freely
as if they were followers of thine own.
Marguerite had never before spoken with a
female of a rank superior to the ordinary classes.
The ample means of both her father's and her
husband's
family had furnished all that was necessary
to the improvement of the mind of one in her
station
,
and perhaps she had been the gainer, in mere
deportment, by having been greatly excluded, by
their prejudices, from association with females of
her own condition. As is often seen among those
who have the thoughts without the conventional
usages of a better caste in life, she was slightly
tinctured with an exhibition of what might be
termed an exaggerated manner, while at the same
time it was perfectly free from vulgarity or
coarseness
.
The gentle accents of Adelheid fell on her
ear soothingly, and she gazed long and earnestly
at the beautiful speaker without a reply.
Who and what art thou, that canst think a
headsman's child may receive an insult that is
unmerited, and who offerest the service of thy
menials, as if the very vassal would not refuse his
master's bidding in our behalf!
I am Adelheid de Willading, the daughter of
the baron of that name, and one much disposed
to temper this cruel blow to the feelings of poor
Christine. Suffer that my people seek the means
to convey thy child to some other place!
Marguerite folded her daughter still closer to
her bosom, passing a hand across her brow, as if
to recall some half-obscured idea.
I have heard of thee, lady.'Tis said that
thou art kind to the wronged, and of excellent
dispositions towards the unhappythat thy father's
castle is an honored and hospitable abode, which
those who enter rarely love to quit. But hast
thou well weighed the consequences of this
liberality
towards a race, that is and has been
proscribed
of men, from generation to generation
from him who first lent himself to his bloody office,
with a cruel heart and a greedy desire for gold, to
him whose courage is scarcely equal to the
disgusting
duty? Hast thou bethought thee of this,
or hast thou yielded, heedlessly, to a sudden and
youthful impulse?
Of all this have I thought, said Adelheid,
eagerly; whatever may be the injustice of others,
thou hast none to fear from me.
Marguerite yielded the form of her child to the
support of her father's arm, and drew nearer, with
a gaze of earnest and pleased interest, to the
blushing
but still composed Adelheid. She took the
hand of the latter, and, with a look of recognition
and intelligence, said slowly, as if communing
with herself, rather than speaking to another
This is getting to be intelligible! she
murmured
;
there is still gratitude and creditable feeling
in the world. I can understand why we are not
revolting to this fair being: she has a sense of
justice
that is stronger than her prejudices. We have
done her service, and she is not ashamed of the
source whence it has come!
The heart of Adelheid throbbed quick and
violently
;
and, for a moment, she doubted her ability
to command her feelings. But the pleasing
conviction
that Sigismund had been honorable and
delicate, even in his most sacred and confidential
communications with his own mother, came to
relieve her, and to make her momentarily happy;
since nothing is so painful to the pure mind, as to
think those they love have acted unworthily; or
nothing so grateful, as the assurance that they
merit the esteem we have been induced liberally
and confidingly to bestow.
You do me no more than justice, returned
the pleased listener of this flattering and seemingly
involuntary opinionwe are indeedindeed we
are truly grateful; but had we not reason for the
sacred obligations of gratitude, I think we could
still be just. Will you not now consent that my
people should aid you?
This is not necessary, lady. Send away thy
followers, for their presence will draw unpleasant
observations on our movements. The town is now
occupied with feasts, and, as we have not blindly
overlooked the necessity of a retreat for the
hunted
and persecuted, we will take the opportunity to
withdraw unseen. As for thyself
I would be near this innocent at a moment
so trying,added Adelheid earnestly, and with
that visible sympathy which rarely fails to meet
an echo.
Heaven bless thee! Heaven bless thee, sweet
girl! And Heaven will bless thee, for few wrongs
go unrequited in this life, and little good without
its reward. Send thy followers away, or if thy
habits require their watchfulness, let them be near
unseen, whilst thou watchest our movements; and
when the eyes of all are turned on their own
pleasures
,
thou canst follow. Heaven bless theeay,
and Heaven will!
Marguerite then led her daughter towards one
of the least frequented streets. She was
accompanied
by the silent Balthazar, and closely watched
by one of the menials of Adelheid. When fairly
housed, the domestic returned to show the spot to
his mistress, who had appeared to occupy herself
with the hundred silly devices that were invented
to amuse the multitude. Dismissing her
attendants
,
with an order to remain at hand, however,
the heiress of Willading soon found means to enter
the humble abode in which the proscribed family
had taken refuge, and, as she was expected, she
was soon introduced into the chamber where
Christine
and her mother had taken refuge.
The sympathy of the young and tender Adelheid
was precious to one of the character of Christine.
They wept together, for the weakness of her sex
prevailed over the pride of the former, when she
found herself unrestrained by the observation of
the world, and she gave way to the torrent of
feeling
that broke through its bounds, in spite of her
endeavors to control it. Marguerite was the only
spectator of this silent but intelligible communion
between these two young and pure spirits, and
her soul was shaken by the unlooked-for
commiseration
of one so honored, and who was usually
esteemed so happy.
Thou hast the consciousness of our wrongs,
she said, when the first burst of emotion had a
little subsided. Thou canst then believe that a
headsman's child is like the offspring of another,
F 2
and is not to be hunted of men like the young of a
wolf.
Mother, this is the Baron de Willading's
heiress
,
said Christine: would she come here, did
she not pity us?
Yes, she can pity usand yet I find it hard
even to be pitied! Sigismund has told us of her
goodness, and she may, in truth, feel for the
wretched!
The allusion to her son caused the temples of
Adelheid to burn like fire, while there was a chill,
resembling that of death, at her heart. The first
arose from the quick and uncontrollable alarm of
female sensitiveness; the last was owing to the
shock inseparable from being presented with this
vivid, palpable picture of Sigismund's close affinity
with the family of an executioner. She could have
better borne it, had Marguerite spoken of her son
less familiarly, or with more of that feigned
ignorance
of each other, which, without stopping to
scan its fitness, she had been led to think existed
between the young man and his family.
Mother! exclaimed Christine reproachfully,
and in surprise, as if a great indiscretion had been
thoughtlessly committed.
It matters not, child; it matters not. I saw
by the kindling eye of Sigismund to-day, that our
secret will not much longer be kept. The noble
boy must show more energy than those who have
gone before him; he must quit for ever a country
in which he was condemned, even before he was
born.
I shall not deny that your connexion with
Monsieur Sigismund is known to me, said
Adelheid
,
summoning all her resolution to make an
avowal which put her at once into the confidence
of Balthazar's family. You are acquainted with
the heavy debt of gratitude we owe your son, and
it will explain the nature of the interest I now feel
in your wrongs.
The keen eye of Marguerite studied the
crimsoned
features of Adelheid till forgetfulness got
the better of discretion. The search was anxious,
rather than triumphant, the feeling most dreaded
by its subject; and, when her eyes were withdrawn,
the mother of the youth became thoughtful and
pensive. This expressive communion produced a
deep and embarrassing silence, which each would
gladly have broken, had they not both been
irresistibly
tongue-tied by the rapidity and intensity of
their thoughts.
We know that Sigismund hath been of
service
to thee, observed Marguerite, who always
addressed her gay companion with the familiarity
that belonged to her greater age, rather than with
the respect which Adelheid had been accustomed
to receive from those who were of a rank inferior
to her own. The brave boy hath spoken of it,
though he hath spoken of it modestly.
He had every right to do himself justice in
his communications with those of his own family.
Without his aid, my father would have been
childless; and without his brave support, the child
fatherless. Twice has he stood between us and
death.
I have heard of this, returned Marguerite,
again fastening her penetrating eye on the tell-tale
features of Adelheid, which never failed to
brighten
and glow, whenever there was allusion to the
courage and self-devotion of him she secretly
loved. As to what thou say'st of the intimacy
of our poor boy with those of his blood, cruel
circumstances stand between us and our wishes.
If Sigismund has told thee of whom he comes,
he has also most probably told thee of the manner
in which he passes, in the world, for that which
he is not.
I believe he has not withheld any thing that he
knew, and which it was proper to communicate to
me; answered Adelheid, dropping her eyes before
the attentive, expectant look of Marguerite. He
has spoken freely, and
Thou wouldst have said
Honorably, and as became a soldier;
continued
Adelheid, firmly.
He has done well! This lightens my heart of
one burthen at least. No; God has destined us to
this fate, and it would have grieved me that a son
of mine should have failed of principle in an affair,
of all others, in which it is most wanted. You
look amazed, lady!
These sentiments, in one so situated, surprise
as much as they delight me! If any thing could
excuse some looseness in the manner of regarding
the usual ties of life, it would surely be to find
oneself so placed, by no misconduct of our own, as
to be a but to the world's dislike and injustice;
and yet here, where there was reason to expect
some resentment against fortune, I meet with
sentiments
that would honor a throne!
Thou thinkest as one more accustomed to
consider
thy fellow-creatures through the means of
what men fancy, than through things as they are.
This is the picture of youth, and inexperience, and
innocence; but it is not the picture of life. 'Tis
misfortune, and not prosperity that chasteneth, by
proving our insufficiency for true happiness, and
by leading the soul to depend on a power greater
than any that is to be found on earth. We fall
before the temptation of happiness, when we rise
in adversity. If thou thinkest, innocent one, that
noble and just sentiments belong to the fortunate,
thou trustest to a false guide. There are evils
which flesh cannot endure, it is true; but, removed
from these overwhelming wants, we are strongest
in the right, when least tempted by vanity and
ambition
.
More starving beggars abstain from
stealing
the crust they crave, than pampered gluttons
deny themselves the luxury that kills them. They
that live under the rod, see and dread the hand
that holds it; they who riot in earth's glories,
come at last to think they deserve the short-lived
distinctions they enjoy. When thou goest down
into the depths of misery, thou hast naught to fear
except the anger of God! It is when raised above
others, that thou shouldst tremble most for thine
own safety.
This is not the manner in which the world is
used to reason.
Because the world is governed by those whose
interest it is to pervert truth to their own objects,
and not by those whose duties run hand-in-hand
with the right. But we will say no more of this,
lady; here is one that feels too acutely just now to
admit truth to be too freely spoken.
Dost feel thyself better, and more able to listen
to thy friends, dear Christine? asked Adelheid,
taking the hand of the repudiated and deserted girl
with the tenderness of an affectionate sister.
Until now the sufferer had only spoken the few
words related, in mild reproof of her mother's
indiscretion
.
That little had been uttered with
parched
lips and a choked voice, while the hue of her
features was deadly pale, and her whole countenance
betrayed intense mental anguish. But this display
of interest in one of her own years and sex, of
whose excellencies she had been accustomed to
hear such fervid descriptions from the
warm-hearted
Sigismund, and of whose sincerity she was
assured
by the subtle and quick instinct that unites
the innocent and young, caused a quick and
extreme
change in her sensibilities. The grief which
had been struggling and condensed, now flowed
more freely from her eyes, and she threw herself,
sobbing and weeping, in a paroxysm of gentle, but
overwhelming, feeling, on the bosom of this
new-found
friend. The experienced Marguerite smiled
at this manifestation of kindness on the part of
Adelheid, though even this expression of satisfaction
was austere and regulated in one who had so long
stood at bay with the world. And, after a short
pause, she left the room, under the belief that such
a communion with a spirit, pure and inexperienced
as her own, a communion so unusual to her
daughter
,
would be more likely to produce a happy effect,
if left to themselves, than when restrained by her
presence.
The two girls wept in common, for a long time
after Marguerite had disappeared. This
intercourse
,
chastened as it was by sorrow, and rendered
endearing on the one side by a confiding
ingenuousness
,
and on the other by generous pity, caused
both to live in that short period, as it were, months
together in a near and dear intimacy. Confidence
is not always the growth of time. There are minds
that meet each other with a species of affinity that
resembles the cohesive property of matter, and
with a promptitude and faith that only belongs to
the purer essence of which they are composed.
But when this attraction of the ethereal part of the
being is aided by the feelings that have been
warmed
by an interest so tender as that which the hearts
of both the maidens felt in a common object, its
power is not only stronger, but quicker, in making
itself felt. So much was already known by each
of the other's character, fortunes, and hopes (
always
with the exception of Adelheid's most sacred
secret, which Sigismund cherished as a deposit by
far too sacred to be shared even with his sister)
that the meeting under no circumstances could
have been that of strangers, and their mutual
knowledge came as an assistant to break down the
barriers of those forms which were so irksome to
their longings for a freer interchange of feeling
and thought. Adelheid possessed too much
intellectual
tact to have recourse to the every-day
language of consolation. When she did speak,
which, as became her superior rank and less
embarrassed
situation, she was the first to do, it was
in general but friendly allusions.
Thou wilt go with us to Italy, in the morning,
she said, drying her eyes; my father quits Blonay,
in company with the Signor Grimaldi, with
to-morrow's
sun, and thou wilt be of our company?
Where thou wiltanywhere with thee
anywhere
to hide my shame!
The blood mounted to the temples of Adelheid,
her air even appeared imposing to the eyes of
the artless and unpractised Christine, as she
answered
Shame is a word that applies to the mean and
mercenary, to the vile and unfaithful, she said,
with womanly and virtuous indignation; but not
to thee, love.
O! do not, do not condemn him; whispered
Christine, covering her face with her hands. He
has found himself unequal to bearing the burthen
of our degradation, and he should be spoken of in
pity rather than with hatred.
Adelheid was silent; but she regarded the poor
trembling girl, whose head now nestled in her
bosom, with melancholy concern.
Didst thou know him well? she asked in a
low tone, following rather the chain of her own
thoughts, than reflecting on the nature of the
question
she put. I had hoped that this refusal would
bring no other pain than the unavoidable
mortification
which I fear belongs to the weakness of
our sex and our habits.
Thou knowest not how dear preference is to
the despised!how cherished the thought of being
loved becomes to those, who, out of their own
narrow
limits of natural friends, have been accustomed
to meet only with contempt and aversion! Thou
hast always been known, and courted, and happy!
Thou canst not know how dear it is to the despised
to seem even to be preferred!
Nay, say not this, I pray thee! answered
Adelheid, hurriedly, and with a throb of anguish
at her heart; there is little in this life that speaks
fairly for itself. We are not always what we
seem; and if we were, and far more miserable
than anything but vice can make us, there is
another
state of being, in which justicepure,
unalloyed
justicewill be done.
I will go with thee to Italy, answered
Christine
,
looking calm and resolved, while a glow of
holy hope bloomed on each cheek; when all is
over, we will go together to a happier world!
Adelheid folded the stricken and sensitive plant
to her bosom. Again they wept together, but it
was with a milder and sweeter sorrow than
before
.
CHAPTER V.
I'll show thee the best springs; I'll pluck thee berries.
Tempest
.
The
day dawned clear and cloudless on the
Leman, the morning that succeeded the Abbaye
des Vignerons. Hundreds among the frugal and
time-saving Swiss had left the town before the
appearance of the light, and many strangers were
crowding into the barks, as the sun came bright
and cheerfully over the rounded and smiling summits
of the neighboring ctes. At this early hour, all in
and around the rock-seated castle of Blonay were
astir, and in motion. Menials were running, with
hurried air, from room to room, from court to terrace,
and from lawn to tower. The peasants in the
adjoining
fields rested on their utensils of husbandry, in
gaping, admiring attention to the preparations of
their superiors. For though we are not writing of a
strictly feudal age, the events it is our business to
record
took place long before the occurrence of those
great political events, which have since so
materially
changed the social state of Europe.
Switzerland
was then a sealed country to most of those
who dwelt even in the adjoining nations, and the
present advanced condition of roads and inns was
quite unknown, not only to these mountaineers, but
throughout the rest of what was then much more
properly called the exclusively civilized portion of
the globe, than it is to-day. Even horses were
not often used in the passage of the Alps, but
recourse
was had to the surer-footed mule by the
traveller, and, not unfrequently, by the more
practised
carrier and smuggler of those rude paths.
Roads existed, it is true, as in other parts of
Europe
,
in the countries of the plain, if any portion
of the great undulating surface of that region
deserve
the name; but once within the mountains,
with the exception of very inartificial wheel-tracks
in the straitened and glen-like valleys, the hoof
alone was to be trusted or indeed used.
The long train of travellers, then, that left the
gates of Blonay just as the fog began to stir on the
wide alluvial meadows of the Rhone, were all in
the saddle. A courier, accompanied by a
sumpter-mule
,
had departed over-night to prepare the
way for those who were to follow, and active
Vol. II. G
young mountaineers had succeeded, from time to
time, charged with different orders, issued in
behalf
of their comforts.
As the cavalcade passed beneath the arch of the
great gate, the lively, spirit-stirring horn sounded
a fare well air, to which custom had attached the
signification of good wishes. It took the way
towards
the level of the Leman by means of a
winding
and picturesque bridle-path that led, among
alpine meadows, groves, rocks, and hamlets, fairly
to the water-side. Roger de Blonay and his two
principal guests rode in front, the former seated
on a war-horse that he had ridden years before as
a soldier, and the two latter well mounted on beasts
prepared for, and accustomed to, the mountains.
Adelheid and Christine came next, riding by
themselves
,
in the modest reserve of their maiden
condition
.
Their discourse was low, confidential, and
renewed at intervals. A few menials followed,
and then came Sigismund at the side of the Signor
Grimald's friend, and one of the family of Blonay,
the latter of whom was destined to return with
the baron, after doing honor to their guests by
seeing them as far as Villeneuve. The rear was
brought up by muleteers, domestics, and those who
led the beasts that bore the baggage. All of the
former who intended to cross the Alps carried the
fire-arms of the period at their saddle-bows, and
each had his rapier, his
couteau de chasse
, or his
weapon of more military fashion, so disposed
about his person as to denote it was considered an
arm for whose use some occasion might possibly
occur.
As the departure from Blonay was
unaccompanied
by any of those leave-takings which usually
impress a touch of melancholy on the traveller,
most of the cavalcade, as they issued into the pure
and exhilarating air of the morning, were
sufficiently
disposed to enjoy the loveliness of the
landscape
,
and to indulge in the cheerfulness and
delight
that a scene so glorious is apt to awaken, in
all who are alive to the beauties of nature.
Adelheid gladly pointed out to her companion the
various objects of the view, as a means of
recalling
the thoughts of Christine from her own
particular
griefs, which were heightened by regret
for the loss of her mother, from whom she was
now seriously separated for the first time in her
life, since their communications, though secret,
had been constant during the years she had dwelt
under another roof. The latter gratefully lent
herself
to the kind intentions of her new friend, and
endeavored to be pleased with all she beheld,
though it was such pleasure as the sad and
mourning
admit with a jealous reservation of their own
secret causes of woe.
Yonder tower, towards which we advance, is
Chtelard, said the heiress of Willading to the
daughter of Balthazar, in the pursuit of her kind
intention; a hold, nearly as ancient and
honorable
as this we have just quitted, though not so
constantly
the dwelling of the same family; for these
of Blonay have been a thousand years dwellers
on the same rock, always favorably known for
their faith and courage.
Surely, if there is anything in life that can
compensate for its every-day evils, observed
Christine
,
in a manner of mild regret and perhaps with
the perversity of grief, it must be to have come
from those who have always been known and
honored
among the great and happy! Even virtue,
and goodness, and great deeds, scarce give a
respect
like that we feel for the Sire de Blonay, whose
family has been seated, as thou hast just said, a
thousand years on that rock above us!
Adelheid was mute. She appreciated the
feeling
which had so naturally led her companion to
a reflection like this, and she felt the difficulty of
applying balm to a wound as deep as that which
had been inflicted on her companion.
We are not always to suppose those the most
happy that the world most honors, she at length
answered; the respect to which we are
accustomed
comes in time to be necessary, without
being
a source of pleasure; and the hazard of
incurring
its loss is more than equal to the
satisfaction
of its possession.
Thou wilt at least admit that to be despised
and shunned is a curse to which nothing can
reconcile
us.
We will speak now of other things, dear. It
may be long ere either of us again sees this grand
display of rock and water, of brown mountain and
shining glacier; we will not prove ourselves
ungrateful
for the happiness we have, by repining for
that which is impossible.
Christine quietly yielded to the kind intention of
her new friend, and they rode on in silence,
picking
their way along the winding path, until the
whole party, after a long but pleasant descent,
reached the road, which is nearly washed by the
waters of the lake. There has already been
allusion
,
in the earlier pages of our work, to the
extraordinary
beauties of the route near this
extremity
of the Leman. After climbing to the height
of the mild and healthful Montreux, the cavalcade
again descended, under a canopy of nut-trees, to
the gate of Chillon, and, sweeping around the
margin of the sheet, it reached Villeneuve by the
hour that had been named for an early morning
repast. Here all dismounted, and refreshed
themselves
awhile, when Roger de Blonay and his
attendants
,
after many exchanges of warm and
sincere
good wishes, took their final leave.
The sun was scarcely yet visible in the deep
glens, when those who were destined for St.
Bernard
were again in the saddle. The road now
necessarily left the lake, traversing those broad
alluvial bottoms which have been deposited during
thirty centuries by the washings of the Rhone,
aided, if faith is to be given to geological
symptoms
and to ancient traditions, by certain violent
convulsions of nature. For several hours our
travellers rode amid such a deep fertility, and
such a luxuriance of vegetation, that their path
bore more analogy to an excursion on the wide
plains of Lombardy, than to one amid the usual
Swiss scenery; although, unlike the boundless
expanse
of the Italian garden, the view was limited
on each side by perpendicular barriers of rock,
that were piled for thousands of feet into the
heavens
,
and which were merely separated from each
other by a league or two, a distance that dwindled
to miles in its effect on the eye, a consequence of
the grandeur of the scale on which nature has
reared these vast piles.
It was high-noon when Melchior de Willading
and his venerable friend led the way across the
foaming Rhone, at the celebrated bridge of St.
Maurice. Here the country of the Valais, then,
like Geneva, an ally, and not a confederate of the
Swiss cantons, was entered, and all objects, both
animate and inanimate, began to assume that
mixture
of the grand, the sterile, the luxuriant, and
the revolting, for which this region is so generally
known. Adelheid gave an involuntary shudder,
her imagination having been prepared by rumor
for even more than the truth would have given
reason to expect, when the gate of St. Maurice
swung back upon its hinges, literally inclosing the
party in this wild, desolate, and yet romantic
region
.
As they proceeded along the Rhone,
however
,
G 2
she and those of her companions to whom
the scene was new, were constantly wondering
at some unlooked-for discrepancy, that drove them
from admiration to disgustfrom the exclamations
of delight to the chill of disappointment. The
mountains on every side were dreary, and without
the rich relief of the pastured eminences, but most
of the valley was rich and generous. In one spot
a sac d'eau, one of those reservoirs of water which
form among the glaciers on the summits of the
rocks, had broken, and, descending like a
waterspout
,
it had swept before it every vestige of
cultivation
,
covering wide breadths of the meadows
with a dbris that resembled chaos. A
frightful
barrenness, and the most smiling fertility, were
in absolute contact: patches of green, that had
been accidentally favored by some lucky
formation
of the ground, sometimes appearing like oases
of the desert, in the very centre of a sterility that
would put the labor and the art of man at defiance
for a century. In the midst of this terrific
picture
of want sat a crtin, with his semi-human
attributes
,
the lolling tongue, the blunted faculties,
and the degraded appetites, to complete the
desolation
.
Issuing from this belt of annihilated
vegetation
,
the scene became again as pleasant as the
fancy could desire, or the eye crave. Fountains
leaped from rock to rock in the sun's rays; the
valley was green and gentle; the mountains began
to show varied and pleasing forms; and happy
smiling faces appeared, whose freshness and
regularity
were perhaps of a cast superior to that of
most of the Swiss. In short, the Valais was then,
as now, a country of opposite extremes, but in
which, perhaps, there is a predominance of the
repulsive and inhospitable.
It was fairly nightfall, notwithstanding the trifling
distance they had journeyed, when the travellers
reached Martigny, where dispositions had
previously
been made for their reception during the hours
of sleep. Here preparations were made to seek
their rest at an early hour, in order to be in
readiness
for the fatiguing toil of the following day.
Martigny is situated at the point where the great
valley of the Rhone changes its direction from a
north and south to an east and west course, and it
is the spot whence three of the celebrated
mountain
paths diverge, to make as many passages of
the upper Alps. Here are the two routes of the
great and little St. Bernard, both of which lead
into Italy, and that of the Col-de-Balme, which
crosses a spur of the Alps into Savoy toward the
celebrated valley of Chamouni. It was the
intention
of the Baron de Willading and his friend to
journey by the former of these roads, as has so
often been mentioned in these pages, their
destination
being the capital of Piedmont. The passage
of the great St. Bernard, though so long known by
its ancient and hospitable convent, the most
elevated
habitation in Europe, and in these later times
so famous for the passage of a conquering army,
is but a secondary alpine pass, considered in
reference
to the grandeur of its scenery. The ascent,
so inartificial even to this hour, is long and
comparatively
without danger, and in general it is
sufficiently
direct, there being no very precipitous
rise like those of the Gemmi, the Grimsel, and
various other passes in Switzerland and Italy,
except
at the very neck, or col, of the mountain,
where the rock is to be literally climbed on the
rude and broad steps that so frequently occur
among the paths of the Alps and the Apennines.
The fatigue of this passage comes, therefore,
rather from its length, and the necessity of
unremitted
diligence, than from any excessive labor
demanded by the ascent; and the reputation
acquired by the great captain of our age, in
leading
an army across its summit, has been obtained
more by the military combinations of which it
formed the principal feature, the boldness of the
conception, and the secrecy and promptitude with
which so extensive an operation was effected, than
by the physical difficulties that were overcome.
In the latter particular, the passage of St. Bernard,
as this celebrated coup-de-main is usually called,
has frequently been outdone in our own wilds; for
armies have often traversed regions of broad
streams, broken mountains, and uninterrupted
forests, for weeks at a time, in which the mere
bodily labor of any given number of days would
be found to be greater than that endured on this
occasion by the followers of Napoleon. The
estimate
we attach to every exploit is so dependent on
the magnitude of its results, that men rarely come
to a perfectly impartial judgment on its merits;
the victory or defeat, however simple or bloodless,
that shall shake or assure the interests of civilized
society, being always esteemed by the world an
event of greater importance, than the happiest
combinations of thought and valor that affect only
the welfare of some remote and unknown people.
By the just consideration of this truth, we come
to understand the value of a nation's possessing
confidence in itself, extensive power, and a unity
commensurate to its means; since small and
divided
states waste their strength in acts too
insignificant
for general interest, frittering away their
mental riches, no less than their treasure and
blood, in supporting interests that fail to enlist the
sympathies of any beyond the pale of their own
borders. The nation which, by the adverse
circumstances
of numerical inferiority, poverty of
means, failure of enterprise, or want of opinion,
cannot sustain its own citizens in the acquisition
of a just renown, is deficient in one of the first and
most indispensable elements of greatness; glory,
like riches, feeding itself, and being most apt to be
found where its fruits have already accumulated.
We see, in this fact, among other conclusions, the
importance of an acquisition of such habits of
manliness of thought, as will enable us to decide
on the merits and demerits of what is done among
ourselves, and of shaking off that dependence on
others which it is too much the custom of some
among us to dignify with the pretending title of
deference to knowledge and taste, but which, in
truth, possesses some such share of true modesty
and diffidence, as the footman is apt to exhibit
when exulting in the renown of his master.
This little digression has induced us momentarily
to overlook the incidents of the tale. Few who
possess the means, venture into the stormy regions
of the upper Alps, at the late season in which the
present party reached the hamlet of Martigny,
without seeking the care of one or more suitable
guides. The services of these men are useful in a
variety of ways, but in none more than in offering
the advice which long familiarity with the signs
of the heavens, the temperature of the air, and the
direction of the winds, enables them to give. The
Baron de Willading, and his friend, immediately
dispatched a messenger for a mountaineer, of the
name of Pierre Dumont, who enjoyed a fair name
for fidelity, and who was believed to be better
acquainted
with all the difficulties of the ascent and
descent, than any other who journeyed among the
glens of that part of the Alps. At the present day,
when hundreds ascend to the convent from
curiosity
alone, every peasant of sufficient strength and
intelligence becomes a guide, and the little
community
of the lower Valais finds the transit of the
idle and rich such a fruitful source of revenue,
that it has been induced to regulate the whole by
very useful and just ordinances; but at the period
of the tale, this Pierre was the only individual,
who, by fortunate concurrences, had obtained a
name among affluent foreigners, and who was at
all in demand with that class of travellers. He
was not long in presenting himself in the public
room of the inna hale, florid, muscular man of
sixty, with every appearance of permanent health
and vigor, but with a slight and nearly
imperceptible
difficulty of breathing.
Thou art Pierre Dumont? observed the
baron
,
studying the open physiognomy and well-set
frame of the Valaisan, with satisfaction. Thou
hast been mentioned by more than one traveller in
his book.
The stout mountaineer raised himself in pride.
and endeavored to acknowledge the compliment in
the manner of his well-meant but rude courtesy;
for refinement did not then extend its finesse and
its deceit among the glens of Switzerland.
They have done me honor, Monsieur, he said:
it has been my good fortune to cross the Col with
many brave gentlemen and fair ladiesand in two
instances with princes. (Though a sturdy
republican
,
Pierre was not insensible to worldly
rank.) The pious monks know me well; and
they who enter the convent are not the worse
received
for being my companions. I shall be glad
to lead so fair a party from our cold valley into
the sunny glens of Italy, for, if the truth must be
spoken, nature has placed us on the wrong side of
the mountain for our comfort, though we have our
advantage over those who live even in Turin and
Milan, in matters of greater importance.
What can be the superiority of a Valaisan,
over the Lombard, or the Piedmontese?
demanded
the Signor Grimaldi quickly, like a man who
was curious to hear the reply. A traveller
should seek all kind of knowledge, and I take this
to be a newly-discovered fact.
Liberty, Signore! We are our own masters;
we have been so since the day when our fathers
sacked the castles of the barons, and compelled
their tyrants to become their equals. I think of
this each time I reach the warm plains of Italy,
and return to my cottage a more contented man,
for the reflection.
Spoken like a Swiss, though it is uttered by
an ally of the cantons! cried Melchior de
Willading
,
heartily. This is the spirit, Gaetano, which
sustains our mountaineers, and renders them more
happy amid their frosts and rocks, than thy
Genoese
on his warm and glowing bay.
The word liberty, Melchior, is more used than
understood, and as much abused as used;
returned
the Signor Grimaldi gravely. A country
on which God hath laid his finger in displeasure as
on this, needs have some such consolation as the
phantom with which the honest Pierre appears to
be so well satisfied.But, Signor guide, have many
travellers tried the passage of late, and what dost
thou think of our prospects in making the attempt?
We hear gloomy tales, sometimes, of thy alpine
paths in that Italy thou hold'st so cheap.
Your pardon, noble Signore, if the frankness
of a mountaineer has carried me too far. I do not
undervalue your Piedmont, because I love our
Valais more. A country may be excellent, even
though another should be better. As for the
travellers
,
none of note have gone up the Col of late,
though there have been the usual number of
vagabonds
and adventurers. The savor of the
convent
kitchen will reach the noses of these knaves
here in the valley, though we have a long twelve
leagues to journey in getting from one to the
other.
The Signor Grimaldi waited until Adelheid and
Christine, who were preparing to retire for the
night, were out of hearing, and he resumed his
questions.
Thou hast not spoken of the weather?
We are in one of the most uncertain and
treacherous months of the good season, Messieurs.
The winter is gathering among the upper Alps, and
in a month in which the frosts are flying about like
uneasy birds that do not know where to alight, one
can hardly say whether he hath need of his cloak
or not.
San Francesco! Dost think I am dallying
with thee, friend, about a thickness more or less of
cloth! I am hinting at avalanches and falling
rocksat whirlwinds and tempests!
Pierre laughed and shook his head, though he
answered vaguely as became his business.
These are Italian opinions of our hills,
Signore
,
he said; they savor of the imagination.
Our pass is not as often troubled with the avalanche
as some that are known, even in the melting snows.
Had you looked at the peaks from the lake, you
would have seen that, the hoary glaciers excepted,
they are still all brown and naked. The snow
must fall from the heavens before it can fall in the
avalanche, and we are yet, I think, a few days
from the true winter.
Thy calculations are made with nicety, friend,
returned the Genoese, not sorry, however, to hear
the guide speak with so much apparent confidence
of the weather, and we are obliged to thee in
proportion. What of the travellers thou hast
named? Are there brigands on our path?
Such rogues have been known to infest the
place, but, in general, there is too little to be
gained
for the risk. Your rich traveller is not an
everyday
sight among our rocks; and you well know,
Signore, that there may be too few, as well as too
many, on a path, for your freebooter.
The Italian was distrustful by habit on all such
subjects, and he threw a quick suspicious glance
at the guide. But the frank open countenance
of Pierre removed all doubt of his honesty, to
say nothing of the effect of a well-established
reputation.
But thou hast spoken of certain vagabonds
who have preceded us?
In that particular, matters might be better;
answered the plain-minded mountaineer, dropping
his head in an attitude of meditation so naturally
expressed as to give additional weight to his
words. Many of bad appearance have
certainly
gone up to-day; such as a Neapolitan named
Pippo, who is anything but a sainta certain
pilgrim
,
who will be nearer heaven at the convent
than he will be at the deathSt. Pierre pray for
me if I do the man injustice!and one or two
more of the same brood. There is another that
hath gone up also, post haste, and with good
reason
as they say, for he hath made himself the but
of all the jokers in Vvey on account of some
foolery in the games of the Abbayea certain
Jacques Colis.
The name was repeated by several near the
speaker.
The same, Messieurs. It would seem that the
Sieur Colis would fain take a maiden to wife in
the public sports, and, when her birth came to be
be known, that his bride was no other than th
child of Balthazar, the common headsman of
Berne!
A general silence betrayed the embarrassment
of most of the listeners.
Vol. II. H
And that tale hath already reached this glen,
said Sigismund, in a tone so deep and firm as to
cause Pierre to start, while the two old nobles
looked in another direction, feigning not to observe
what was passing.
Rumor hath a nimbler foot than a mule,
young officer; answered the honest guide. The
tale, as you call it, will have travelled across the
mountains sooner than they who bore itthough
I never knew how such a miracle could passbut
so it is; report goes faster than the tongue that
spreads it, and if there be a little untruth to help it
along, the wind itself is scarcely swifter. Honest
Jacques Colis has bethought him to get the start of
his story, but, my life on it, though he is active
enough in getting away from his mockers, that he
finds it, with all the additions, safely housed at the
inn at Turin when he reaches that city himself.
These, then, are all? interrupted the Signor
Grimaldi, who saw, by the heaving bosom of
Sigismund
,
that it was time in mercy to interpose.
Not so, Signorethere is still another and one
I like less than any. A countryman of your own,
who, impudently enough, calls himself Il
Maledetto
.
Maso!
The very same.
Honest, courageous Maso, and his noble dog!
Signore, you describe the man so well in some
things, that I wonder you know so little of him in
others. Maso hath not his equal on the road for
activity and courage, and the beast is second only
to our mastiffs of the convent for the same
qualities
;
but when you speak of the master's honesty,
you speak of that for which the world gives him
little credit, and do great disparagement to the
brute, which is much the best of the two, in this
respect.
This may be true enough, rejoined the
Signore
Grimaldi, turning anxiously towards his
companions
:man
is a strange compound of good
and evil; his acts when left to natural impulses are
so different from what they become on calculation
that one can scarcely answer for a man of
Maso's temperament. We know him to be a most
efficient friend, and such a man would be apt to
make a very dangerous enemy! His qualities
were not given to him by halves. And yet we
have a strong circumstance in our favor; for he
who hath once done the least service to a
fellow-creature
feels a sort of paternity in him he hath
saved, and would be little likely to rob himself of
the pleasure of knowing, that there are some of
his kind who owe him a grateful recollection.
This remark was answered by Melchior de
Willading
in the same spirit, and the guide, perceiving
he was no longer wanted, withdrew.
Soon after, the travellers retired to rest.
CHAPTER VI.
As yet the trembling year is unconfirm'd,
And winter oft, at eve, resumes the breeze,
Chills the pale morn, and bids his driving sleets
Deform the day delightful:
Thomson
.
The
horn of Pierre Dumont was blowing
beneath
the windows of the inn of Martigny, with the
peep of dawn. Then followed the appearance of
drowsy domestics, the saddling of unwilling mules,
and the loading of baggage. A few minutes later,
the little caravan was assembled, for the
cavalcade
almost deserved this name, and the whole
were in motion for the summits of the Alps.
The travellers now left the valley of the Rhone
to bury themselves amid those piles of misty and
confused mountains, which formed the back-ground
of the picture they had studied from the castle of
Blonay and the sheet of the Leman. They soon
plunged into a glen, and, following the windings
of a brawling torrent, were led gradually, and by
many turnings, into a country of bleak upland
pasturage
,
where the inhabitants gained a scanty
livelihood
,
principally by means of their dairies.
A few leagues above Martigny, the paths again
separated, one inclining to the left towards the
elevated valley that has since become so
celebrated
in the legends of this wild region, by the
formation
of a little lake in its glacier, which,
becoming
too heavy for its foundation, broke through
its barrier of ice, and descended in a mountain of
water to the Rhone, a distance of many leagues,
sweeping before it every vestige of civilization
that crossed its course, and even changing, in
many places, the face of nature itself. Here the
glittering peak of Vlan became visible, and, though
so much nearer to the eye than when viewed from
Vvey, it was still a distant shining pile, grand in
its solitude and mystery, on which the sight loved
to dwell, as it studies the pure and spotless edges
of some sleepy cloud.
It has already been said, that the ascent of the
great St. Bernard, with the exception of occasional
hills and hollows, is nowhere very precipitous but
at the point at which the last rampart of rock is
to be overcome. On the contrary, the path, for
leagues at a time, passes along tolerably even
valleys
,
though of necessity the general direction is
upward, and for most of the distance through a
country that admits of cultivation, though the
meagreness
of the soil, and the shortness of the
seasons
,
render but an indifferent return to the toil of
the husbandman. In this respect it differs from
most of the other Alpine passes; but if it wants
the variety, wildness, and sublimity of the Splugen,
the St. Gothard, the Gemmi, and the Simplon, it is
still an ascent on a magnificent scale, and he who
journeys on its path is raised, as it were, by
insensible
degrees, to an elevation that gradually
changes all his customary associations with the
things of the lower world.
From the moment of quitting the inn to that of
the first halt, Melchior de Willading and the
Signor
Grimaldi rode in company, as on the previous
day. These old friends had much to communicate
in confidential discourse which the presence of
Roger de Blonay, and the importunities of the
bailiff, had hitherto prevented them from freely
saying. Both had thought maturely, too, on the
situation of Adelheid, of her hopes, and of her
future fortunes, and both had reasoned much as
two old nobles of that day, who were not without
strong sympathies for their kind, while they were
too practised to overlook the world and its ties,
would be likely to reason on an affair of this
delicate
nature.
There came a feeling of regret, perhaps I
might fairly call it by its proper name, of envy,
observed the Genoese, in the pursuance of the
subject
which engrossed most of their time and
thoughts, as they rode slowly along, the bridles
dangling from the necks of their mules,there
came a feeling of regret, when I first saw the fair
creature that calls thee father, Melchior. God has
dealt mercifully by me, in respect to many things
that make men happy; but he rendered my
marriage
accursed, not only in its bud, but in its fruit.
Thy child is dutiful and loving, all that a father
H 2
can wish; and yet here is this unusual attachment
come to embarrass, if not to defeat, thy fair and
just hopes for her welfare! This is no common
affair, that a few threats of bolts and a change
of scene will cure, but a rooted affection that is
but too firmly based on esteem.By San
Francesco
,
but I think, at times, thou wouldst do well to
permit the ceremony!
Should it be our fortune to meet with the
absconding
Jacques Colis at Turin, he might give
us different counsel, answered the old baron drily.
That is a dreadful barrier to our wishes! Were
the boy anything but a headsman's child! I do
not think thou couldst object, Melchior, had he
merely come of a hind, or of some common
follower
of thy family?
It were far better that he should have come
of one like ourselves, Gaetano. I reason but little
on the dogmas of this or that sect in politics; but
I feel and think, in this affair, as the parent of an
only child. All those usages and opinions in which
we are trained, my friend, are so many ingredients
in our happiness, let them be silly or wise, just or
oppressive; and though I would fain do that which
is right to the rest of mankind, I could wish to
begin to practise innovation with any other than
my own daughter. Let them who like philosophy
and justice, and natural rights, so well, commence
by setting us the example.
Thou hast hit the stumbling-block that causes
a thousand well-digested plans for the improvement
of the world to fail, honest Melchior. Could we
toil with others' limbs, sacrifice with others' groans,
and pay with others' means, there would be no end
to our industry, our disinterestedness, or our
liberality
and
yet it were a thousand pities that so
sweet a girl and so noble a youth should not yoke!
'Twould be a yoke indeed, for a daughter of
the house of Willading; returned the graver
father, with emphasis. I have looked at this
matter in every face that becomes me, Gaetano,
and though I would not rudely repulse one that
hath saved my life, by driving him from my
company
,
at a moment when even strangers consort
for mutual aid and protection, at Turin we must
part for ever!
I know not how to approve, nor yet how to
blame thee, poor Melchior! 'Twas a sad scene,
that of the refusal to wed Balthazar's daughter, in
the presence of so many thousands!
I take it as a happy and kind warning of the
precipice to which a foolish tenderness was leading
us both, my friend.
Thou may'st have reason; and yet I wish thou
wert more in error than ever Christian was! These
are rugged mountains, Melchior, and, fairly passed,
it might be so arranged that the boy should forget
Switzerland for ever. He might become a
Genoese
,
in which event, dost thou not see the means
of overcoming some of the present difficulty?
Is the heiress of my house a vagrant, Signor
Grimaldi, to forget her country and birth?
I am childless, in effect, if not in fact; and
where there are the will and the means, the end
should not be wanting. We will speak of this
under the warmer sun of Italy, which they say is
apt to render hearts tender.
The hearts of the young and amorous, good
Gaetano, but, unless much changed of late, it is as
apt to harden those of the old, as any sun I know
of; returned the baron, shaking his head, though
it much exceeded his power to smile at his own
pleasantry when speaking on this painful subject.
Thou knowest that in this matter I act only for
the welfare of Adelheid, without thought of myself;
and it would little comport with the honor of a
baron of an ancient house, to be the grandfather
of children who come of a race of executioners.
The Signor Grimaldi succeeded better than his
friend in raising a smile, for, more accustomed to
dive into the depths of human feeling, he was not
slow in detecting the mixture of motives that were
silently exercising their long-established influence
over the heart of his really well-intentioned
companion
.
So long as thou speakest of the wisdom of
respecting men's opinions, and the danger of
wrecking thy daughter's happiness by running
counter to their current, I agree with thee to the
letter; but, to me, it seems possible so to place the
affair, that the world shall imagine all is in rule.
and, by consequence, all proper. If we can
overcome
ourselves, Melchior, I apprehend no great
difficulty in blinding others.
The head of the Bernois dropped upon his
breast, and he rode a long distance in that attitude,
reflecting on the course it most became him to
pursue, and struggling with the conflicting
sentiments
which troubled his upright but prejudiced
mind. As his friend understood the nature of this
inward strife, he ceased to speak, and a long silence
succeeded the discourse.
It was different with those who followed. Though
long accustomed to gaze at their native mountains
from a distance, this was the first occasion on which
Adelheid and her companion had ever actually
penetrated into their glens, or journeyed on their
broken and changing faces. The path of St.
Bernard, therefore, had all the charm of novelty,
and their youthful and ardent minds were soon
won from meditating on their own causes of
unhappiness
,
to admiration of the sublime works of
nature. The cultivated taste of Adelheid, in
particular
,
was quick in detecting those beauties of a
more subtle kind which the less instructed are apt
to overlook, and she found additional pleasure in
pointing them out to the ingenuous and wondering
Christine, who received these, her first, lessons in
that grand communion with nature which is
pregnant
with so much unalloyed delight, with gratitude,
and a readiness of comprehension, that amply
repaid
her instructress. Sigismund was an attentive
and pleased listener to what was passing, though
one who had so often passed the mountains, and
who had seen them familiarly on their warmer and
more sunny side, had little to learn, himself, even
from so skilful and alluring a teacher.
As they ascended, the air became purer and less
impregnated with the humidity of its lower
currents
;
changing, by a process as fine as that
wrought by a chemical application, the hues and
aspect of every object in the view. A vast
hill-side
lay basking in the sun, which illuminated on
its rounded swells a hundred long stripes of grain in
every stage of verdure, resembling so much delicate
velvet that was thrown in a variety of accidental
faces to the light, while the shadows ran away, to
speak technically, from this
foyer de lumire
of the
picture, in gradations of dusky russet and brown,
until the
colonne de vigueur
was obtained in the deep
black cast from the overhanging branches of a wood
of larch in the depths of some ravine, into which the
sight with difficulty penetrated. These were the
beauties on which Adelheid most loved to dwell, for
they are always the charms that soonest strike the
true admirer of nature, when he finds himself raised
above the lower and less purified strata of the
atmosphere, into the regions of more radiant light
and brightness. It is thus that the physical, no less
than the moral, vision becomes elevated above the
impurities that cling to this nether world, attaining
a portion of that spotless and sublime perception,
as we ascend, by which we are nearly assimilated
to the truths of creation; a poetical type of the
greater and purer enjoyment we feel, as morally
receding from earth we draw nearer to heaven.
The party rested for several hours, as usual, at
the little mountain hamlet of Liddes. At the
present
time, it is not uncommon for the traveller,
favored
by a wheel-track along this portion of the
route, to ascend the mountain and to return to
Martigny in the same day. The descent in
particular
,
after reaching the village just named, is
soon made; but at the period of our tale, such an
exploit, if ever made, was of very rare occurrence.
The fatigue of being in the saddle so many hours
compelled our party to remain at the inn much
longer than is now practised, and their utmost
hope was to be able to reach the convent before
the last rays of the sun had ceased to light the
glittering
peak of Vlan.
There occurred here, too, some unexpected
detention
on the part of Christine, who had retired
with Sigismund soon after reaching the inn, and
who did not rejoin the party until the impatience
of the guide had more than once manifested itself
in such complaints as one in his situation is apt to
hazard. Adelheid saw with pain, when her friend
did at length rejoin them, that she had been
weeping
bitterly; but, too delicate to press her for an
explanation on a subject in which it was evident
the brother and sister did not desire to bestow
their confidence, she communicated her readiness
to depart to the domestics, without the slightest
allusion to the change in Christine's appearance,
or to the unexpected delay of which she had been
the cause.
Pierre muttered an ave in thankfulness that the
long halt was ended. He then crossed himself with
one hand, while with the other he flourished his
whip, among a crowd of gaping urchins and
slavering
crtins, to clear the way for those he guided.
His followers were, in the main of a different
mood. If the traveller too often reaches the inn
hungry and disposed to find fault, he usually quits
it good-humored and happy. The restoration, as
it is well called in France, effected by means of
the larder and the resting of wearied limbs, is
usually communicated to the spirits; and it must
be a crusty humor indeed, or singularly bad fare,
that prevents a return to a placid state of mind.
The party, under the direction of Pierre, formed
no exception to the general rule. The two old
nobles had so far forgotten the subject of their
morning dialogue, as to be facetious; and, ere long,
even their gentle companions were disposed to
laugh at some of their sallies, in spite of the load
of care that weighed so constantly and so heavily
on both. In short, such is the waywardness of
our feelings, and so difficult is it to be always
sorrowful
as well as always happy, that the
well-satisfied
landlady, who had, in truth, received the full
value of a very indifferent fare, was ready to
affirm, as she curtsied her thanks on the dirty
threshold, that a merrier party had never left her
door.
We shall take our revenge out of the casks of
the good Augustines to-night for the sour liquor of
this inn; is it not so, honest Pierre? demanded
the Signor Grimaldi, adjusting himself in the
saddle
,
as they got clear of the stones, sinuosities,
projecting
roofs, and filth of the village, into the more
agreeable windings of the ordinary path, again.
Our friend, the clavier, is apprized of the visit,
and as we have already gone through fair and foul
in company, I look to his fellowship for some
compensation
for the frugal meal of which we have
just partaken.
Father Xavier is a hospitable and a
happy-minded
priest, Signore; and that the saints will
long leave him keeper of the convent-keys, is the
prayer of every muleteer, guide, or pilgrim, who
crosses the col. I wish we were going up the
rough steps, by which we are to climb the last
rock of the mountain, at this very moment,
Messieurs
,
and that all the rest of the way were as
fairly done as this we have so happily passed.
Dost thou anticipate difficulty, friend?
demanded
the Italian, leaning forward on his
saddle-bow
,
for his quick observation had caught the
examining
glance that the guide threw around at the
heavens.
Difficulty is a meaning not easily admitted by
a mountaineer, Signore; and I am one of the last
to think of it, or to feel its dread. Still, we are
near the end of the season, and these hills are high
and bleak, and those that follow are delicate
flowers
for a stormy heath. Toil is always sweeter
in the remembrance than in the expectation.I
mean no more, if I mean that.
Pierre stopped his march as he ceased speaking.
He stood on a little eminence of the path, whence,
by looking back, he commanded a view of the
opening among the mountains which indicates the
site of the valley of the Rhone. The look was
long and understanding; but, when it was ended,
he turned and resumed his march with the
business-like
air of one more disposed to act than to
speculate on the future. But for the few words
which had just escaped him, this natural
movement
would have attracted no attention; and, as
it was, it was observed by none but the Signor
Grimaldi, who would himself have attached little
importance to the whole, had the guide maintained
his usual pace.
As is common in the Alps, the conductor of
the travellers went on foot, leading the whole party
at such a gait as he thought most expedient for
man and beast. Hitherto, Pierre had proceeded
with sufficient leisure, rendering it necessary for
those who followed to observe the same
moderation
;
but he now walked sensibly faster, and
frequently
so fast as to make it necessary for the
mules to break into easy trots, in order to
maintain
their proper stations. All this, however, was
ascribed by most of the party to the formation of
the ground, for, after leaving Liddes, there is a long
reach of what, among the upper valleys of the
Alps, may by comparison be called a level road.
This industry, too, was thought to be doubly
necessary
,
in order to repair the time lost at the inn,
for the sun was already dipping towards the
western
boundary of their narrow view of the heavens,
and the temperature announced, if not a sudden
change in the weather, at least the near approach
of the periodical turn of the day.
We travel by a very ancient path; observed
the Signore Grimaldi, when his thoughts had
reverted
from their reflections on the movements of
the guide to the circumstance of their present
situation
.
A very reverend path, it might be
termed
in compliment to the worthy monks who do so
much to lessen its dangers, and to its great
antiquity
.
History speaks often of its use by different
leaders of armies, for it has long been a
thoroughfare
for those who journey between the north and
the south, whether it be in strife, or in amity. In
the time of Augustus it was the route commonly
used by the Roman legions in their passages to
and from Helvetia and Gaul; the followers of
Ccinna went by these gorges to their attack upon
Otho; and the Lombards made the same use of it, five
hundred years later. It was often trod by armed
bands, in the wars of Charles of Burgundy, those of
Vol. II. I
Milan, and in the conquests of Charlemagne. I
remember
a tale, in which it is said that a horde of
infidel
Corsairs from the Mediterranean penetrated by
this road, and seized upon the bridge of St. Maurice
with a view to plunder. As we are not the first,
so it is probable that we are not to be the last, who
have trusted themselves in these regions of the
upper air, bent on our objects, whether of love or
of strife.
Signore, observed Pierre respectfully, when
the Genoese ceased speaking, if your eccellenza
would make your discourse less learned, and more
in those familiar words which can be said under
a brisk movement, it might better suit the time and
the great necessity there is to be diligent.
Dost thou apprehend danger? Are we
behind
our time?Speak; for I dislike
concealment
.
Danger has a strong meaning in the mouth of
a mountaineer, Signore; for what is security on
this path, might be thought alarming lower down
in the valleys; I say it not. But the sun is
touching
the rocks, as you see, and we are drawing
near to places where a miss-step of a mule in the
dark might cost us dear. I would that all
diligently
improve the daylight, while they can.
The Genoese did not answer, but he urged his
mule again to a gait that was more in accordance
with the wishes of Pierre. The movement was
followed, as a matter of course, by the rest; and the
whole party was once more in a gentle trot, which
was scarcely sufficient, however, to keep even pace
with the long, impatient, and rapid strides of Pierre,
who, notwithstanding his years, appeared to get over
the ground with a facility that cost him no effort.
Hitherto, the heat had not been small, and, in that
pure atmosphere, all its powers were felt during
the time the sun's rays fell into the valley; but, the
instant they were intercepted by a brown and
envious
peak of the mountains, their genial influence
was succeeded by a chill that sufficiently proved
how necessary was the presence of the luminary
to the comfort of those who dwelt at that great
elevation. The females sought their mantles the
moment the bright light was followed by the usual
shadow; nor was it long before even the more
aged of the gentlemen were seen unstrapping their
cloaks, and taking the customary precautions
against the effects of the evening air.
The reader is not to suppose, however, that all
these little incidents of the way occurred in a time
as brief as that which has been consumed in the
narration. A long line of path was travelled over
before the Signor Grimaldi and his friend were
cloaked, and divers hamlets and cabins were
successively
passed. The alteration from the warmth of
day to the chill of evening also was accompanied
by a corresponding change in the appearance of
the objects they passed. St. Pierre, a cluster of
stone-roofed cottages, which bore all the
characteristics
of the inhospitable region for which they
had been constructed, was the last village; though
there was a hamlet, at the bridge of Hudri,
composed
of a few dreary abodes, which, by their
aspect, seemed the connecting link between the
dwellings of man and the caverns of beasts.
Vegetation
had long been growing more and more
meagre, and it was now fast melting away into still
deeper and irretrievable traces of sterility, like the
shadows of a picture passing through their several
transitions of color to the depth of the
background
.
The larches and cedars diminished
gradually
in size and numbers, until the straggling and
stinted tree became a bush, and the latter finally
disappeared in the shape of a tuft of pale green,
that adhered to some crevice in the rocks like so
much moss. Even the mountain grasses, for
which Switzerland is so justly celebrated, grew
thin and wiry; and by the time the travellers
reached the circular basin at the foot of the peak
of Vlan, which is called La Plaine de Prou, there
only remained, in the most genial season of the
year, and that in isolated spots between the rocks,
a sufficiency of nourishment for the support of a
small flock of adventurous, nibbling, and hungry
goats.
The basin just alluded to is an opening among
high pinnacles, and is nearly surrounded by naked
and ragged rocks. The path led through its
centre
,
always ascending on an inclined plane, and
disappeared through a narrow gorge around the
brow of a beetling cliff. Pierre pointed out the
latter as the pass by far the most dangerous on
this side the Col, in the season of the melting snows,
avalanches frequently rolling from its crags.
There was no cause for apprehending this
well-known
Alpine danger, however, in the present
moment; for, with the exception of Mont-Vlan,
all above and around them lay in the same dreary
dress of sterility. Indeed, it would not be easy for
the imagination to conceive a more eloquent
picture
of desolation than that which met the eyes of
the travellers, as, following the course of the run
of water that trickled through the middle of the
inhospitable valley, the certain indication of the
general direction of their course, they reached its
centre.
The time was getting to be that of early
twilight
,
but the sombre color of the rocks, streaked
and venerable by the ferruginous hue with which
time had coated their sides, and the depth of the
basin, gave to their situation a melancholy gloom
passing the duskiness of the hour. On the other
hand, the light rested bright and gloriously on the
snowy peak of Vlan, still many thousand feet
above them, though in plain, and apparently, in
near view; while rich touches of the setting sun
were gleaming on several of the brown, natural
battlements of the Alps, which, worn with eternal
exposure to the storms, still lay in sublime
confusion
at a most painful elevation in their front.
The azure vault that canopied all, had that look of
distant glory and of grand repose, which so often
meets the eye, and so forcibly strikes the mind, of
him who travels in the deep valleys and embedded
lakes of Switzerland. The glacier of Valsorey
descended from the upper region nearly to the
edge of the valley, bright and shining, its lower
margin streaked and dirty with the
dbris
of the
overhanging rocks, as if doomed to the fate of all
that came upon the earth, that of sharing its
impurities
.
There no longer existed any human habitation
between the point which the travellers had now
attained and the convent, though more modern
speculation, in this age of curiosity and
restlessness
,
has been induced to rear a substitute for an
inn in the spot just described, with the hope of
gleaning a scanty tribute from those who fail of
arriving in season to share the hospitality of the
monks. The chilliness of the air increased faster
even than the natural change of the hour would
seem to justify, and there were moments when the
dull sound of the wind descended to their ears,
though not a breath was stirring a withered and
nearly solitary blade of grass at their feet. Once
or twice, large black clouds drove across the
opening
above them, resembling heavy-winged vultures
sailing in the void, preparatory to a swoop upon
their prey.
I 2
CHAPTER VII.
Through this gap
On and say nothing, lest a word, a breath,
Bring down a winter's snow, enough to whelm
The armed files that, night and day, were seen
Winding from cliff to cliff in loose array,
To conquer at Marengo.
Italy
.
Pierre Dumont
halted in the middle of the
sterile
little plain, while he signed for those he
conducted
to continue their ascent. As each mule
passed, it received a blow or a kick from the
impatient
guide, who did not seem to think it necessary
to be very ceremonious with the poor beasts, and
had taken this simple method to give a general
and a brisker impulsion to the party. The
expedient
was so natural, and so much in accordance
with the practice of the muleteers and others of
their class, that it excited no suspicion in most of
the travellers, who pursued their way, either
meditating
on and enjoying the novel and profound
emotions that their present situation so naturally
awakened, or discoursing lightly, in the manner of
the thoughtless and unconcerned. The Signor
Grimaldi alone, whose watchfulness had already
been quickened by previous distrust, took heed of
the movement. When all had passed, the Genoese
turned in his saddle, and cast an apparently
careless
look behind. But the glance in truth was
anxious
and keen. Pierre stood looking steadily at
the heavens, one hand holding his hat, and the
other extended with an open palm. A glittering
particle descended to the latter, when the guide
instantly
resumed his place in advance. As he
passed
the Italian, however, meeting an inquiring look,
he permitted the other to see a snow-drop so
thoroughly
congealed, as to have not yet melted with
the natural heat of his skin. The eye of Pierre
appeared to impose discretion on his confidant, and
the silent communion escaped the observation of
the rest of the travellers. Just at this moment,
too, the attention of the others was luckily called
to a different object, by a cry from one of the
muleteers, of whom there were three as assistants
to the guide. He pointed out a party which, like
themselves, was holding the direction of the Col.
There was a solitary individual mounted on a
mule, and a single pedestrian, without any guide,
or other traveller, in their company. Their
movements
were swift, and they had not been more than
a minute in view, before they disappeared behind
an angle of the crags which nearly closed the
valley
on the side of the convent, and which was the
precise spot already mentioned as being so
dangerous
in the season of the melting snows.
Dost thou know the quality and object of the
travellers before us? demanded the Baron de
Willading of Pierre.
The latter mused. It was evident he did not
expect to meet with strangers in that particular
part of the passage.
We can know little of those who come from
the convent, though few would be apt to leave so
safe a roof at this late hour, he answered; but,
until I saw yonder travellers with my own eyes, I
could have sworn there were none on this side of
the Col going the same way as ourselves? It is
time that all the others were already arrived.
They are villagers of St. Pierre, going up with
supplies; observed one of the muleteers. None
bound to Italy have passed Liddes since the party
of Pippo, and they by this time should be well
housed at the hospice. Didst not see a dog among
them?'t was one of the Augustines' mastiffs.
'T was the dog I noted, and it was on account
of his appearance that I spoke; returned the
baron
.
The animal had the air of an old
acquaintance
,
Gaetano, for to me it seemed to resemble
our tried friend Nettuno; and he at whose heels it
kept so close wore much the air of our
acquaintance
of the Leman, the bold and ready Maso.
Who has gone unrequited for his eminent
services! answered the Genoese, thoughtfully.
The extraordinary refusal of that man to
receive
our money is quite as wonderful as any other
part of his unusual and inexplicable conduct. I
would he had been less obstinate or less proud, for
the unrequited obligation rests like a load upon
my spirits.
Thou art wrong. I employed our young friend
Sigismund secretly on this duty, while we were
receiving the greetings of Roger de Blonay and
the good bailiff, but thy countryman treated the
escape lightly, as the mariner is apt to consider
past danger, and he would listen to no offer of
protection
or gold. I was, therefore more displeased
than surprised by what thou hast well enough
termed obstinacy.
Tell your employers, he said, added
Sigismund
,
that they may thank the saints, Our Lady,
or brother Luther, as best suits their habits, but
that they had better forget that such a man as
Maso lives. His acquaintance can bring them
neither honor nor advantage. Tell this especially
to the Signor Grimaldi, when you are on your
journey to Italy, and we have parted for ever, as
on my suggestion. This was said to me, in the
interview I held with the brave fellow after his
liberation
from prison.
The answer was remarkable for a man of his
condition, and the especial message to myself of
singular exception. I observed that his eye was
often on me, with peculiar meaning, during the
passage of the lake, and to this hour I have not
been able to explain the motive!
Is the Signore of Genoa?asked the guide:
or is he, by chance, in any way connected with
her authorities?
Of that republic and city, and certainly of
some little interest with the authorities; answered
the Italian, a slight smile curling his lip, as he
glanced a look at his friend.
It is not necessary to look farther for Maso's
acquaintance with your features, returned Pierre,
laughing; for of all who live in Italy, there is
not a man who has more frequent occasions to
know the authorities; but we linger, in this gossip.
Urge the beasts upwards, Etienne  presto!
presto!
The muleteers answered this appeal by one of
their long cries, which has a resemblance to the
rattling that is the well-known signal of the
venomous
serpent of this country when he would
admonish
the traveller to move quickly, and which
certainly produces the same startling effect on the
nerves of the mule as the signal of the snake is
very apt to excite in man. This interruption
caused
the dialogue to be dropped, all riding onward,
musing in their several fashions on what had just
passed. In a few minutes the party turned the
crag in question, and, quitting the valley, or sterile
basin, in which they had been journeying for the
last half hour, they entered by a narrow gorge into
a scene that resembled a crude collection of the
materials of which the foundations of the world
had been originally formed. There was no longer
any vegetation at all, or, if here and there a blade
of grass had put forth under the shelter of some
stone, it was so meagre, and of so rare occurrence,
as to be unnoticed in that sublime scene of chaotic
confusion. Ferruginous, streaked, naked, and
cheerless rocks arose around them, and even that
snowy beacon, the glowing summit of Vlan, which
had so long lain bright and cheering on their path,
was now hid entirely from view. Pierre Dumont
soon after pointed out a place on the visible summit
of the mountain, where a gorge between the
neighboring
peaks admitted a view of the heavens
beyond. This he informed those he guided was
the Col, through whose opening the pile of the Alps
was to be finally surmounted. The light that still
tranquilly reigned in this part of the heavens was
in sublime contrast to the gathering gloom of the
passes below, and all hailed this first glimpse of
the end of their day's toil as a harbinger of rest,
and we might add of security; for, although none
but the Signor Grimaldi had detected the secret
uneasiness of Pierre, it was not possible to be, at
that late hour, amid so wild and dreary a display
of desolation, and, as it were, cut off from
communion
with their kind, without experiencing an
humbling sense of the dependence of man upon the
grand and ceaseless Providence of God.
The mules were again urged to increase their
pace, and images of the refreshment and repose
that were expected from the convent's hospitality,
became general and grateful among the travellers.
The day was fast disappearing from the glens and
ravines through which they rode, and all discourse
ceased in the desire to get on. The exceeding
purity of the atmosphere, which, at that great
elevation, resembled a medium of thought rather
than of matter, rendered objects defined, just, and
near; and none but the mountaineers and
Sigismund
,
who were used to the deception, (for in effect
truth obtains this character with those who have
been accustomed to the false) and who understood
the grandeur of the scale on which nature has
displayed
her power among the Alps, knew how to
calculate the distance which still separated them
from their goal. More than a league of painful
and stony ascent was to be surmounted, and yet
Adelheid and Christine had both permitted slight
exclamations of pleasure to escape them, when
Pierre pointed to the speck of blue sky between
the hoary pinnacles above, and first gave them to
understand that it denoted the position of the
convent
.
Here and there, too, small patches of the
last year's snow were discovered, lying under the
shadows of overhanging rocks, and which were
likely to resist the powers of the sun till winter
came again; another certain sign that they had
reached a height greatly exceeding that of the
usual habitations of men. The keenness of the
air was another proof of their situation, for all the
travellers had heard that the Augustines dwelt
among eternal frosts, a report which is nearly
literally true.
At no time during the day had the industry of
the party been as great as it now became. In this
respect, the ordinary traveller is apt to resemble
him who journeys on the great highway of life,
and who finds himself obliged, by a tardy and
illrequited
diligence in age, to repair those omissions
and negligences of youth which would have
rendered
the end of his toil easy and profitable.
Improved
as their speed had become, it continued to
increase rather than to diminish, for Pierre Dumont
kept his eye riveted on the heavens, and each
moment
of time seemed to bring new incentives to
exertion. The wearied beasts manifested less zeal
than the guide, and they who rode them were
beginning to murmur at the unreasonableness of
the rate at which they were compelled to proceed
on the narrow, uneven, stony path, where footing
for the animals was not always obtained with the
necessary quickness, when a gloom deeper than
that cast by the shadows of the rocks fell upon
their track, and the air filled with snow, as
suddenly
as if all its particles had been formed and
condensed by the application of some prompt
chemical process.
The change was so unexpected, and yet so
complete
,
that the whole party checked their mules,
and sat looking up at the millions of flakes that
were descending on their heads, with more wonder
and admiration than fear. A shout from Pierre
first aroused them from this trance, and recalled
them to a sense of the real state of things. He
was standing on a knoll, already separated from
the party by some fifty yards, white with snow,
and gesticulating violently for the travellers to
come on.
For the sake of the Blessed Maria! quicken
the beasts, he cried; for Pierre, like most who
dwell in Valais, was a Catholic, and one accustomed
to bethink him most of his heavenly mediator when
most oppressed with present dangers; quicken
their speed, if ye value your lives! This is no
moment
to gaze at the mountains, which are well
enough in their way, and no doubt both the finest
and largest known, (no Swiss ever seriously
vituperates or loses his profound veneration for his
beloved nature,) but which had better be the
humblest plain on earth for our occasions than
what they truly are. Quicken the mules then, for
the love of the Blessed Virgin!
Thou betrayest unnecessary, and, for one that
had needs be cool, indiscreet alarm, at the
appearance
of a little snow, friend Pierre, observed the
Signor Grimaldi, as the mules drew near the guide,
and speaking with a little of the irony of a soldier
who had steeled his nerves by familiarity with
danger. Even we Italians, though less used to
the frosts than you of the mountains, are not so
much disturbed by the change, as thou, a trained
guide of St. Bernard!
Reproach me as you will, Signore, said Pierre,
turning and pursuing his way with increased
diligence
,
though he did not entirely succeed in
concealing
his resentment at an accusation which he
knew to be unmerited, but quicken your pace;
until you are better acquainted with the country
in which you journey, your words pass for empty
breath in my ears. This is no trifle of a cloak
doubled about the person, or of balls rolled into
piles by the sport of children; but an affair of life
or death. You are a half league in the air, Signor
Genoese, in the region of storms, where the winds
work their will, at times, as if infernal devils were
rioting to cool themselves, and where the stoutest
limbs and the firmest hearts are brought but too
often to see and confess their feebleness!
The old man had uncovered his blanched locks
in respect to the Italian, as he uttered this
energetic
remonstrance, and when he ended, he walked
on with professional pride, as if disdaining to
protect
a brow that had already weathered so many
tempests among the mountains.
Cover thyself, good Pierre, I pray thee; urged
the Genoese in a tone of repeatance. I have
shown the intemperance of a boy, and
intemperance
of a quality that little becomes my years.
Thou art the best judge of the circumstances in
which we are placed, and thou alone shalt lead us.
Pierre accepted the apology with a manly but
respectful reverence, continuing always to ascend
with unremitted industry.
Ten gloomy and anxious minutes succeeded.
During this time, the falling snows came faster
and in finer flakes, while, occasionally, there were
fearful intimations that the winds were about to
Vol. II. K
rise. At the elevation in which the travellers now
found themselves, phenomena, that would
ordinarily
be of little account, become the arbiters of
fate. The escape of the caloric from the human
system, at the height of six or seven thousand feet
above the sea, and in the latitude of forty-six, is,
under the most favorable circumstances,
frequently
of itself the source of inconvenience; but here
were grave additional reasons to heighten the
danger. The absence of the sun's rays alone left
a sense of chilling cold, and a few hours of night
were certain to bring frost, even at midsummer.
Thus it is that storms of trifling import in
themselves
gain power over the human frame, by its
reduced means of resistance, and when to this fact
is added the knowledge that the elements are far
fiercer in their workings in the upper than in the
nether regions of the earth, the motives of Pierre's
concern will be better understood by the reader
than they probably were by himself, though the
honest guide had a long and severe experience to
supply the place of theory.
Men are rerely loquacious in danger. The timid
recoil into themselves, yielding most of their
faculties
to a tormenting imagination, that augments
the causes of alarm and diminishes the means of
security, while the firm of mind rally and
condense
their powers to the point necessary to
exertion
.
Such were the effects in the present instance
on those who followed Pierre. A general and deep
silence pervaded the party, each one seeing their
situation in the colors most suited to his particular
habits and character. The men, without an
exception
,
were grave and earnest in their efforts to
force the mules forward; Adelheid became pale,
but she preserved her calmness by the sheer force
of character; Christine was trembling and
dependent
,
though cheered by the presence of, and
her confidence in, Sigismund; while the
attendants
of the heiress of Willading covered their
heads, and followed their mistress with the blind
faith in their superiors that is apt to sustain people
of their class in serious emergencies.
Ten minutes sufficed entirely to change the
aspect
of the view. The frozen element could not
adhere to the iron-like and perpendicular faces of
the mountains, but the glens, and ravines, and
valleys
became as white as the peak of Vlan. Still
Pierre continued his silent and upward march, in
a way to keep alive a species of trembling hope
among those who depended so helplessly upon his
intelligence and faith. They wished to believe
that the snow was merely one of those common
occurrences that were to be expected on the
summits
of the Alps at this late season of the year,
and which were no more than so many symptoms
of the known rigor of the approaching winter.
The guide himself was evidently disposed to lose
no time in explanation, and as the secret
excitement
stole over all his followers, he no longer had
cause to complain of the tardiness of their
movements
.
Sigismund kept near his sister and
Adelheid
,
having a care that their mules did not lag;
while the other males performed the same
necessary
office for the beasts ridden by the female
domestics
.
In this manner passed the few sombre
minutes which immediately preceded the
disappearance
of day. The heavens were no longer
visible. In that direction the eye saw only an
endless succession of falling flakes, and it was
getting
to be difficult to distinguish even the ramparts
of rock that bounded the irregular ravine in which
they rode. They were known to be, however, at
no great distance from the path, which indeed
occasionally
brushed their sides. At other moments
they crossed rude, stony, mountain heaths, if such
a word can be applied to spots without the
symbol
or hope of vegetation. The traces of the beasts
that had preceded them, became less and less
apparent
,
though the trickling stream that came down
from the glaciers, and along which they had now
journeyed for hours, was occasionally seen, as it
was crossed in pursuing their winding way. Pierre,
though still confident that he held the true
direction
,
alone knew that this guide was not longer to
be relied on; for, as they drew nearer to the top
of the mountains, the torrent gradually lessened
both in its force and in the volume of its water,
separating into twenty small rills, which came
rippling
from the vast bodies of snow that lay among
the different peaks above.
As yet, there had been no wind. The guide, as
minute after minute passed without bringing any
change in this respect, ventured at last to advert
to the fact, cheering his companions by giving
them reasons to hope that they should yet reach
the convent without any serious calamity. As if
in mockery of this opinion, the flakes of snow
began to whirl in the air, while the words were on
his lips, and a blast came through the ravine, that
set the protection of cloaks and mantles at defiance.
Notwithstanding his resolution and experience, the
stout-hearted Pierre suffered an exclamation of
despair to escape him, and he instantly stopped, in
the manner of a man who could no longer
conceal
the dread that had been collecting in his bosom,
for the last interminable and weary hour.
Sigismund
,
as well as most of the men of the party, had
dismounted a little previously, with a view to
excite
warmth by exercise. The youth had often
traversed the mountains, and the cry no sooner
reached his ear, than he was at the side of him who
uttered it.
At what distance, are we still from the
convent
?
he demanded eagerly.
There is more than a league of steep and stony
path to mount, Monsieur le Capitaine; returned
the disconsolate Pierre, in a tone that perhaps said
more than his words.
This is not a moment for indecision.
Remember
that thou art not the leader of a party of
carriers
with their beasts of burthen, but that there
are those with us, who are unused to exposure,
and are feeble of body. What is the distance from
the last hamlet we passed?
Double that to the convent!
Sigismund turned, and with the eye he made a
silent appeal to the two old nobles, as if to ask for
advice or orders.
It might indeed be better to return, observed
the Signore Grimaldi, in the way one utters a
half-formed
resolution. This wind is getting to be
piercingly cutting, and the night is hard upon us.
What thinkest thou, Melchior; for, with Monsieur
Sigismund, I am of opinion that there is little time
to lose.
Signore, your pardon, hastily interrupted the
guide. I would not undertake to cross the plain
of the Vlan an hour later, for all the treasures of
Einsideln and Loretto! The wind will have an
infernal sweep in that basin, which will soon be
boiling like a pot, while here we shall get, from
time to time, the shelter of the rocks. The
slightest
mishap on the open ground might lead us astray
a league or more, and it would need an hour to
regain the course. The beasts too mount faster
than they deseend, and with far more surety in the
dark; and even when at the village there is nothing
fit for nobles, while the brave monks have all that
a king can need.
Those who escape from these wild rocks need
K 2
not be critical about their fare, honest Pierre, when
fairly housed. Wilt thou answer for our arrival at
the convent unharmed, and in reasonable time?
Signore, we are in the hands of God. The
pious Augustines, I make no doubt, are praying
for all who are on the mountain at this moment; but
there is not a minute to lose. I ask no more than
that none lose sight of their companions, and that
each exert his force to the utmost. We are not
far from the House of Refuge, and should the
storm increase to a tempest, as, to conceal the
danger no longer, well may happen in this late
month, we will seek its shelter for a few hours.
This intelligence was happily communicated, for
the certainty that there was a place of safety
within
an attainable distance, had some such cheering
effect on the travellers as is produced on the
mariner
who finds that the hazards of the gale are
lessened by the accidental position of a secure
harbor under his lee. Repeating his admonitions
for the party to keep as close together as possible,
and advising all who felt the sinister effects of the
cold on their limbs to dismount, and to endeavor
to restore the circulation by exercise, Pierre
resumed
his route.
But even the time consumed in this short
conference
had sensibly altered the condition of things
for the worse. The wind, which had no fixed
direction
,
being a furious current of the upper air
diverted from its true course by encountering the
ragged peaks and ravines of the Alps, was now
whirling around them in eddies, now aiding their
ascent by seeming to puch against their backs, and
then returning in their faces with a violence that
actually rendered advance impossible. The
temperature
fell rapidly several degrees, and the most
vigorous of the party began to perceive the
benumbing
influence of the chilling currents, at their lower
extremities especially, in a manner to excite
serious
alarm. Every precaution was used to protect
the females that tenderness could suggest; but
though Adelheid, who alone retained sufficient
self-command to give an account of her feelings,
diminished the danger of their situation with the
wish not to alarm their companions uselessly, she
could not conceal from herself the horrible truth
that the vital heat was escaping from her own
body, with a rapidity that rendered it impossible
for her much longer to retain the use of her
faculties
.
Conscious of her own mental superiority
over that of all her female companions, a
superiority
which in such moments is even of more
account than bodily force, after a few minutes of
silent endurance, she checked her mule, and called
upon Sigismund to examine the condition of his
sister and her maids, neither of whom had now
spoken for some time.
This startling request was made at a moment
when the storm appeared to gather new force, and
when it had become absolutely impossible to
distinguish
even the whitened earth at twenty paces from
the spot where the party stood collected in a
shivering
group. The young soldier threw open the cloaks
and mantles in which Christine was enveloped,
and the half-unconscious girl sank on his shoulder,
like a drowsy infant that was willing to seek its
slumbers in the arms of one it loved.
Christine!my sister!my poor, my
much-abused
,
angelic sister! murmured Sigismund,
happily for his secret in a voice that only reached
the ears of Adelheid. Awake! Christine; for the
love of our excellent and affectionate mother,
exert
thyself. Awake! Christine, in the name of God,
awake!
Awake, dearest Christine! exclaimed
Adelheid
,
throwing herself from the saddle, and folding
the smiling but benumbed girl to her bosom. God
protect me from the pang of feeling that thy loss
should be owing to my wish to lead thee amid
these cruel and inhospitable rocks! Christine, if
thou hast love or pity for me, awake!
Look to the maids! hurriedly said Pierre,
who found that he was fast touching on one of
those mountain catastrophes, of which, in the
course of his life, he had been the witness of a few
of fearful consequences. Look to all the females,
for he who now sleeps, dies!
The muleteers soon stripped the two domestics
of their outer coverings, and it was immediately
proclaimed that both were in imminent danger,
one having already lost all consciousness. A
timely
application of the flask of Pierre, and the efforts
of the muleteers, succeeded so far in restoring life
as to remove the grounds of immediate
apprehension
;
though it was apparent to the least instructed
of them all, that half an hour more of exposure
would probably complete the fatal work that had
so actively and vigorously commenced. To add
to the horror of this conviction, each member of
the party, not excepting the muleteers, was
painfully
conscious of the escape of that vital warmth
whose total flight was death.
In this strait all dismounted. They felt that the
occasion was one of extreme jeopardy, that nothing
could save them but resolution, and that every
minute of time was getting to be of the last
importance
.
Each female, Adelheid included, was
placed between two of the other sex, and, supported
in this manner, Pierre called loudly and in a
manful
voice for the whole to proceed. The beasts
were driven after them by one of the muleteers.
The progress of travellers, feeble as Adelheid
and her companions, on a stony path of very
uneven
surface, and of a steep ascent, the snow
covering
the feet, and the tempest cutting their faces,
was necessarily slow, and to the last degree
toilsome
.
Still, the exertion increased the quickness
of the blood, and, for a short time, there was an
appearance of recalling those who most suffered
to life. Pierre, who still kept his post with the
hardihood of a mountaineer, and the fidelity of a
Swiss, cheered them on with his voice, continuing
to raise the hope that the place of refuge was at
hand.
At this instant, when exertion was most needed,
and when, apparently, all were sensible of its
importance
and most disposed to make it, the
muleteer
charged with the duty of urging on the line of
beasts deserted his trust, preferring to take his
chance of regaining the village by descending the
mountain, to struggle uselessly, and at a pace so
slow, to reach the convent. The man was a
stranger in the country, who had been
adventitiously
employed for this expedition, and was
unconnected
with Pierre by any of those ties which
are the best pledges of unconquerable faith, when
the interests of self press hard upon our
weaknesses
.
The wearied beasts, no longer driven,
and indisposed to toil, first stopped, then turned
aside to avoid the cutting air and the ascent, and
were soon wandering from the path it was so
vitally necessary to keep.
As soon as Pierre was informed of the
circumstance
,
he eagerly issued an order to collect the
stragglers without delay, and at every hazard.
Benumbed, bewildered, and unable to see beyond
a few yards, this embarrassing duty was not easily
performed. One after another of the party joined
in the pursuit, for all the effects of the travellers
were on the beasts; and after some ten minutes of
delay, blended with an excitement which helped
to quicken the blood and to awaken the faculties
of even the females, the mules were all happily
regained. They were secured to each other,
head and tail, in the manner so usual in the droves
of these animals, and Pierre turned to resume the
order of the march. But on seeking the path, it
was not to be found! Search was made on every
side, and yet none could meet with the smallest of
its traces. Broken, rough fragments of rock,
were all that rewarded the most anxious
investigation
;
and after a few precious minutes uselessly
wasted, they all assembled around the guide, as if
by common consent, to seek his counsel. The
truth was no longer to be concealedthe party
was lost!
CHAPTER VIII.
Let no presuming railer tax
Creative wisdom, as if aught was form'd
In vain, or not for admirable ends.
Thomson
.
So long as we possess the power to struggle,
hope is the last feeling to desert the human mind.
Men are endowed with every gradation of
courage
,
from the calm energy of reflection, which is
rendered still more effective by physical firmness,
to the headlong precipitation of reckless spirit;
from the resolution that grows more imposing and
more respectable as there is greater occasion for
its exercise, to the fearful and ill-directed energies
of despair. But no description with the pen can
give the reader a just idea of the chill that comes
over the heart when accidental causes rob us,
suddenly
and without notice, of those resources on
which we have been habitually accustomed to
rely. The mariner without his course or compass
loses his audacity and coolness, though the
momentary
danger be the same; the soldier will fly,
if you deprive him of his arms; and the hunter of
our own forests who has lost his landmarks, is
transformed from the bold and determined foe of
its tenants, into an anxious and dependent fugitive,
timidly seeking the means of retreat. In short,
the customary associations of the mind being
rudely and suddenly destroyed, we are made
to feel that reason, while it elevates us so far above
the brutes as to make man their lord and
governor
,
becomes a quality less valuable than instinct,
when the connecting link in its train of causes and
effects is severed.
It was no more than a natural consequence of
his greater experience, that Pierre Dumont
understood
the horrors of their present situation far
better
than any with him. It is true, there yet
remained
enough light to enable him to pick his way
over the rocks and stones, but he had sufficient
experience to understand that there was less risk
in remaining stationary than in moving; for, while
there was only one direction that led towards the
Refuge, all the rest would conduct them to a
greater distance from the shelter, which was now
the only hope. On the other hand, a very few
minutes of the intense cold, and of the searching
wind to which they were exposed, would most
probably freeze the currents of life in the feebler
of those intrusted to his care.
Hast thou aught to advise? asked Melchior
de Willading, folding Adelheid to his bosom,
beneath
his ample cloak, and communicating, with a
father's love, a small portion of the meagre warmth
that still remained in his own aged frame to that
of his drooping daughtercanst thou bethink
thee of nothing, that may be done, in this awful
strait?
If the good monks have been active
returned
the wavering Pierre. I fear me that the
dogs have not yet been exercised, on the paths,
this season!
Has it then come to this! Are our lives indeed
dependent on the uncertain sagacity of brutes!
Mein Herr, I would bless the Virgin, and her
holy Son, if it were so! But I fear this storm has
been so sudden and unexpected, that we may not
even hope for their succor.
Melchior groaned. He folded his child still
nearer to his heart, while the athletic Sigismund
shielded his drooping sister, as the fowl shelters its
young beneath the wing.
Delay is death, rejoined the Signor Grimaldi.
I have heard of muleteers that have been driven
to kill their beasts, that shelter and warmth might
be found in their entrails.
The alternative is horrible! interrupted
Sigismund
.
Is return impossible? By always
descending
,
we must, in time, reach the village
below
.
That time would be fatal, answered Pierre.
I know of only one resource that remains. If
the party will keep together, and answer my shouts,
I will make another effort to find the path.
This proposal was gladly accepted, for energy
and hope go hand-in-hand, and the guide was about
to quit the group, when he felt the strong grasp of
Sigismund on his arm.
I will be thy companion, said the soldier
firmly.
Thou hast not done me justice, young man,
answered Pierre, with severe reproach in his
manner
.
Had I been base enough to desert my trust,
these limbs and this strength are yet sufficient to
carry me safely down the mountain; but though
a guide of the Alps may freeze like another man,
the last throb of his heart will be in behalf of those
he serves!
A thousand pardons brave old mana
thousand
pardons; still, will I be thy companion; the
search that is conducted by two will be more
likely to succeed, than that on which thou goest
alone.
The offended Pierre, who liked the spirit of the
youth as much as he disliked his previous
suspicions
,
met the apology frankly. He extended his
hand and forgot the feelings, that, even amid the
tempests of those wild mountains, were excited by
a distrust of his honesty. After this short
concession
to the ever-burning, though smothered
volcano
,
of human passion, they left the group
together
,
in order to make a last search for their
course.
The snow by this time was many inches deep,
and as the road was at best but a faint bridle-path
that could scarcely be distinguished by day-light
from the dbris which strewed the ravines, the
undertaking would have been utterly hopeless, had
not Pierre known that there was the chance of
still meeting with some signs of the many mules
that daily went up and down the mountain. The
guide called to the muleteers, who answered his
cries every minute, for so long as they kept within
the sound of each other's voices, there was no
danger of their becoming entirely separated. But,
amid the hollow roaring of the wind, and the
incessant
pelting of the storm, it was neither safe
nor practicable to venture far asunder. Several
little stony knolls were ascended and descended,
and a rippling rill was found, but without bringing
with it any traces of the path. The heart of Pierre
began to chill with the decreasing warmth of his
Vol. II. L.
body, and the firm old man, overwhelmed with his
responsibility while his truant thoughts would
unbidden
recur to those whom he had left in his
cottage
at the foot of the mountain, gave way at last
to his emotions in a paroxysm of grief, wringing
his hands, weeping and calling loudly on God for
succor. This fearful evidence of their extremity
worked upon the feelings of Sigismund until they
were wrought up nearly to frenzy. His great
physical force still sustained him, and in an access
of energy that was fearfully allied to madness, he
rushed forward into the vortex of snow and hail,
as if determined to leave all to the Providence of
God, disappearing from the eyes of his
companion
.
This incident recalled the guide to his senses.
He called earnestly on the thoughtless youth to
return. No answer was given, and Pierre
hastened
back to the motionless and shivering party,
in order to unite all their voices in a last effort to
be heard. Cry upon cry was raised, but each shout
was answered merely by the hoarse rushing of the
winds.
Sigismund! Sigismund! called one after
another
,
in hurried and alarmed succession.
The noble boy will be irretrievably lost!
exclaimed
the Signor Grimaldi, in despair, the
services
already rendered by the youth, together with
his manly qualities, having insensibly and closely
wound themselves around his heart. He will
die a miserable death, and without the consolation
of meeting his fate in communion with his
fellow-sufferers
!
A shout from Sigismund came whirling past, as
if the sound were embodied in the gale.
Blessed ruler of the earth, this is alone thy
mercy! exclaimed Melchior de Willading,he
has found the path!
And honor to thee, Mariathou mother of
God! murmured the Italian.
At that moment, a dog came leaping and
barking
through the snow. It immediately was
scenting
and whining among the frozen travellers. The
exclamations of joy and surprise were scarcely
uttered
before Sigismund, accompanied by another,
joined the party.
Honor and thanks to the good Augustines!
cried the delighted guide; this is the third good
office of the kind, for which I am their debtor!
I would it were true, honest Pierre, answered
the stranger. But Maso and Nettuno are poor
substitutes, in a tempest like this, for the servants
and beasts of St. Bernard. I am a wanderer, and
lost like yourselves, and my presence brings little
other relief than that which is known to be the
fruit of companionship in misery. The saints have
brought me a second time into your company when
matters were hanging between life and death!
Maso made this last remark when, by drawing
nearer the group, he had been able to ascertain,
by the remains of the light, of whom the party
was composed.
If it is to be as useful now as thou hast already
been, answered the Genoese, it will be happier
for us all, thyself included: bethink thee quickly
of thy expedients, and I will make thee an equal
sharer of all that a generous Providence hath
bestowed
.
Il Maledetto rarely listened to the voice of the
Signor Grimaldi, without a manner of interest and
curiosity which, as already mentioned, had more
than once struck the latter himself, but which he
quite naturally attributed to the circumstance of
his person being known to one who had declared
himself to be a native of Genoa. Even at this
terrible moment, the same manner was evident;
and the noble, thinking it a favorable symptom,
renewed the already neglected offer of fortune,
with a view to quicken a zeal which he reasonably
enough supposed would be most likely to be
awakened
by the hopes of a substantial reward.
Were there question here, illustrious Signore,
answered Maso, of steering a barge, of
shortenning
sail, or of handling a craft of any rig or
construction, in gale, squall, hurricane, or a calm
among breakers, my skill and experience might
be turned to good account; but setting aside the
difference in our strength and hardihood, even that
lily which is in so much danger of being nipped
by the frosts, is not more helpless than I am myself
at this moment. I am no better than yourselves,
Signori, and, though a better mountaineer perhaps,
I rely on the favor of the saints to be succored,
or my time must finish among the snows instead
of in the surf of a sea-shore, as, until now, I had
always believed would be my fate.
But the dogthy admirable dog!
Ah, eccellenza, Nettuno is but a useless beast,
here! God has given him a thicker mantle, and a
warmer dress than to us Christians, but even this
advantage will soon prove a curse to my poor
friend. The long hair he carries will quickly be
covered with icicles, and, as the snow deepens, it
will retard his movements. The dogs of St.
Bernard
are smoother, have longer limbs, a truer scent,
and possess the advantage of being trained to the
paths.
A tremendous shout of Sigismund's interrupted
Maso,the youth, on finding that the accidental
meeting with the mariner was not likely to lead to
any immediate advantages, having instantly,
accompanied
by Pierre and one of his assistants,
renewed the search. The cry was echoed from
the guide and the muleteer, and then all three were
seen flying through the snow, preceded by a
powerful
mastiff. Nettuno, who had been crouching
with his bushy tail between his legs, barked, seemed
to arouse with renewed courage, and then leaped
with evident joy and good-will upon the back of
his old antagonist Uberto.
The dog of St. Bernard was alone. But his air
and all his actions were those of an animal whose
consciousness was wrought up to the highest pitch
permitted by the limits nature had set to the
intelligence
of a brute. He ran from one to another,
rubbed his glossy and solid side against the limbs
of all, wagged his tail, and betrayed the usual signs
that creatures of his species manifest, when their
instinct is most alive. Luckily he had a good
interpreter
of his meaning in the guide, who, knowing
the habits, and, if it may be so expressed, the
intentions
of the mastiff, feeling there was not a
moment to lose if they would still preserve the
feebler members of their party, begged the others
to hasten the necessary dispositions to profit by this
happy meeting. The females were supported as
before, the mules fastened together, and Pierre,
placing himself in front, called cheerfully to the
dog, encouraging him to lead the way.
Is it quite prudent to confide so implicitly to
the guidance of this brute? asked the Signor
Grimaldi
a little doubtingly, when he saw the
arrangement
on which, by the increasing gloom and the
growing intensity of the cold, it was but too
apparent
,
even to one as little accustomed to the
mountains
as himself, that the lives of the whole party
depended.
Fear not to trust to old Uberto, Signore,
answered
Pierre, moving onward as he spoke, for to
think of further delay was out of the question; fear
nothing for the faith or the knowledge of the dog.
These animals are trained by the servants of the
L 2
convent to know and keep the paths, even when
the snows lie on them fathoms deep. God has
given them stout hearts, long limbs, and short hair,
expressly, as it has often seemed to me, for this
end; and nobly do they use the gifts! I am ac
quainted with all their ways, for we guides
commonly
learn the ravines of St. Bernard by first
serving the claviers of the convent, and many a
day have I gone up and down these rocks with a
couple of these animals in training for this very
purpose. The father and mother of Uberto were
my favorite companions, and their son will hardly
play an old friend of the family false.
The travellers followed their leader with more
confidence, though blindly. Uberto appeared to
perform his duty with the sobriety and steadiness
that became his years, and which, indeed, were
very necessary for the circumstances in which
they were placed. Instead of bounding ahead and
becoming lost to view, as most probably would
have happened with a younger animal, the noble
and half-reasoning brute maintained a pace that
was suited to the slow march of those who supported
the females, occasionally stopping to look back, as
if to make sure that none were left.
The dogs of St. Bernard are, or it might perhaps
be better to say were,for it is affirmed that the
ancient race is lost,chosen for their size, their
limbs, and the shortness of their coats, as has just
been stated by Pierre; the former being necessary
to convey the succor with which they were often
charged, as well as to overcome the difficulties of
the mountains, and the two latter that they might
the better wade through, and resist the influence
of, the snows. Their training consisted in
rendering
them familiar with, and attached to, the human
race; in teaching them to know and to keep the
paths on all occasions, except such as called for a
higher exercise of their instinct, and to discover
the position of those who had been overwhelmed
by the avalanches, and to assist in disinterring
their bodies. In all these duties Uberto had been
so long exercised, that he was universally known
to be the most sagacious and the most trusty
animal
on the mountain. Pierre followed his steps
with so much greater reliance on his intelligence,
from being perfectly acquainted with the
character
of the dog. When, therefore, he saw the
mastiff
turn at right angles to the course he had just
been taking, the guide, on reaching the spot,
imitated
his example, and, first removing the snow to
make sure of the fact, he joyfully proclaimed to
those who came after him that the lost path was
found. This intelligence sounded like a reprieve
from death, though the mountaineers well knew
that more than an hour of painful and increasing
toil was still necessary to reach the hospice. The
chilled blood of the tender beings who were fast
dropping into the terrible sleep which is the
forerunner
of death, was quickened in their veins,
however
,
when they heard the shout of delight that
spontaneously broke from all their male
companions
,
on learning the glad tidings.
The movement was now faster, though
embarrassed
and difficult on account of the incessant
pelting of the storm and the influence of the biting
cold, which were difficult to be withstood by even
the strongest of the party. Sigismund groaned
inwardly, as he thought of Adelheid and his sister's
being exposed to a tempest which shook the
stoutest
frame and the most manly heart among them.
He encircled the latter with an arm, rather
carrying
than leading her along, for the young soldier
had sufficient knowledge of the localities of the
mountain to understand that they were still at a
fearful distance from the Col, and that the strength
of Christine was absolutely unequal to the task of
reaching it unsupported.
Occasionally Pierre spoke to the dogs, Nettuno
keeping close to the side of Uberto in order to
prevent separation, since the path was no longer
discernible without constant examination, the
darkness
having so far increased as to reduce the sight
to very narrow limits. Each time the name of
the latter was pronounced, the animal would stop,
wag his tail, or give some other sign of
recognition
,
as if to reassure his followers of his
intelligence
and fidelity. After one of these short halts,
old Uberto and his companion unexpectedly
refused
to proceed. The guide, the two old nobles, and
at length the whole party, were around them, and
no cry or encouragement of the mountaineers
could induce the dogs to quit their tracks.
Are we again lost? asked the Baron de
Willading
,
pressing Adelheid closer to his beating
heart, nearly ready to submit to their common
fate in despair. Has God at length forsaken us?
my daughtermy beloved child!
This touching appeal was answered by a howl
from Uberto, who leaped madly away and
disappeared
.
Nettuno followed, barking wildly and
with a deep throat. Pierre did not hesitate about
following, and Sigismund, believing that the
movement
of the guide was to arrest the flight of the
dogs, was quickly on his heels. Maso moved with
greater deliberation.
Nettuno is not apt to raise that bark with
nothing
but hail, and snow, and wind in his nostrils,
said the calculating Italian. We are either near
another party of travellers, for such are on the
mountains as I know
God forbid! Art sure of this? demanded the
Signor Grimaldi, observing that the other had
suddenly
checked himself.
Sure that others
were
, Signore, returned the
mariner deliberately, as if he measured well the
meaning of each word. Ah, here comes the
trusty
beast, and Pierre, and the Captain, with their
tidings, be they good or be they evil.
The two just named rejoined their friends a
Maso ceased speaking. They hurriedly informed
the shivering travellers that the much desired
Refuge was near, and that nothing but the
darkness
and the driving snow prevented it from being
seen.
It was a blessed thought, and one that came
from St. Augustine himself, which led the holy
monks to raise this shelter! exclaimed the
delighted
Pierre, no longer considering it necessary
to conceal the extent of the danger they had run.
I would not answer even for my own power to
reach the hospice in a time like this. You are of
mother church, Signore, being of Italy?
I am one of her unworthy children, returned
the Genoese.
This unmerited favor must have come from
the prayers of St. Augustine, and a vow I made
to send a fair offering to our Lady of Einsiedeln;
for never before have I known a dog of St.
Bernard
lead the traveller to the Refuge! Their
business
is to find the frozen, and to guide the traveller
along the paths to the hospice. Even Uberto had
his doubts, as you saw, but the vow prevailed;
or, I know notit might, indeed, have been the
prayer.
The Signor Grimaldi was too eager to get
Adelheid
under cover, and, in good sooth, to be there
himself, to waste the time in discussing the knotty
point of which of two means that were equally
orthodox, had been the most efficacious in
bringing
about their rescue. In common with the others,
he followed the pious and confiding Pierre in
silence
,
making the best of his way after the
credulous
guide. The latter had not yet seen the Refuge
himself, for so these places are well termed on the
Alpine passes, but the formation of the ground had
satisfied him of its proximity. Once reassured as
to his precise position, all the surrounding
localities
presented themselves to his mind with the
familiarity
the seaman manifests with every cord in
the intricate maze of his rigging, in the darkest
night, or, to produce a parallel of more common
use, with the readiness which all manifest in the
intricacies of their own habitations. The broken
chain of association being repaired and joined,
every thing became clear again to his
apprehension
,
and, in diverging from the path on this
occasion
,
the old man held his way as directly toward
the spot he sought, as if he were journeying under
a bright sun. There was a rough but short
descent
,
a similar rise, and the long-desired goal was
reached.
We shall not stop to dwell upon the emotions
with which the travellers first touched this place
of comparative security. Humility, and
dependence
on the providence of God, were the
predominant
sensations even with the rude muleteers,
while the nearly exhausted females were just able
to express in murmurs their fervent gratitude to
the omnipotent power that had permitted its agents
so unexpectedly to interpose between them and
death. The Refuge was not seen until Pierre laid
his hand on the roof, now white with snow, and
proclaimed its character with a loud, warm, and
devout thanksgiving.
Enter and thank God! he said. Another
hopeless half-hour would have brought down from
his pride the stoutest among usenter, and thank
God!
As is the fact with all the edifices of that region,
the building was entirely of stone, even to the roof,
having the form of those vaulted cellars which
in this country are used for the preservation of
vegetables. It was quite free from humidity,
however
,
the clearness of the atmosphere and the
entire
absence of soil preventing the accumulation
of moisture, and it offered no more than the naked
protection of its walls to those who sought its
cover. But shelter on such a night was
everything
,
and this it effectually afforded. The place
had only one outlet, being simply formed of four
walls and the roof; but it was sufficiently large to
shelter a party twice as numerous as that which
had now reached it.
The transition from the biting cold and piercing
winds of the mountain to the shelter of this
inartificial
building, was so great as to produce
something
like a general sensation of warmth. The
advantage gained in this change of feeling was
judiciously improved by the application of friction
and of restoratives under the direction of Pierre.
Uberto carried a small supply of the latter
attached
to his collar, and before half an hour had passed,
Adelheid and Christine were sleeping sweetly, side
by side, muffled in plenty of the spare garments,
and pillowed on the saddles and housings of the
mules. The brutes were brought within the
Refuge
,
and as no party mounted the St. Bernard
without carrying the provender necessary for its
beasts of burthen, that sterile region affording
none of its own, the very fuel being transported
leagues on the backs of mules, the patient and
hardy animals, too, found their solace, after the
fatigues and exposure of the day. The presence
of so many living bodies in lodgings so confined
aided in producing warmth, and, after all had
eaten of the scanty fare furnished by the
fore-sight
of the guide, drowsiness came over the whole
party.
CHAPTER IX.
Side by side,
Within they lie, a mournful company.
Rogers
.
The
sleep of the weary is sweet. In after-life,
Adelheid, when dwelling in a palace, reposing on
down, and canopied by the rich stuffs of a more
generous climate, was often heard to say that she
had never taken rest grateful as that she found in
the Refuge of St. Bernard. So easy, natural, and
refreshing, had been her slumbers, unalloyed even
by those dreams of precipices and avalanches
which, long afterwards, haunted her slumbers,
that she was the first to open her eyes on the
following
morning, awaking like an infant that had
enjoyed a quiet and healthful repose. Her
movements
aroused Christine. They threw aside the
cloaks and coats that covered them, and sat gazing
about the place in the confusion that the novelty
of their situation would be likely to produce. All
the rest of the travellers still slumbered; and,
arising
without noise, they passed the silent and
insensible
sleepers, the quiet mules which had stretched
themselves near the entrance of the place, and
quitted the hut.
Without, the scene was wintry: but, as is usual
in the Alps let what may be the season, its features
of grand and imposing sublimity were prominent.
The day was among the peaks above them, while
the shades of night still lay upon the valleys,
forming
a landscape like that exquisite and poetical
picture
of the lower world, which Guido has given in
the celebrated al-fresco painting of Aurora. The
ravines and glens were covered with snow, but
the sides of the rugged rocks were bare in their
eternal hue of ferruginous brown. The little knoll
on which the Refuge stood was also nearly naked,
the wind having driven the light particles of the
snow into the ravine of the path. The air of the
morning is keen at that great height even in
midsummer
,
and the shivering girls drew their
mantles
about them, though they breathed the clear,
elastic, inspiring element with pleasure. The storm
was entirely past, and the pure sapphire-colored
sky was in lovely contrast with the shadows
beneath
,
raising their thoughts naturally to that
heaven
which shone in a peace and glory so much in
harmony with the ordinary images we shadow
forth of the abode of the blessed. Adelheid
pressed
the hand of Christine, and they knelt together,
bowing their heads to a rock. As fervent, pure,
and sincere orisons ascended to God, from these
pious and innocent spirits, as it belongs to poor
mortality to offer.
This general, and in their peculiar situation
especial
,
duty performed, the gentle girls felt more
assured. Relieved of a heavy and imperative
obligation
,
they ventured to look about them with
greater confidence. Another building, similar in
form and material to that in which their
companions
were still sleeping, stood on the same swell of
rock, and their first inquiries naturally took that
direction. The entrance, or outlet to this hut, was
an orifice that resembled a window rather than a
door. They moved cautiously to the spot,
looking
into the gloomy, cavern-like room, as timidly
as the hare throws his regards about him before
he ventures from his cover. Four human forms
were reposing deep in the vault, with their backs
sustained against the walls. They slept
profoundly
too, for the curious but startled girls gazed at
Vol. II. M
them long, and retired without causing them to
awake.
We have not been alone on the mountain in
this terrible night, whispered Adelheid, gently
urging the trembling Christine away from the spot;
thou seest that other travellers have been taking
their rest near us; most probably after perils and
fatigues like our own.
Christine drew closer to the side of her more
experienced friend, like the young of the dove
hovering near the mother-bird when first
venturing
from the nest, and they returned to the refuge
they had quitted, for the cold was still so intense
as to render its protection grateful. At the door
they were met by Pierre, the vigilant old man
having awakened as soon as the light crossed his
eyes.
We are not alone here; said Adelheid,
pointing
to the other stone-covered roofthere are
travellers sleeping in yonder building, too.
Their sleep will be long, lady; answered the
guide, shaking his head solemnly. With two of
them it has already lasted a twelvemonth, and the
third has slept where you saw him since the fall of
the avalanche in the last days of April.
Adelheid recoiled a step, for his meaning was
too plain to be misunderstood. After looking at
her gentle companion, she demanded if those they
had seen were in truth the bodies of travellers who
had perished on the mountain.
Of no other, lady, returned Pierre. This
hut is for the livingthat for the dead. So near
are the two to each other, when men journey on
these wild rocks in winter! I have known him
who passed a short and troubled night here, begin
a sleep in the other before the turn of the day that
is not only deep enough, but which will last for
ever. One of the three that thou hast just seen
was a guide like myself: he was buried in the
falling snow at the spot where the path leaves the
plain of Vlan below us. Another is a pilgrim
that perished in as clear a night as ever shone on
St. Bernard, and merely for having taking a cup
too much to cheer his way. The third is a poor
vine-dresser that was coming from Piedmont into
our Swiss valleys to follow his calling, when death
overtook him in an ili-advised slumber, in which
he was so unwise as to indulge at nightfall. I
found his body myself on that naked rock, the day
after we had drunk together in friendship at Aoste,
and with my own hands was he placed among
the others.
And such is the burial a Christian gets in this
inhospitable country!
What would you, lady!'tis the chance of the
poor and the unknown. Those that have friends
are sought and found; but those that die without
leaving traces of their origin fare as you see. The
spade is useless among these rocks; and then it is
better that the body should remain where it may
be seen and claimed, than it should be put out of
sight. The good fathers, and all of note, are taken
down into the valleys, where there is earth, and
are decently buried; while the poor and the stranger
are housed in this vault, which is a better cover
than many of them knew while living. Ay, there
are three Christians there, who were all lately
walking the earth in the flesh, gay and active
as any.
The bodies are four in number!
Pierre looked surprised; he mused a little, and
continued his employment.
Then another has perished. The time may
come when my own blood shall freeze. This is a
fate the guide must ever keep in mind, for he is
exposed to it at an hour and a season that he knows
not!
Adelheid pursued the subject no farther. She
remembered to have heard that the pure
atmosphere
of the mountain prevented that offensive
decay which is usually associated with the idea of
death, and the usage lost some of its horror in the
recollection.
In the mean time the remainder of the party
awoke, and were collecting before the refuge.
The mules were led forth and saddled, the baggage
was loaded, and Pierre was calling upon the
travellers
to mount, when Uberto and Nettuno came
leaping down the path in company, running side
by side in excellent fellowship. The movements
of the dogs were of a nature to attract the
attention
of Pierre and the muleteers, who predicted
that they should soon see some of the servants of
the hospice. The result showed the familiarity of
the guide with his duty, for he had scarce
ventured
this opinion, when a party from the gorge on
the summit of the mountain was seen wading
through the snow, along the path that led towards
the Refuge, with Father Xavier at its head.
The explanations were brief and natural. After
conducting the travellers to the shelter, and passing
most of the night in their company, at the approach
of dawn Uberto had returned to the convent,
always attended by his friend Nettuno. Here he
communicated to the monks, by signs which they
who were accustomed to the habits of the animal
were not slow in interpreting, that travellers were
on the mountain. The good clavier knew that the
party of the Baron de Willading was about to
cross the Col, for he had hurried home to be in
readiness to receive them; and foreseeing the
probability that they had been overtaken by the
storm of the previous night, he was foremost in
joining the servants who went forth to their
succor
.
The little flask of cordial, too, had been
removed from the collar of Uberto, leaving no
doubt of its contents having been used; and, as
nothing was more probable than that the traveller
should seek a cover, their steps were directed
towards
the Refuge as a matter of course.
The worthy clavier made this explanation with
eyes that glistened with moisture, occasionally
interrupting
himself to murmur a prayer of
thanksgiving
.
He passed from one of the party to the
other, not even neglecting the muleteers,
examining
their limbs, and more especially their ears, to
see that they had quite escaped the influence of
the frost, and was only happy when assured by
his own observation that the terrible danger they
had run was not likely to be attended by any
injurious
consequences.
We are accustomed to see many accidents of
this nature, he said, smilingly, when the
examination
was satisfactorily ended, and practice has
made us quick of sight in these matters. The
blessed Maria be praised, and adoration to her holy
Son, that you have all got through the night so
well! There is a warm breakfast in readiness in
the convent kitchen, and, one solemn duty
performed
,
we will go up the rocks to enjoy it. The little
building near us is the last earthly abode of those
who perish on this side the mountain, and whose
remains are unclaimed. None of our canons pass
the spot without offering a prayer in behalf of their
souls. Kneel with me, then, you that have so much
reason to be grateful to God, and join in the
petition
.
Father Xavier knelt on the rocks, and all the
Catholics of the party united with him in the prayer
for the dead. The Baron de Willading, his
daughter
and their attendants stood uncovered the while,
M 2
for though their Protestant opinions rejected such
a mediation as useless, they deeply felt the
solemnity
and holy character of the sacrifice. The
clavier arose with a countenance that was beaming
and bright as the morning sun which, just at that
moment, appeared above the summits of the Alps,
casting its genial and bland warmth on the group,
the brown huts, and the mountain side.
Thou art a heretic, he said affectionately
to Adelheid, in whom he felt the interest, to which
her youth and beauty, and the great danger they
had so lately run in company, very naturally gave
birth. Thou art an impenitent heretic, but we
will not cast thee off; notwithstanding thy obstinacy
and crimes, thou seest that the saints can interest
themselves in the behalf of obstinate sinners, or thou
and all with thee would have surely been lost.
This was said in a way to draw a smile from
Adelheid, who received his accusations as so many
friendly and playful reproaches. As a token of
peace between them, she offered her hand to the
monk, with a request that he would aid her in
getting into the saddle.
Dost thou remark the brutes! said the Signor
Grimaldi, pointing to the animals, who were gravely
seated before the window of the bone-house, with
relaxed jaws, keeping their eyes riveted on its
entrance, or window. Thy St. Bernard dogs,
father, seem trained to serve a Christian in all ways,
whether living or dead.
Their quiet attitude and decent attention might
indeed justify such a remark! Didst thou ever note
such conduct in Uberto before? returned the
Augustine, addressing the servants of the convent,
for the actions of the animals were a study and a
subject of great interest to all of St. Bernard.
They tell me that another fresh body has been
put into the house, since I last came down the
mountain, remarked Pierre, who was quietly
disposing
of a mule in a manner more favorable for
Adelheid to mount: the mastiff scents the dead.
It was this that brought him to the Refuge last
night. Heaven be praised for the mercy!
This was said with the indifference that habit is
apt to create, for the usage of leaving bodies
uninterred
had no influence on the feelings of the
guide, but it did not the less strike those who had
descended from the convent.
Thou art the last that came down thyself, said
one of the servants; nor have any come up, but
those who are now safe in the convent, taking their
rest after last night's tempest.
How canst utter this idle nonsense, Henri, when
a fresh body is in the house! This lady counted
them but now, and there are four; three was the
number that I showed the Piedmontese noble whom
I led from Aoste, the day thou meanest!
Look to this; said the clavier, turning abruptly
away from Adelheid, whom he was on the point
of helping into the saddle.
The men entered the gloomy vault, whence they
soon returned bearing a body, which they placed
with its back against the wall of the building, in
the open air. A cloak was over the head and face,
as if the garment had been thus arranged to
exclude
the cold.
He hath perished the past night, mistaking the
bone-house for the Refuge! exclaimed the clavier:
Maria and her Son intercede for his soul!
Is the unfortunate man truly dead? asked the
Genoese with more of worldly care, and with
greater practice in the investigation of facts. The
frozen sleep long before the currents of life cease
entirely to run.
The Augustine commanded his followers to
remove
the cloak, though with little hope that the
suggestion of the other would prove true. When
the cloth was raised, the collapsed and pallid
features
of one in whom life was unequivocally extinct
were exposed to view. Unlike most of those that
perish of cold, who usually sink into the long sleep
of eternity by a gradual numbness and a slowly
increasing unconsciousness, there was an
expression
of pain in the countenance of the stranger
which seemed to announce that his parting struggles
had been severe, and that he had resigned his hold
of that mysterious principle which connects the
soul to the body, with anguish. A shrick from
Christine interrupted the awful gaze of the
travellers
,
and drew their looks in another direction. She
was clinging to the neck of Adelheid, her arms
appearing to writhe with the effort to incorporate
their two bodies into one.
It is he! It is he! muttered the frightened
and half frantic girl, burying her pale face in the
bosom of her friend. Oh! God!it is he!
Of whom art thou speaking, dear? demanded
the wondering, but not the less awe-struck.
Adelheid
,
believing that the weakened nerves of the
poor girl were unstrung by the horror of the
spectacle
it
is a traveller like ourselves, that has
unhappily
perished in the very storm from which, by
the kindness of Providence, we have been permitted
to escape. Thou shouldst not tremble thus; for,
fearful as it is, he is in a condition to which we all
must come.
So soon! so soon! so suddenlyoh! it is he!
Adelheid, alarmed at the violence of Christine's
feelings, was quite at a loss to account for them,
when the relapsed grasp and the dying voice showed
that her friend had fainted. Sigismund was one
of the first to come to the assistance of his sister,
who was soon restored to consciousness by the
ordinary applications. In order to effect the cure,
she was borne to a rock at some little distance
from the rest of the party, where none of the other
sex presumed to come, with the exception of her
brother. The latter staid but a moment, for a stir
in the little party at the bone-house induced him
to go thither. His return was slow, thoughtful,
and sad.
The feelings of our poor Christine have been
unhinged, and she is too easily excited to undergo
the vicissitudes of a journey, observed Adelheid,
after having announced the restoration of the
sufferer
to her senses; have you seen her thus
before
?
No angel could be more tranquil and happy
than my cruelly treated sister was until this last
disgrace;you appear ignorant yourself of the
melancholy truth?
Adelheid looked her surprise.
The dead man is he who was so lately intended
to be the master of my sister's happiness, and the
wounds on his body leave little doubt that he has
been murdered.
The emotion of Christine needed no further
explanation.
Murdered! repeated Adelheid, in a whisper.
Of that frightful truth there can be no question.
Your father and our friends are now employed in
making the examinations which may hereafter be
useful in discovering the authors of the deed.
Sigismund?
What wouldst thou, Adelheid?
Thou hast felt resentment against this
unfortunate
man?
I deny it not: could a brother feel otherwise?
But nownow that God hath so fearfully
visited
him?
From my soul I forgive him. Had we met
in Italy, whither I knew he was goingbut this is
foolish.
Worse than that, Sigismund.
From my inmost soul I pardon him. I never
thought him worthy of her whose simple affections
were won by the first signs of his pretended
interest
;
but I could not wish him so cruel and
sudden
an end. May God have mercy on him, as he
is pardoned by me!
Adelheid received the silent pressure of the hand
which followed with pious satisfaction. They then
separated, he to join the group that was collected
around the body, and she to take her station again
near Christine. The former, however, was met by
the Signor Grimaldi, who urged his immediate
departure
with the females for the convent, promising
that the rest of the travellers should follow as soon
as the present melancholy duty was ended. As
Sigismund
had no wish to be a party in what was
going on, and there was reason to think his sister
would be spared much pain by quitting the spot,
he gladly acquiesced in the proposal. Immediate
steps were taken for its accomplishment.
Christine mounted her mule, in obedience to her
brother's desire, quietly, and without remonstrance;
but her death-like countenance and fixed eye
betrayed the violence of the shock she had received.
During the whole of the ride to the convent she
spoke not, and, as those around her felt for, and
understood, her distress, the little cavalcade could
not have been more melancholy and silent had it
borne with it the body of the slain. In an hour
they reached the long sought for and so anxiously
desired place of rest.
While this disposition of the feebler portion of
the party was making, a different scene had taken
place near what have been already so well called
the houses of the living and the dead. As there
existed
no human habitation within several leagues of the
abode of the Augustines on either side of the
mountain
,
and as the paths were much frequented in the
summer, the monks exercised a species of civil
jurisdiction
in such cases as required a prompt exercise
of justice, or a necessary respect for those forms that
might be important in its administration hereafter
before
the more regular authorities. It was no sooner
known, therefore, that there was reason to suspect
an act of violence had been committed, than the
good clavier set seriously about taking the
necessary
steps to authenticate all those circumstances
that could be accurately ascertained.
The identity of the body as that of Jacques Colis,
a small but substantial proprietor of the country
of Vaud, was quickly established. To this fact
not only several of the travellers could testify, but
he was also known to one of the muleteers, of
whom he had engaged a beast to be left at Aoste;
and, it will also be remembered, he had been seen by
Pierre at Martigny, while making his arrangements
to pass the mountain. Of the mule there were no
other traces than a few natural signs around the
building, but which might equally be attributed to
the beasts that still awaited the leisure of the
travellers
.
The manner in which the unhappy man
had come by his death admitted of no dispute.
There were several wounds in the body, and a
knife, of the sort then much used by travellers of
an ordinary class, was left sticking in his back in
a position to render it impossible to attribute the
end of the sufferer to suicide. The clothes, too,
exhibited proofs of a struggle, for they were torn
and soiled, but nothing had been taken away. A
little gold was found in the pockets, and though in
no great plenty still enough to weaken the first
impression
that there had also been a robbery.
This is wonderful! observed the good clavier,
as he noted the last circumstance; the dross
which leads so many souls to damnation has been
neglected, while Christina blood has been shed!
This seems an act of vengeance rather than of
cupidity. Let us now examine if any proofs are
to be found of the scene of this tragedy.
The search was unsuccessful. The whole of
the surrounding region being composed of
ferruginous
rocks and their
dbris
, it would not, indeed,
have been an easy matter to trace the march of
an army by their footsteps. The stain of blood,
however, was nowhere discoverable, except on
the spot where the body had been found. The
house itself furnished no particular evidence of the
bloody scene of which it had been a witness. The
bones of those who had died long before were
lying
on the stones, it is true, broken and scattered;
but, as the curious were wont to stop, and
sometimes
to enter among and handle these remains of
mortality, there was nothing new or peculiar in
their present condition.
The interior of the dead-house was obscure, and
suited, in this particular at least, to its solemn office.
While making the latter part of their examination,
the monk and the two nobles, who began to feel a
lively interest in the late event, stood before the
window, gazing in at the gloomy but instructive
scene. One body was so placed as to receive a
few of the direct rays of the morning light, and it
was consequently much more conspicuous than the
rest, though even this was a dark and withered
mummy that presented scarcely a vestige of the
being it had been. Like all the others whose parts
still clung together, it had been placed against the
wall, in the attitude of one that is seated, with the
head fallen forward. The latter circumstnace had
brought the blackened and shrivelled face into the
line of light. It had the ghastly grin of death, the
features being distorted by the process of
evaporation
,
and was altogether a revolting but salutary
monitor of the common lot.
'Tis the body of the poor vine-dresser;
remarked
the monk, more accustomed to the
spectacle
than his companions, who had shrunk from the
sight; he unwisely slept on yonder naked rock,
and it proved to him the sleep of death. There
have been many masses for his soul, but what is
left of his material remains still lie unclaimed.
Buthow is this! Pierre, thou hast lately passed
this place; what was the number of the bodies, at
thy last visit?
Three, reverend clavier; and yet the ladies
spoke of four. I looked for the fourth when in the
building, but there appeared none fresh, except this
of poor Jacques Colis.
Come hither, and say if there do not appear
to be two in the far cornerhere, where the body
of thy old comrade the guide was placed, from
respect for his calling; surely, there at least is a
change in its position!
Pierre approached, and taking off his cap in
reverence, he leaned forward in the building, so
as to exclude the external light from his eyes.
Father! he said, drawing back in surprise,
there is truly another; though I overlooked it
when we entered the place.
This must be examined into! The crime may
be greater than we had believed!
The servants of the convent and Pierre, whose
long services rendered him a familiar of the
brotherhood
,
now re-entered the building, while those
without impatiently awaited the result. A cry from
the interior prepared the latter for some fresh
subject
of horror, when Pierre and his companion
quickly reappeared, dragging a living man into the
Vol. II. N
open air. When the light permitted, those who
knew him recognized the mild demeanor, the
subdued
look, and the uneasy, distrustful glance of
Balthazar.
The first sensation of the spectators was that
of open amazement; but dark suspicion followed.
The baron, the two Genoese, and the monk, had
all been witnesses of the scene in the great square
of Vvey. The person of the headman had
become
so well known to them by the passage on
the lake and the event just alluded to, that there
was not a moment of doubt touching his identity,
and, coupled with the circumstances of that
morning
,
there remained little more that the clue was
now found to the cause of the murder.
We shall not stop to relate the particulars of
the examination. It was short, reserved, and had
the character of an investigation instituted more
for the sake of form, than from any incertitude
there could exist on the subject of the facts. When
the necessary inquiries were ended, the two nobles
mounted. Father Xavier led the way, and the
whole party proceeded towards the summit of the
pass, leading Balthazar a prisoner, and leaving
the body of Jacques Colis to its final rest, in that
place where so many human forms had
evaporated
into air before him, unless those who had
felt an interest in him in life should see fit to claim
his remains.
The ascent between the Refuge and the summit
of St. Bernard is much more severe than on any
other part of the road. The end of the convent,
overhanging the northern brow of the gorge, and
looking like a mass of that ferruginous and
melancholy
rock which gave the whole region so wild
and so unearthly an aspect, soon became visible,
carved and moulded into the shape of a rude
human habitation. The last pitch was so steep as
to be formed into a sort of stair-way, up which
the groaning mules toiled with difficulty. This
labor overcome, the party stood on the highest
point of the pass. Another minute brought them
to the door of the convent.
CHAPTER X.
Hadst thou not been by,
A fellow by the hand of nature mark'd,
Noted, and sign'd to do a deed of shame,
This murder had not come into my mind.
Shakspeare
.
The
arrival of Sigismund's party at the hospice
preceded that of the other travellers more than an
hour. They were received with the hospitality
with which all were then welcomed at this
celebrated
convent; the visits of the curious and the
vulgar not having blunted the benevolence of the
monks, who, mostly accustomed to entertain the
low-born and ignorant, were always happy to
relieve
the monotony of their solitude by intercourse
with guests of a superior class. The good clavier
had prepared the way for their reception; for even
on the wild ridge of St. Bernard, we do not fare
the worse for carrying with us a prestige of that
rank and consideration that are enjoyed in the
world below. Although a mild Christian-like
goodwill
were manifested to all, the heiress of
Willading
,
a name that was generally known and honored
between the Alps and the Jura, met with those
proofs of
empressement
and deference which betray
the secret thought, in despite of conventional forms,
and which told her, plainer than the words of
welcome
,
that the retired Augustines were not sorry
to see so fair and so noble a specimen of their
species within their dreary walls.
All this, however, was lost on Sigismund. He
was too much occupied with the events of the
morning to note other things; and, first
committing
Adelheid and his sister to the care of their
women, he went into the open air in order to await
the arrival of the rest.
As it has been mentioned, the existence of the
venerable convent of St. Bernard dates from a
very remote period of Christianity. It stands on
the very brow of the precipice which forms the
last steep ascent in mounting to the Col. The
building is a high, narrow, but vast,
barrack-looking
edifice, built of the ferruginous stone of the
region, having its gable placed toward the Valais,
and its front stretching in the direction of the
gorge in which it stands. Immediately before its
principal door, the rock rises in an ill-shapen
hillock
,
across which runs the path to Italy. This is
literally the highest point of the pass, as the
building
itself is the most elevated habitable abode in
Europe. At this spot, the distance from rock to
rock, spanning the gorge, may be a hundred yards,
the wild and reddish piles rising on each side for
more than a thousand feet. These are merely
dwarfs, however, among their sister piles, several
of which, in plain view of the convent, reach to
the height of eternal snow. This point in the
road attained, the path began immediately to
descend
,
and the drippings of a snow-bank before
the convent door, which had resisted the greatest
heat of the past summer, ran partly into the
valley
of the Rhone, and partly into Piedmont; the
waters, after a long and devious course through
the plains of France and Italy, meeting again in
the common basin of the Mediterranean. The
path, on quitting the convent, runs between the
base of the rocks on its right and a little limpid
lake on its left, the latter occupying nearly the
entire cavity of the valley of the gorge. It then
disappears between natural palisades of rock, at
the other extremity of the Col. This is the point
where the superfluous waters of the lake find their
outlet, descending swiftly, in a brawling little
brook, on the sunny side of the Alps. The frontier
of Italy is met on the margin of the lake, a long
musket-shot from the abode of the Augustines, and
near the site of a temple that the Romans had
raised in honor of Jupiter, in his attribute of
director
of storms.
Such was the outline of the view which
presented
itself to Sigismund, when he left the building to
while away the time that must necessarily elapse
before the arrival of the rest of the party. The
hour was still early, though the great altitude of
the site of the convent had brought it beneath the
influence of the sun's rays an hour before. He
had learned from a servant of the Augustines, that
a number of ordinary travellers, of whom in the
fine season hundreds at a time frequently passed
the night in their dormitories, were now breaking
their fasts in the refectory of the peasants, and he
was willing to avoid the questions that their
curiosity
might prompt when they came to hear what
had occurred lower down on the mountain. One
of the brotherhood was caressing four or five
enormous mastiffs, that were leaping about and
barking with deep throats in front of the convent,
while old Uberto moved among them with a gravity
and respect that better suited his years. Perceiving
his guest, the Augustine quitted the dogs, and,
lifting
his eastern-looking cap, he gave him the
salutation
of the morning. Sigismund met the frank
smile of the canon, who like himself was young,
N 2
with a fit return. The occasion was such as
Sigismund
desired, and a friendly discourse succeeded
while they paced along the margin of the lake,
holding the path that leads across the Col.
You are young in your charitable office,
brother
,
remarked the soldier, when familiarity was
a little established. This will be among the first
of the winters you will have passed at your
benevolent
post?
It will make the eighth, as novice and as canon.
We are early trained to this kind of life, though
no practice will enable any of us to withstand the
effect which the thin air and intense cold produce
on the lungs many winters in succession. We go
down to Martigny when there is occasion, and
breathe an atmosphere better suited to man. Thou
hadst an angry storm below, the past night?
So angry, that we thank God it is over, and
that we are left to share your hospitality. Were
there many on the mountain besides ourselves, or
did any come up from Italy?
There were none but those who are now in
the common refectory, and none came from Aoste.
The season for the traveller is over. This is a
month in which we see only those who are much
pressed, and who have their reasons for trusting
the weather. In the summer we sometimes lodge
a thousand guests.
They whom ye receive have reason to be
thankful, reverend Augustine; for, in sooth, this
does not seem a region that abounds in its fruits.
Sigismund and the monk looked around at the
vast piles of ragged naked rocks, and they smiled
as their eyes met.
Nature gives literally nothing, answered the
Augustine: even the fuel that warms us is
transported
leagues on the backs of mules, and thou
wilt readily conceive that of all others this is a
necessary we cannot forego. Happily, we have
some of our ancient, and what were once rich,
endowments; and
The young canon hesitated to proceed.
You were about to say, father, that they who
have the means to show gratitude are not always
unmindful of the wants of those, who share the
same hospitality without possessing the same ability
to manifest their respect for the institution.
The Augustine bowed, and he turned the
discourse
by pointing out the frontiers of Italy, and
the site of the ancient temple; both of which they
had this time reached. An animal moved among
the rocks, and attracted their attention.
Can it be a chamois! exclaimed Sigismund,
whose blood began to quicken with a hunter's
eagerness: I would I had arms!
It is a dog, though not of our mountain breed!
The mastiffs of the convent have failed in
hospitality
,
and the poor beast has been driven to take
refuge in this retired spot, in waiting for his master,
who probably makes one of the party in the
refectory
.
See, they come; their approaching
footsteps
have brought the cautious animal from his
cover.
Sigismund saw, in truth, that a party of three
pedestrians was quitting the convent, taking the
path for Italy. A sudden and painful suspicion
flashed upon his mind. The dog was Nettuno,
most probably driven by the mastiffs, as the monk
had suggested, to seek a shelter in this retreat; and
one of those who approached, by his gait and
stature, was no other than his master.
Thou knowest, father, he said, with a clammy
tongue, for he was strangely agitated between
reluctance to accuse Maso of such a crime, and
horror at the fate of Jacques Colis, that there has
been a murder on the mountain?
The monk quietly assented. One who lived on
that road, and in that age, was not easily excited
by an event of so frequent occurrence. Sigismund
hastily recounted to his companion all the
circumstances
that were then known to himself, and related
the manner in which he had first met the Italian on
the lake, and his general impressions concerning
his character.
All come and go unquestioned here; returned
the Augustine, when the other had ended. Our
convent has been founded in charity, and we pray
for the sinner without inquiring into the amount
of his crime. Still we have authority, and it is
especially our duty, to keep the road clear that our
own purposes may not be defeated. I leave thee
to do what thou judgest most prudent and proper
in a matter so delicate.
Sigismund was silent; but as the pedestrians
were drawing near, his resolution was soon and
sternly formed. The obligations that he owed to
Maso made him more prompt, for it excited a
jealous distrust of his own powers to discharge
what he conceived to be a duty. Even those late
events in which his sister was so wronged had their
share, too, on the decision of a mind so resolute to
be upright. Placing himself in the middle of the
path, he awaited the arrival of the party, while
the monk stood quietly at his side. When the
travellers
were within speaking distance, the young
man first discovered that the companions of Il
Maledetto were Pippo and Conrad. Their several
rencontres had made him sufficiently acquainted
with the persons of the two latter, to enable him
to recognize them at a glance; and Sigismund
began to think the undertaking in which he had
embarked more grave than he had at first imagined.
Should there be a disposition to resist, he was but
one against three.
Buon giorno, Signor Capitano, cried Maso,
saluting with his cap, when sufficiently near to
those who occupied the path; we meet often,
and in all weathers; by day and by night; on the
land and on the water; in the valley and on the
mountain; in the city and on this naked rock, as
Providence wills. As many chances try men's
characters, we shall come to know each other in
time!
Thou hast well observed, Maso; though I fear
thou art a man oftener met than easily understood.
Signore, I am amphibious, like Nettuno here,
being part of the earth and part of the sea. As
the learned say, I am not yet classed. We are
repaid for an evil night by a fine day; and the
descent into Italy will be pleasanter than we found
the coming up. Shall I order honest Giacomo of
Aoste to prepare the supper, and to air the beds
for the noble company that is to follow? You
will scarce do more than reach his holstery before
the young and the beautiful will begin to think of
their pillows.
Maso, I had thought thee among our party,
when I left the Refuge this morning?
By San Thomaso! Signore, but I had the
same opinion touching yourself!
Thou wert early afoot it would seem, or thou
couldst not have so much preceded me?
Look you, brave Signor Sigismondo, for brave
I know you to be, and in the water a swimmer
little less determined than gallant Nettuno thereI
am a traveller, and have much need of my time,
which is the larger portion of my property. We
sea-animals are sometimes rich and sometimes
poor, as the wind happens to blow, and of late I
have been driven to struggle with foul gales and
troubled waves. To such a man, an hour of
industry
in the morning often gives a heartier meal
and sweeter rest at night. I left you all in the
Refuge sleeping soundly, even to the mules,
Maso laughed at his own fancies, as he included
the brutes in the party,and I reached the
convent
just as the first touch of the sun tipped yonder
white peak with its purple light.
As thou left'st us so early, thou mayest not
have heard, then, that the body of a murdered man
was found in the bone-housethe building near
that in which we sleptand that it is the body of
one known?
Sigismund spoke firmly and deliberately, as if
he would come by degrees to his purpose, while,
at the same time, he made the other sensible of his
being in earnest. Maso started. He made a
movement
so unequivocally like one which would have
manifested an intention to proceed, that the young
man raised his hand to repulse him. But violence
was unnecessary, for the mariner instantly became
composed, and seemingly more disposed to listen.
Where there has been a crime, Maso, there
must have been a criminal!
The Bishop of Sion could not have made
truth clearer to the sinner than yourself, Signor
Sigismondo! Your manner leads me to ask what
I have to do with this?
There has been a murder, Maso, and the
murderer
is sought. The dead was found near the
spot where thou passed the night; I shall not
conceal
the unhappy suspicions that are so natural.
Diamine! where did you pass the night
yourself
,
brave Capitano, if I may be so bold as to
question my superior? Where did the noble Baron
de Willading take his rest, and his fair daughter,
and one nobler and more illustrious than he, and
Pierre the guide, anday, and our friends, the
mules again?
Maso laughed recklessly once more, as he made
this second allusion to the patient brutes.
Sigismund
disliked his levity, which he thought forced
and unnatural.
This reasoning may satisfy thee, unfortunate
man, but it will not satisfy others. Thou wert
alone, but we travelled in company; judging from
thy exterior, thou art but little favored by fortune,
whereas we are more happy in this particular;
and thou hast been, and art still, in haste to depart,
while the discovery of the foul deed is owing to us
alone. Thou must return to the convent, that this
grave matter may, at least, be examined.
Il Maledetto seemed troubled. Once or twice
he glanced his eye at the quiet athletic frame of
the young man, and then turned them on the path
in reflection. Although Sigismund narrowly
watched
the workings of his countenance, giving a little
of his attention also, from time to time, to the
movements of Pippo and the pilgrim, he preserved
himself a perfectly calm exterior. Firm in his
purpose, accustomed to make extraordinary
exertions
in his manly exercises, and conscious of his
great physical force, he was not a man to be easily
daunted. It is true that the companions of Maso
conducted themselves in a way to excite no
additional
apprehensions on their account; for, on the
announcement of the murder, they moved away
from his person a little, as by a natural horror of
the hand that could have done the deed. They
now consulted together, and profiting by their
situation
behind the back of the Italian, they made
signs to Sigismund of their readiness to assist should
it be necessary. He received the signal with
satisfaction
;
for, though he knew them to be knaves,
he sufficiently understood the difference between
audacious crime and mere roguery to believe they
might, in this instance at least, prove true.
Thou wilt return to the convent, Maso,
resumed
the young soldier, who would gladly avoid
a struggle with a man who had done him and those
he loved so much service, though resolved to
discharge
what he conceived to be an imperious
duty: this pilgrim and his friend will be of our
party, in order that, when we quit the mountain, all
may leave it blameless and unsuspected.
Signor Sigismondo, the proposal is fair; it has
a touch of reason, I allow; but unluckily it does
not suit my interests. I am engaged in a delicate
mission, and too much time has been already lost
by the way to waste more without good cause. I
have great pity for poor Jacques Colis
Ha! thou knowest the sufferer's name, then;
thy unlucky tongue hath betrayed thee, Maso!
Il Maledetto was again troubled. His features
betrayed it, for he frowned like a man who had
committed a grave fault in a matter touching an
important interest. His olive complexion changed,
and his interrogator thought that his eye quailed
before his own fixed look. But the emotion was
transient, and shuddering, as if to shake off a
weakness, his appearance became once more
natural
and composed.
Thou makest no reply?
Signore, you have my answer; affairs press,
and my visit to the convent of San Bernardo has
been made. I am bound to Aoste, and should be
happy to do your bidding with the worthy Giacomo.
I have but a step to make to find myself in the
dominions
of the house of Savoy; and, with your
leave, gallant Capitano, I will now take it.
Maso moved a little aside with the intention to
pass Sigismund, when Pippo and Conrad threw
themselves on him from behind, pinning his arms
to his sides by main force. The face of the Italian
grew livid, and he smiled with the contempt and
hatred of an inveterately angered man.
Assembling
all his force, he suddenly exerted it with the
energy and courage of a lion, shouting
Nettuno!
The struggle was short but fierce. When it
terminated
,
Pippo lay bleeding among the rocks with
a broken head, and the pilgrim was gasping near
him under the tremendous gripe of the animal.
Maso himself stood firm, though pale and frowning
like one who had collected all his energies, both
physical and moral, to meet this emergency.
Am I a brute, to be set upon by the scum of
the earth? he cried: if thou wouldst aught with
me, Signor Sigismondo, raise thine own arm, but
strike not with the hands of these base reptiles;
thou wilt find me a man, in strength and courage,
at least not unworthy of thyself.
The attack on thy person, Maso, was not
made by my order, nor by my desire, returned
Sigismund, reddening. I believe myself
sufficient
to arrest thee; and, if not, here come
assistants
that thou wilt scarce deem it prudent to
resist.
The Augustine had stepped on a rock the
moment
the struggle commenced, whence he made a
signal which brought all the mastiffs from the
convent
.
These powerful animals now arrived in a
group, apprized by their instinct that strife was
afoot. Nettuno immediately released the pilgrim
and stood at bay; too faithful to desert his master
in his need, and yet too conscious of the force
opposed
to him to court a contest so unequal.
Luckily
for the noble dog, the friendship of old Uberto
proved his protection. When the younger
animals
saw their patriarch disposed to amity, they
forbore their attack, waiting at least for another
signal to be given. In the mean while, Maso had
time to look about him, and to form his decision
Vol. II. O
less under the influence of surprise and feeling than
had been previously the case.
Signore, he answered, since it is your
pleasure
,
I will return among the Augustines. But I
ask, as simple justice, that, if I am to be hunted
by dogs as a beast of prey, all who were in the
same circumstances as myself may become
subject
to the same rule. This pilgrim and the
Neapolitan
came up the mountain yesterday, as well
as myself, and I demand their arrest until they too
can give an account of themselves. It will not be
the first time that we have been inhabitants of the
same prison.
Conrad crossed himself in submission, neither he
nor Pippo raising any objection to the step. On
the contrary, each frankly admitted it was no more
than equitable on its face.
We are poor travellers on whom many
accidents
have already alighted, and we may well be
pressed to reach the end of our journey, said the
pilgrim; but, that justice may be done, we shall
submit without a murmur. I am loaded with the
sins of many besides my own, however, and St.
Peter he knows that the last are not light. This
holy canon will see that masses are said in the
convent chapel in behalf of those for whom I
travel
;
this duty done, I am an infant in your hands.
The good Augustine professed the perfect
readiness
of the fraternity to pray for all who were in
necessity, with the single proviso that they should
be Christians. With this amicable understanding
then, the peace was made between them, and the
parties immediately took the path that led back to
the convent. On reaching the building, Maso, with
the two travellers who had been found in his
company
,
were placed in safe keeping in one of the
rooms of the solid edifice, until the return of the
clavier should enable them to vindicate their
innocence
.
Satisfied with himself for the part he had acted
in the late affair, Sigismund strolled into the
chapel
,
where, at that early hour, some of the
brotherhood
were always occupied in saying masses in
behalf of the souls of the living or of the dead.
He was here when he received a note from the
Signor Grimaldi, apprizing him of the arrest of
his father, and of the dark suspicions that were so
naturally connected with the transaction. It is
unnecessary to dwell on the nature of the shock
he received from this intelligence. After a few
moments of bitter anguish, he perceived the
urgency
of making his sister acquainted with the
truth as speedily as possible. The arrival of the
party from the Refuge was expected every
moment
,
and by delay he increased the risk of
Christine's
hearing the appalling fact from some other
quarter. He sought an audience, therefore, with
Adelheid, the instant he had summoned sufficient
self-command to undertake the duty.
Mademoiselle de Willading was struck with the
pale brow and agitated air of the young soldier, at
the first glance of her eye.
Thou hast permitted this unexpected blow to
affect thee unusually, Sigismund, she said,
smiling
,
and offering her hand; for she felt that the
circumstances were those in which cold and
heartless
forms should give place to feeling and
sincerity
.
Thy sister is tranquil, if not happy.
She does not know the worstshe has yet to
learn the most cruel part of the truth, Adelheid;
they have found one concealed among the dead of
the bone-house, and are now leading him here as
the murderer of poor Jacques Colis!
Another! said Adelheid, turning pale in alarm;
we appear to be surrounded by assassins!
No, it cannot be true! I know my poor
father's
mildness of disposition too well; his
habitual
tenderness to all around him; his horror at the
sight of blood, even for his odious task!
Sigismund, thy father!
The young man groaned. Concealing his face
with his hands, he sank into a seat. The fearful
truth, with all its causes and consequences, began
to dawn upon Adelheid. Sinking upon a chair
herself, she sat long looking at the convulsed and
working frame of Sigismund in silent horror. It
appeared to her, that Providence, for some great
but secret purpose, was disposed to visit them all
with more than a double amount of its anger, and
that a family which had been accursed for so
many generations, was about to fill the measure
of its woes. Still her own true heart did not
change. On the contrary, its long-cherished and
secret purpose rather grew stronger under this
sudden appeal to its generous and noble properties,
and never was the resolution to devote herself, her
life, and all her envied hopes, to the solace of his
unmerited wrongs, so strong and riveted as at that
trying moment.
In a little time Sigismund regained enough
self-command
to be able to commence the narrative of
what had passed. They then concerted together
the best means to make Christine acquainted with
that which it was absolutely necessary she should
now know.
Tell her the simple truth, added Sigismund;
it cannot long be concealed, and it were better
that she knew it; but tell her, also, my firm
dependence
on our father's innocence. God, for one
of those inscrutable purposes which set human
intelligence
at defiance, has made him a common
executioner, but the curse has not extended to his
nature. Trust me, dearest Adelheid, a more gentle
dove-like nature does not exist in man than that
of the poor Balthazarthe despised and persecuted
Balthazar. I have heard my mother dwell upon
the nights of anguish and suffering that have
preceded
the day on which the duties of his office
were to be discharged; and often have I heard that
admirable woman, whose spirit is far more equal
to support our unmerited fortunes, declare she has
often prayed that he and all that are hers might
die, so that they died innocently, rather than one
of a temper so gentle and harmless should again
be brought to endure the agony she had witnessed!
It is unhappy that he should be here at so
luckless a moment! What unhappy motive can
have led thy father to this spot, at a time so
extraordinary
?
Christine will tell thee that she expected to see
him at the convent. We are a race proscribed,
Mademoiselle de Willading, but we are human.
Dearest Sigismund
I feel my injustice, and can only pray to be
forgiven. But there are moments of feeling so
intense, that I am ready to believe and treat all of
my species as common enemies. Christine is an
only daughter, and thou thyself, beloved Adelheid,
kind, dutiful, and good as I know thee to be, art
not more dear to the Baron de Willading than my
poor sister is among us. Her parents have yielded
her to thy generous kindness, for they believe it
for her good; but their hearts have been wrung
by the separation. Thou didst not know it, but
Christine took her last embrace of her mother here
on the mountain, at Liddes, and it was then agreed
that her father should watch her in safety over the
Col, and bestow the final blessing at Aoste.
Mademoiselle
de Willading, you move in pride,
surrounded
by many protectors, who are honored in
doing you service; but the abased and the hunted
O 2
must indulge even their best affections stealthily,
and without obtrusion! The love and tenderness
of Balthazar would pass for mockery with the
vulgar! Such is man in his habits and opinions,
when wrong usurps the place of right.
Adelheid saw that the moment was not favorable
for urging consolation, and she abstained from a
reply. She rejoiced, however, to hear the presence
of the headsman so satisfactorily accounted for,
though she could not quiet herself from an
apprehension
that the universal weakness of human
nature
,
which so suddenly permits the perversion of
the best of our passions to the worst, and the
dreadful
probability that Balthazar, suffering intensely
by this compelled separation from his daughter, on
accidentally encountering the man who was its
cause, might have listened to some violent impulse
of resentment and revenge. She saw also that
Sigismund, in despite of his general confidence in
the principles of his father, had fearful glimmerings
of some such event, and that he fearfully anticipated
the worst, even while he most professed confidence
in the innocence of the accused. The interview
was soon ended, and they separated; each
endeavoring
to invent plausible reasons for what had
happened.
The arrival of the party from the refuge took
place soon afterwards. It was followed by the
necessary explanations, and a more detailed
narrative
of all that had passed. A consultation was
held between the chiefs of the brotherhood and the
two old nobles, and the course it was most expedient
to pursue was calmly and prudently discussed.
The result was not known for some hours later.
It was then generally proclaimed in the convent
that a grave and legal investigation of all the facts
was to take place with the least possible delay.
The Col of St. Bernard, as has been stated
already
,
lies within the limits of the present canton,
but what then the allied state of the Valais. The
crime had consequently been committed within the
jurisdiction of that country; but as the Valais was
thus leagued with Switzerland, there existed such
an intimate understanding between the two, that it
was rare any grave proceedings were had against
a citizen of either in the dominion of the other,
without paying great deference to the feelings and
the rights of the country of the accused.
Messengers
were therefore dispatched to Vvey, to inform
the authorities of that place of a transaction which
involved the safety of an officer of the great
canton
,
(for such was Balthazar,) and which had cost
a citizen of Vaud his life. On the other hand, a
similar communication was sent to Sion, the two
places being about equidistant from the convent,
with such pressing invitations to the authorities to
be prompt, as were deemed necessary to bring on
an immediate investigation. Melchior de Willading,
in a letter to his friend the bailiff, set forth the
inconvenience
of his return with Adelheid at that
late season, and the importance of the functionary's
testimony, with such other statements as were likely
to effect his wishes; while the superior of the
brotherhood
charged himself with making
representations
,
with a similar intent, to the heads of his own
republic. Justice in that age was not administered
as frankly and openly as in this later period, its
agents in the old world exercising even now a
discretion
that we are not accustomed to see confided
to them. Her proceedings were enveloped in
darkness
,
the blind deity being far more known in her
decrees than in her principles, and mystery was
then deemed an important auxiliary of power.
With this brief explanation we shall shift the
time to the third day from that on which the
travellers
reached the convent, referring the reader to
the succeeding chapter for an account of what it
brought forth.
CHAPTER XI.
Anon a figure enters, quaintly neat,
All pride and business, bustle and conceit;
With looks unalter'd by these scenes of woe,
With speed that, ent'ring, speaks his haste to go.
He bids the gazing throng around him fly,
And carries fate and physic in his eye.
Crabbe
.
There
is another receptacle for those who die
on the Great St. Bernard, hard by the convent
itself. At the close of the time mentioned in the
last chapter, and near the approach of night,
Sigismund
was pacing the rocks on which this little
chapel stands, buried in reflections to which his
own history and the recent events had given birth.
The snow that fell during the late storm had
entirely
disappeared, and the frozen element was now
visible only on those airy pinnacles that form the
higher peaks of the Alps. Twilight had already
settled into the lower valleys, but the whole of the
superior region was glowing with the fairy-like
lustre of the last rays of the sun. The air was
chill, for at that hour and season, whatever might
be the state of the weather, the evening invariably
brought with it a positive sensation of cold in the
gorge of St. Bernard, where frosts prevailed a
night, even in midsummer. Still the wind, though
strong, was balmy and soft, blowing athwart the
heated plains of Lombardy, and reaching the
mountains charged with the moisture of the
Adriatic
and the Mediterranean. As the young man
turned in his walk, and faced this breeze, it came
over his spirit with a feeling of hope and home.
The greater part of his life had been past in the
sunny country whence it blew, and there were
moments when he was lulled into forgetfulness, by
the grateful recollections imparted by its fragrance.
But when compelled to turn northward again, and
his eye fell on the misty hoary piles that
distinguished
his native land, rude and ragged faces of rock,
frozen glaciers, and deep ravine-like valleys and
glens, seemed to him to be types of his own stormy,
unprofitable, and fruitless life, and to foretell a
career which, though it might have touches of
grandeur, was doomed to be barren of all that is
genial and consolatory.
All in and about the convent was still. The
mountain
had an imposing air of deep solitude amid the
wildest natural magnificence. Few travellers had
passed since the storm, and, luckily for those who,
under the peculiar circumstances in which they
were placed, so much desired privacy, all of these
had diligently gone their several ways. None
were left, therefore, on the Col, but those who had
an interest in the serious investigations which were
about to take place. An officer of justice from
Sion, wearing the livery of the Valais, appeared
at a window, a sign that the regular authorities of
the country had taken cognizance of the murder;
but disappearing, the young man, to all external
appearance
,
was left in the solitary possession of the
pass. Even the dogs had been kennelled, and the
pious monks were healthfully occupied in the
religious
offices of the vespers.
Sigismund turned his eye upward to the
apartment
in which Adelheid and his sister dwelt, but
as the solemn moment in which so much was to be
decided drew nearer, they also had withdrawn
into themselves, ceasing to hold communion, even
by means of the eyes, with aught that might divert
their holy and pure thoughts from ceaseless and
intense devotional reflections. Until now he had
been occasionally favored with an answering and
kind look from one or the other of these
single-hearted
and affectionate girls, both of whom he
so warmly loved, though with sentiments so
different
.
It seemed that they too had at last left him
to his isolated and hopeless existence. Sensible
that this passing thought was weak and unmanly,
the young man renewed his walk, and, instead of
turning as before, he moved slowly on, stopping
only when he had reached the opening of the little
chapel of the dead.
Unlike the building lower down the path, the
bone-house at the convent is divided into two
apartments
;
the exterior, and one that may be called
the interior, though both are open to the weather.
The former contained piles of disjointed human
bones, bleached by the storms that beat in at the
windows, while the latter is consecrated to the
covering of those that still preserve, in their
outward
appearance at least, some of the more
familiar
traces of humanity. The first had its usual
complement of dissevered and confounded
fragments
,
in which the remains of young and old, of
the two sexes, the fierce and the meek, the
penitent
and the sinner, lay in indiscriminate confusion
an eloquent reproach to the pride of man; while
the walls of the last supported some twenty
blackened
and shrivelled effigies of the race, to show
to what a pass of disgusting and frightful
deformity
the human form can be reduced, when
deprived
of that noble principle which likens it to its
Divine Creator. On a table, in the centre of a
group of black and grinning companions in
misfortune
,
sat all that was left of Jacques Colis, who
had been removed from the bone-house below to
this at the convent for purposes connected with the
coming investigation. The body was accidentally
placed in such an attitude that the face was brought
within the line of the parting light, while it had no
other covering than the clothes worn by the
murdered
man in life. Sigismund gazed long at the
pallid lineaments. They were still distorted with
the agony produced by separating the soul from
the body. All feeling of resentment for his sister's
wrongs was lost in pity for the fate that had so
suddenly overtaken one, in whom the passions, the
interests, and the complicated machinery of this
state of being, were so actively at work. Then
came the bitter apprehension that his own father,
in a moment of ungovernable anger, excited by
the accumulated wrongs that bore so hard on him
and his, might really have been the instrument of
effecting the fearful and sudden change.
Sickening
with the thought, the young man turned and
walked away towards the brow of the declivity.
Voices, ascending to his ear, recalled him to the
actual situation of things.
A train of mules were climbing the last acclivity
where the path takes the broken precipitous
appearance
of a flight of steps. The light was still
sufficient to distinguish the forms and general
appearance
of the travellers. Sigismund
immediately
recognized them to be the bailiff of Vvey and
his attendants, for whose arrival the formal
proceedings
of the examination had alone been stayed.
A fair evening, Herr Sigismund, and a happy
meeting, cried Peterchen, so soon as his weary
mule, which frequently halted under its unwieldy
urthen, had brought him within hearing. Little
did I think to see thee again so quickly, and less
still to lay eyes on this holy convent; for though
the traveller might have returned in thy person,
nothing short of a miracle Here the bailiff
winked, for he was one of those Protestants whose
faith was most manifested in these side-hits at the
opinions and practices of Rome,Nothing but a
miracle, I say, and that too a miracle of some saint
whose bones have been drying these ten thousand
years, until every morsel of our weak flesh has
fairly disappeared, could bring down old St.
Bernard's
abode upon the shores of the Leman. I
have known many who have left Vaud to cross
the Alps come back and winter in Vvey; but
never did I know the stone that was placed upon
another, in a workman-like manner, quits its bed
without help from the hand of man. They say
stones are particularly hard-hearted, and yet your
saint and miracle-monger hath a way to move
them!
Peterchen chuckled at his own pleasantry, as
men in authority are apt to enjoy that which
comes exclusively of their own cleverness, and he
winked round among his followers, as if he would
invite them to bear witness to the rap he had given
the Papists, even on their own exclusive ground.
When the platform of the Col was attained, he
checked the mule and continued his address, for
want of wind had nipped his wit, as it might be, in
the bud.
A bad business this, Herr Sigismund; a
thoroughly
bad affair. It has drawn me far from
home, at a ticklish season, and it has unexpectedly
stopped the Herr von Willading (he spoke in
German
)
in his journey over the mountains, and that,
too, at a moment when all had need be diligent
among the Alps. How does the keen air of the
Col agree with the fair Adelheid?
God be thanked, Herr Bailiff, in bodily health
that excellent young lady was never better.
God be thanked, right truly! She is a tender
flower, and one that might be suddenly cut off by
the frosts of St Bernard. And the noble Genoese,
who travels with so much modest simplicity, in a
way to reprove the vain and idleI hope he does
not miss the sun among our rocks?
He is an Italian, and must think of us and our
climate according to his habits; though in the way
of health he seems at his ease.
Well, this is consolatory! Herr Sigismund,
were the truth known, rejoined Peterchen,
bending
as far forward on his mule as a certain
protuberance
of his body would permit, and then
suddenly
drawing himself up again in reservebut
a state secret is a state secret, and least of all
should it escape one who is truly and legitimately
a child of the state. My love and friendship for
Melchior von Willading are great, and of right
excellent quality; but I should not have visited
this pass, were it not to do honor to our guest the
Genoese. I would not that the noble stranger went
down from our hills with an unsavory opinion of
our hospitality. Hath the honorable Chtelain
from Sion reached the hill?
He has been among us since the turn of the
day, mein Herr, and is now in conference with
those you have just named, on matters connected
with the object of your common visit.
He is an honest magistrate! and like ourselves,
Master Sigismund, he comes of the pure German
root, which is a foundation to support merit, though
it might better be said by another. Had he a
comfortable
ride?
I have heard no complaint of his ascent.
'T is well. When the magistrate goes forth to
do justice, he hath a right to look for a fair time.
All are then comfortable;the noble Genoese, the
honorable Melchior, and the worthy Chtelain.
And Jacques Colis?
You know his unhappy fate, Herr Bailiff,
returned
Vol. II. P
Sigismund briefly; for he was a little vexed
with the other's phlegm in a matter that so nearly
touched his own feelings.
If I did not know it, Herr Steinbach, dost think
I should now be here, instead of preparing for a
warm bed near the great square of Vvey? Poor
Jacques Colis! Well, he did the ceremonies of
the abbaye an ill turn in refusing to buckle with
the headsman's daughter, but I do not know
that he at all deserved the fate with which he
has met.
God forbid that any who were hurt, and that
perhaps not without reason, by his want of faith,
should think his weakness merited a punishment
so heavy!
Thou speakest like a sensible youth, a very
sensible youthay, and like a Christian, Herr
Sigismund
,
answered Peterchen, and I approve of
thy words. To refuse to wive a maiden and to
be murdered are very different offences, and should
not be confounded. Dost think these Augustines
keep kirschwasser among their stores? It is
strong work to climb up to their abode, and strong
toil needs strong drink. Well, should they not be
so provided, we must make the best of their other
liquors. Herr Sigismund, do me the favor to lend
me thy arm.
The bailiff now alighted with stiffened limbs,
and, taking the arm of the other, he moved slowly
toward the building.
It is damnable to bear malice, and doubly
damnable to bear malice against the dead!
Therefore
I beg you to take notice that I have quite
forgotten
the recent conduct of the deceased in the
matter of our public games, as it becomes an
impartial
and upright judge to do. Poor Jacques
Colis! Ah, death is awful at any time, but it is
tenfold
terrible to die in this sudden manner,
posthaste
as it were, and that, too, on a path where
we put one foot before the other with so much
bodily pain. This is the ninth visit I have made
the Augustines, and I cannot flatter the holy monks
on the subject of their roads, much as I wish
them well. Is the reverend clavier back at his
post again?
He is, and has been active in taking the usual
examinations.
Activity is his strong property, and he needs
be that, Herr Steinbach, who passeth the life of a
mountaineer. The noble Genoese, and my
ancient
friend Melchior, and his fair daughter the
beautiful Adelheid, and the equitable Chtelain,
thou sayest, are all fairly reposed and
comfortable
?
Herr Bailiff, they have reason to thank God
that the late storm and their mental troubles have
done them no harm.
SoI would these Augustines kept
kirschwasser
among their liquors!
Peterchen entered the convent, where his
presence
alone was wanting to proceed to business.
The mules were housed, the guides received as
usual in the building, and then the preparations
for the long-delayed examinations were seriously
commenced.
It has already been mentioned that the
fraternity
of St. Bernard was of very ancient origin. It
was founded in the year 962, by Bernard de
Menthon
,
an Augustine canon of Aoste in Piedmont,
for the double purposes of bodily succor and
spiritual
consolation. The idea of establishing a
religious
community in the midst of savage rocks,
and at the highest point trod by the foot of a man,
was worthy of Christian self-denial and a
benevolent
philanthropy. The experiment appears to
have succeeded in a degree that is commensurate
with its noble intention; for centuries have gone
by, civilization has undergone a thousand changes,
empires have been formed and upturned, thrones
destroyed, and one-half the world has been
rescued
from barbarism, while this piously-founded
edifice still remains in its simple and respectable
usefulness where it was first erected, the refuge
of the traveller and a shelter for the poor.
The convent buildings are necessarily vast, but,
as all its other materials had to be transported to
the place it occupies on the backs of mules, they
are constructed chiefly of the ferruginous,
hoary-looking
stones that were quarried from the native
rock. The cells of the monks, the long corridors,
refectories for the different classes of travellers,
and suited to the numbers of the guests, as well as
those for the canons and their servants, and
lodging
rooms of different degrees of magnitude and
convenience, with a chapel of some antiquity and
of proper size, composed then, as now, the
internal
arrangements. There is no luxury, some
comfort
in behalf of those in whom indulgence has
become a habit, and much of the frugal hospitality
that is addressed to the personal wants and the
decencies of life. Beyond this, the building, the
entertainment, and the brotherhood, are marked
by a severe monastic self-denial, which appears to
have received a character of barren and stern
simplicity from the unvarying nakedness of all
that meets the eye in that region of frost and
sterility.
We shall not stop to say much of the little
courtesies
and the ceremonious asseverations of mutual
good-will and respect that passed between the
Bailiff of Vvey and the Prior of St. Bernard, on
the occasion of their present meeting. Peterchen
was known to the brotherhood, and, though a
Protestant
,
and one too that did not forbear to deliver
his jest or his witticism against Rome and its flock
at will, he was sufficiently well esteemed. In all
the qutes, or collections of the convent, the
well-meaning
Bernois had really shown himself a man
of bowels, and one that was disposed to favor
humanity
,
even while it helped the cause of his arch
enemy, the Pope. The clavier was always well
received, not only in his bailiwick but in his ch
ateau
,
and in spite of numberless little skirmishes
on doctrine and practice, they always met with a
welcome and generally parted in peace. This
feeling of amity and good-will extended to the
superior and to all the others of the holy
community
,
for in addition to a certain heartiness of
character
in the bailiff, there was mutual interest to
maintain it. At the period of which we write,
the vast possessions with which the monks of St.
Bernard had formerly been endowed were already
much reduced by sequestrations in different
countries
,
that of Savoy in particular, and they were
reduced then, as now, to seek supplies to meet the
constant demands of travellers in the liberality of
the well-disposed and charitable; and the
liberality
of Peterchen was thought to be cheaply
purchased
by his jokes, while, on the other hand, he
had so many occasions, either in his own person
or those of his friends, to visit the convent, that
he always forbore to push contention to a quarrel.
Welcome again, Herr Bailiff, and for the ninth
time welcome! continued the Prior, as he took
the hand of Peterchen, leading the way to his own
private parlor; thou art always a welcome guest
on the mountain, for we know that we entertain at
least a friend.
And a heretic, added Peterchen, laughing
with all his might, though he uttered a joke which
he now repeated for the ninth time. We have
met often, Herr Prior, and I hope we shall meet
P 2
finally, after all our clambering of mountains, as well
as our clambering after worldly benefits, is ended,
and that where honest men come together, in spite
of Pope or Luther, books, sermons, aves, or devils!
This thought cheers me whenever I offer thee my
hand, shaking that of the other with a hearty
good-will; for I should not like to think, Father
Michael, that, when we set out on the last long
journey, we are to travel for ever in different ways.
Thou may'st tarry awhile, if thou seest fit, in thy
purgatory, which is a lodging of thine own
invention
,
and should therefore suit thee, but I trust to
continue on, until fairly housed in heaven, miserable
and unhappy sinner that I am!
Peterchen spoke in the confident voice of one
accustomed to utter his sentiments to inferiors, who
either dared not, or did not deem it wise, to dispute
his oracles; and he ended with another
deep-mounthed
laugh, that filled the vaulted apartment
of the smiling prior to the ceiling. Father Michael
took all in good part, answering, as was his wont,
in mildness and good-tempered charity; for he
was a priest of much learning, deep reflection, and
rebuked opinions. The community over which he
presided was so far worldly in its object as to keep
the canons in constant communion with men, and
he would not now have met for the first time one
of those self-satisfied, authoritative, boisterous,
well-meaning
beings, of whose class Peterchen formed
so conspicuous a member, had this been the first
of the bailiff's visits to the Col. As it was,
however
,
the Prior not only understood the species,
but he well knew the individual specimen, and he
was well enough disposed to humor the noisy
pleasantry
of his companion. Disburthened of his
superfluous
clothing, delivered of his introductory jokes,
and having achieved his salutations to the several
canons, with suitable words of recognition to the
three or four novices who were usually found on
the mountain, Peterchen declared his readiness to
enter on the duty of what the French call
restoration
.
This want had been foreseen, and the Prior
led the way to a private refectory, where
preparations
had been made for a sufficient supper,
the bailiff being very generally known to be a huge
feeder.
Thou wilt not fare as well as in thy warm and
cheerful town of Vvey, which outdoes most of
Italy in its pleasantness and fruits; but thou shalt,
at least, drink of thine own warm wines, observed
the superior, as they went along the corridor; and
a right goodly company awaints thee, to share not
only thy repast but thy good companionship.
Hast ever a drop of kirschwasser, brother
Michael, in thy convent?
We have not only that, but we have the Baron
de Willading, and a noble Genoese who is in his
company; they are ready to set to, the moment
they can see thy face.
A noble Genoese!
An Italian gentleman, of a certainty; I think
they call him a Genoese.
Peterchen stopped, laid a finger on his nose, and
looked mysterious; but he forbore to speak, for,
by the open simple countenance of the monk, he
saw that the other had no suspicion of his meaning.
I will hazard my office of bailiff against that
of thy worthy clavier, that he is just what he
seemeth,that is to say, a Genoese!
The risk will not be great, for so he has already
announced himself. We ask no questions here,
and be he who or what he may, he is welcome to
come, and welcome to depart, in peace.
Ay, this is well enough for an Augustine on the
top of the Alps,he hath attendants?
A menial and a friend; the latter, however, left
the convent for Italy, when the noble Genoese
determined
to remain until this inquiry was over.
There was something said of heavy affairs which
required that some explanations of the delay should
be sent to others.
Peterchen again looked steadily at the Prior,
smiling, as in pity, of his ignorance.
Look thou, good Prior, much as I love thee
and thy convent, and Melchior von Willading and
his daughter, I would have spared myself this
journey, but for that same Genoese. Let there be
no questions, however, between us: the proper
time to speak will come, and God forbid that I
should be precipitate! Thou shalt then see in what
manner a bailiff of the great canton can acquit
himself! At present we will trust to thy prudence.
The friend hath gone to Italy in haste, that the
delay may not create surprise! Well, each one to
his humor on the highway: it is mine to journey
in honor and security, though others may have a
different taste. Let there be little said, good
Michael: not so much as an imprudent look of the
eye;and now, o' Heaven's sake, thy glass of
kirschwasser!
They were at the door of the refectory, and the
conversation ceased. On entering, Peterchen found
his friend the baron, the Signor Grimaldi, and the
chtelain of Sion, a grave ponderous dignitary of
justice, of German extraction like himself and the
Prior, but whose race, from a long residence on
the confines of Italy, had imbibed some peculiarities
of the southern character. Sigismund and all the
rest of the travellers were precluded from joining
the repast, to which it was the intention of the
prudent canons to give a semi-official character.
The meeting between Peterchen and those who
had so lately quitted Vvey was not distinguished
by any extraordinary movements of courtesy; but
that between the bailiff and the chtelain, who
represented
the authorities of friendly and adjoining
states, was marked by a profusion of politic and
diplomatic civilities. Various personal and public
inquiries were exchanged, each appearing to strive
to outdo the other in manifesting interest in the
smallest details on those points in which it was
proper for a stranger to feel an interest. Though
the distance between the two capitals was fully
fifteen leagues, every foot of the ground was
travelled
over by one or the other of the parties, either
in commendation of its beauties, or in questions
that touched its interests.
We come equally of Teutonic fathers, Herr
Chtelain, concluded the bailiff, as the whole party
placed themselves at table, after the reverences
and homages were thoroughly exhausted, though
Providence has cast our fortunes in different
countries
.
I swear to thee, that the sound of thy German
is music to my ears! Thou hast wonderfully
escaped
corruptions, though compelled to consort so
much with the bastards of Romans, Celts, and
Burgundians, of whom thou hast so many in this
portion of thy states. It is curious to observe,
for Peterchen had a little of an antiquarian flavor
among the other crude elements of his character
that whenever a much-trodden path traverses
a country, its people catch the blood as well as the
opinions of those who travel it, after the manner
that tares are scattered and sown by the passing
winds. Here has the St. Bernard been a
thoroughfare
since the time of the Romans, and thou wilt
find as many races among those who dwell on the
way-side as there are villages between the convent
and Vvey. It is not so with you of the Upper
Valais, Herr Chtelain; there the pure race exists
as it came from the other side of the Rhine, and
honored and preserved may it continue for another
thousand years!
There are few people so debased in their own
opinion as not to be proud of their peculiar origin
and character. The habit of always viewing
ourselves
,
our motives, and even our conduct, on the
favorable side, is the parent of self-esteem; and
this weakness, carried into communities,
commonly
gets to be the cause of a somewhat fallacious
gauge of merit among the population of entire
countries. The chtelain, Melchior de Willading,
and the Prior, all of whom came from the same
Teutonic root, received the remark complacently;
for each felt it an honor to be descended from such
ancestors; while the more polished and artificial
Italian succeeded in concealing the smile that, on
such an occasion, would be apt to play about the
mouth of a man whose parentage ran, through a
long line of sophisticated and politic nobles, into
the consuls and patricians of Rome, and most
probably
,
through these again into the wily and
ingenious
Greek, a root distinguished for civilization
when these patriarchs of the north lay buried in
the depths of barbarism.
This little display of national vanity ended, the
discourse took a more general turn. Nothing
occurred
during the entertainment, however, to
denote
that any of the company bethought him of the
business on which they had met. But, just as
twilight
failed, and the repast was ended, the Prior
invited his guests to lend their attention to the
matter
in hand, recalling them from their friendly
attacks, their time-worn jokes, and their attenuated
logic, in all of which Peterchen, Melchior, and the
chtelain had indulged with some freedom, to a
question involving the life or death of at least one
of their fellow-creatures.
The subordinates of the convent were occupied
during the supper with the arrangements that had
been previously commanded; and when Father
Michael arose and intimated to his companions that
their presence was now expected elsewhere, he
led them to a place that had been completely
prepared
for their reception.
CHAPTER XII.
Was ever tale
With such a gallant modesty rehearsed?
Home
.
Purposes
of convenience, as well as others that
were naturally connected with the religious
opinions
,
not to say the superstitions, of most of the
prisoners, had induced the monks to select the
chapel of the convent for the judgment-hall. This
consecrated part of the edifice was of sufficient
size to contain all who were accustomed to
assemble
within its walls. It was decorated in the
manner
that is usual to churches of the Romish
persuasion
,
having its master-altar, and two of
smaller
size that were dedicated to esteemed saints. A
large lamp illuminated the place, though the great
altar lay in doubtful light, leaving play for the
imagination to people and adorn that part of the
chapel. Within the railing of the choir there stood
a table: it held some object that was concealed
from view by a sweeping pall. Immediately
beneath
the lamp was placed another, which served
the purposes of the clavier, who acted as a clerk
on this occasion. They who were to fill the offices
of judges took their stations near. A knot of females
were clustered within the shadows of one of the
side-altars, hovering around each other in the way
that their sensitive sex is known to interpose
between
the exhibition of its peculiar weaknesses
and the rude observations of the world. Stifled
sobs and convulsive movements occasionally
escaped
this little group of acutely feeling and
warmhearted
beings, betraying the strength of the
emotions
they would fain conceal. The canons and
novices were ranged on one side, the guides and
muleteers formed a back-ground to the whole,
while the fine form of Sigismund stood, stern and
motionless as a statue, on the steps of the altar
which was opposite to the females. He watched
the minutest proceeding of the investigation with a
steadiness that was the result of severe practice in
self-command, and a jealous determination to suffer
no new wrong to be accumulated on the head of
his father.
When the little confusion produced by the
entrance
of the party from the refectory had subsided,
the Prior made a signal to one of the officers of
justice. The man disappeared, and shortly
returned
with one of the prisoners, the investigation
being intended to embrace the cases of all who
had been detained by the prudence of the monks.
Balthazar (for it was he) approached the table in
his usual meek manner. His limbs were unbound,
and his exterior calm, though the quick unquiet
movements of his eye, and the workings of his
pale features, whenever a suppressed sob from
among the females reached his ear, betrayed the
inward struggle he had to maintain, in order to
preserve appearances. When he was confronted
with his examiners, Father Michael bowed to the
chtelain; for, though the others were admitted by
courtesy to participate in the investigations, the
legal right to proceed in an affair of this nature,
within the limits of the Valais, belonged to this
functionary alone.
Thou art called Balthazar? abruptly
commenced
the judge, glancing at his notes.
The answer was a simple inclination of the
body.
And thou art the headsman of the canton of
Berne?
A similar silent reply was given.
The office is hereditary in thy family; it has
been so for ages?
Balthazar erected his frame, breathing heavily,
like one oppressed at the heart, but who would
bear down his feelings before he answered.
Herr Chtelain, he said with energy, by the
judgment of God it has been so.
Honest Balthazar, thou throwest too much
emphasis into thy words, interposed the bailiff.
All that belongs to authority is honorable, and is
not to be treated as an evil. Hereditary claims,
when venerable by time and use, have a double
estimation with the world, since it brings the
merit of the ancestor to sustain that of the
descendant
.
We have our rights of the b
urgerschaft
,
and thou thy rights of execution. The time
has been when thy fathers were well content with
their privilege.
Balthazar bowed in submission; but he seemed
to think any other reply unnecessary. The fingers
of Sigismund writhed on the hilt of his sword, and
a groan, which the young man well knew had been
wrested from the bosom of his mother, came from
the women.
The remark of the worthy and honorable bai
liff is just, resumed the Valaisan; all that is of
the state is for the good of the state, and all that
is for the comfort and security of man is
honorable
.
Be not ashamed, therefore, of thy office,
Balthazar
,
Vol. II. Q
which, being necessary, is not to be idly
condemned; but answer faithfully and with truth
to the questions I am about to put.Thou hast a
daughter?
In that much, at least, have I been blessed!
The energy with which he spoke caused a
sudden
movement in the judges. They looked at each
other in surprise, for it was apparent they did
not expect these touches of human feeling in a man
who lived, as it were, in constant warfare with his
fellow-creatures.
Thou hast reason, returned the chtelain,
recovering his gravity; for she is said to be both
dutiful and comely. Thou wert about to marry
this daughter?
Balthazar acknowledged the truth of this by
another
inclination.
Didst thou ever know a Vvaisan of the name
of Jacques Colis?
Mein Herr, I did. He was to have become
my son.
The chtelain was again surprised; for the
steadiness of the reply denoted innocence, and he
studied the countenance of the prisoner intently.
He found apparent frankness where he had
expected
to meet with subterfuge, and, like all who have
great acquaintance with crime, his distrust
increased
.
The simplicity of one who really had nothing
to conceal, unlike that appearance of firmness,
which is assumed to affect innocence, set his
shrewdness at fault, though familiar with most of
the expedients of the guilty.
This Jacques Colis was to have wived thy
daughter? continued the chtelain, growing more
wary as he thought he detected greater evidence
of art in the accused.
It was so understood between us.
Did he love thy child?
The muscles of Balthazar's mouth played
convulsively
,
the twitchings of the lip seeming to
threaten a loss of self-command.
Mein Herr, I believed it.
Yet he refused to fulfil the engagement?
He did.
Even Marguerite was alarmed at the deep
emphasis
with which this answer was given, and, for
the first time in her life, she trembled lest the
accumulating
load of obloquy had indeed been too
strong for her husband's principles.
Thou felt anger at his conduct, and at the
public manner in which he disgraced thee and
thine?
Herr Chtelain, I am human. When Jacques
Colis repudiated my daughter, he bruised a tender
plant in the girl, and he caused bitterness in a
father's heart.
Thou hast received instruction superior to thy
condition, Balthazar!
We are a race of executioners, but we are not
the unnurtured herd that people fancy. 'T is the
will of Berne that made me what I am, and no
desire
nor wants of my own.
The charge is honorable, as are all that come
of the state, repeated the other, with the formal
readiness in which set phrases are uttered; the
charge is honorable for one of thy birth. God
assigns to each his station on earth, and he has
fixed thy duties. When Jacques Colis refused thy
daughter he left his country to escape thy
revenge
?
Were Jacques Colis living, he would not utter
so foul a lie!
I knew his honest and upright nature!
exclaimed
Marguerite with energy! God pardon me
that I ever doubted it!
The judges turned inquisitive glances towards
the indistinct cluster of females, but the
examination
did not the less proceed.
Thou knowest, then, that Jacques Colis is
dead?
How can I doubt it, mein Herr, when I saw
his bleeding body?
Balthazar, thou seemest disposed to aid the
examination, though with what views is better
known to Him who sees the inmost heart, than to
me. I will come at once, therefore, to the most
essential facts. Thou art a native and a resident
of Berne; the headsman of the cantona
creditable
office in itself, though the ignorance and
prejudices
of man are not apt so to consider it. Thou
wouldst have married thy daughter with a
substantial
peasant of Vaud. The intended
bridegroom
repudiated thy child, in face of the
thousands
who came to Vvey to witness the
festivities
of the Abbaye; he departed on a journey to
avoid thee, or his own feelings, or rumor, or what
thou wilt; he met his death by murder on this
mountain; his body was discovered with the knife
in the recent wound, and thou, who shouldst have
been on thy path homeward, wert found passing
the night near the murdered man. Thine own
reason will show thee the connexion which we
are led to form between these several events, and
thou art now required to explain that which to us
seems so suspicious, but which to thyself may be
clear. Speak freely, but speak truth, as thou
reverest
God, and in thine own interest.
Balthazar hesitated and appeared to collect his
thoughts. His head was lowered in a thoughtful
attitude, and then, looking his examiner steadily
in the face, he replied. His manner was calm,
and the tone in which he spoke, if not that of one
innocent in fact, was that of one who well knew
how to assume the exterior of that character.
Herr Chtelain, he said, I have foreseen
the suspicions that would be apt to fasten on me
in these unhappy circumstances, but, used to trust
in Providence, I shall speak the truth without fear.
Of the intention of Jacques Colis to depart I knew
nothing. He went his way privately, and if you
will do me the justice to reflect a little, it will be
seen that I was the last man to whom he would
have been likely to let his intention be known. I
came up the St. Bernard, drawn by a chain that
your own heart will own is difficult to break if you
are a father. My daughter was on the road to
Italy with kind and true friends, who were not
ashamed to feel for a headsman's child, and who
took her in order to heal the wound that had been
so unfeelingly inflicted.
This is true! exclaimed the Baron de
Willading
;
Balthazar surely says naught but truth
here!
This is known and allowed; crime is not
always
the result of cool determination, but it comes
of terror, of sudden thought, the angry mood, the
dire temptation, and a fair occasion. Though
thou left'st Vvey ignorant of Jacques Colis'
departure
,
didst thou hear nothing of his movements
by the way?
Balthazar changed color. There was
evidently
a struggle in his bosom, as if he shrunk
from making an acknowledgment that might
militate
against his interests; but, glancing an eye at
the guides, he recovered his proper tone of mind,
and answered firmly:
I did. Pierre Dumont had heard the tale of
my child's disgrace, and, ignorant that I was the
injured parent, he told me of the manner in which
the unhappy man had retreated from the mockery
of his companions. I knew, therefore, that we
were on the same path.
Q 2
And yet thou perseveredst?
In what, Herr Chtelain? Was I to desert my
daughter, because one who had already proved
false to her stood in my way?
Thou hast well answered, Balthazar,
interrupted
Marguerite. Thou hast answered as
became thee! We are few, and we are all to each
other. Thou wert not to forget our child because
it pleased others to despise her.
The Signor Grimaldi bent towards the Valaisan,
and whispered near his ear.
This hath the air of nature, he observed;
and does it not account for the appearance of
the father on the road taken by the murdered
man?
We do not question the probability or justness
of such a motive, Signore; but revenge may have
suddenly mounted to the height of ferocity in some
wrangle: one accustomed to blood yields easily to
his passions and his habits.
The truth of these suggestions was plausible,
and the noble Genoese drew back in cold
disappointment
.
The chtelain consulted with those
about him, and then desired the wife to come forth
in order to be confronted with her husband.
Marguerite
obeyed. Her movement was slow, and her
whole manner that of one who yielded to a stern
necessity.
Thou art the headsman's wife?
And a headsman's daughter.
Marguerite is a well-disposed and a sensible
woman, put in Peterchen; she understands that
an office under the state can never bring disgrace
in the eyes of reason, and wishes no part of her
history or origin to be concealed.
The glance that flashed from the eye of
Balthazar's
wife was withering; but the dogmatic bailiff
was by far too well satisfied with his own wisdom
to be conscious of its effects.
And a headsman's daughter, continued the
examining judge; why art thou here?
Because I am a wife and a mother. As the
latter I came upon the mountain, and as a wife I
have mounted to the convent to be present at this
examination. They will have it that there is blood
upon the hands of Balthazar, and I am here to
repel the lie.
And yet thou hast not been slow to confess thy
connexion with a race of executioners!They
who are accustomed to see their fellows die might
have less warmth in meeting a plain inquiry of
justice!
Herr Chtelain, thy meaning is understood.
We have been weighed upon heavily by
Providence
,
but, until now, they whom we have been
made to serve have had the policy to treat us with
fair words! Thou hast spoken of blood; that which
has been shed by Balthazar, by his, and by mine,
lies on the consciences of those who commanded
it to be spilt. The unwilling instruments of thy
justice are innocent before God.
This is strange language for people of thy
employment
!
Dost thou, too, Balthazar, speak and
think with thy consort in this matter?
Nature has given us men sterner feelings, mein
Herr. I was born to the office I hold, taught to
believe it right, if not honorable, and I have
struggled
hard to do its duties without murmuring. The
case is different with poor Marguerite. She is a
mother, and lives in her children; she has seen one
that is near her heart publicly scorned, and she
feels like a mother.
And thou, who art a father, what has been thy
manner of thinking under this insult?
Balthazar was meek by nature, and, as he had
just said, he had been trained to the exercise of
his functions; but he was capable of profound
affections
.
The question touched him in a sensitive
spot, and he writhed under his feelings; but,
accustomed
to command himself before the public
eye, and alive to the pride of manhood, his mighty
effort to suppress the agony that loaded his heart
was rewarded with success.
Sorrow for my unoffending child; sorrow for
him who had forgotten his faith; and sorrow for
them who have been at the root of this bitter
wrong, was the answer.
This man has been accustomed to hear
forgiveness
preached to the criminal, and he turns
his schooling to good account, whispered the wary
judge to those near him. We must try his guilt
by other means. He may be readier in reply than
steady in his nerves.
Signing to the assistants, the Valaisan now
quietly
awaited the effect of a new experiment. The
pall was removed, and the body of Jacques Colis
exposed. He was seated as in life, on the table in
front of the grand altar.
The innocent have no dread of those whose
spirits have deserted the flesh, continued the
chtelain, but God often sorely pricks the
consciences
of the guilty, when they are made to see
the works of their own cruel hands. Approach,
and look upon the dead, Balthazar; thou and thy
wife, that we may judge of the manner in which
ye face the murdered and wronged man.
A more fruitless experiment could not well have
been attempted with one of the headsman's office;
for long familiarity with such sights had taken off
that edge of horror which the less accustomed
would be apt to feel. Whether it were owing to
this circumstance, or to his innocence, Balthazar
walked to the side of the body unshaken, and stood
long regarding the bloodless features with unmoved
tranquillity. His habits were quiet and meek, and
little given to display. The feelings which crowded
his mind, therefore, did not escape him in words,
though a gleam of something like regret crossed
his face. Not so with his companion.
Marguerite
took the hand of the dead man, and hot tears
began to follow each other down her cheeks, as
she gazed at his shrunken and altered lineaments.
Poor Jacques Colis! she said in a manner to
be heard by all present; thou hadst thy faults,
like all born of woman; but thou didst not merit
this! Little did the mother that bore thee, and who
lived in thy infant smileshe who fondled thee on
her knee, and cherished thee in her bosom,
foresee
thy fearful and sudden end! It was happy for
her that she never knew the fruit of all her love,
and pains, and care, else bitterly would she have
mourned over what was then her joy, and in
sorrow
would she have witnessed thy pleasantest
smile. We live in a fearful world, Balthazar; a
world in which the wicked triumph! Thy hand,
that would not willingly harm the meanest
creature
which has been fashioned by the will of God,
is made to take life, and thy heartthy excellent
heartis slowly hardening in the execution of this
accursed office! The judgment-seat hath fallen to
the lot of the corrupt and designing; mercy hath
become the laughing-stock of the ruthless, and
death is inflicted by the hand of him who would
live in peace with his kind. This cometh of
thwarting
God's intentions with the selfishness and
designs
of men! We would be wiser than he who
made the universe, and we betray the weakness
of fools! Go togo to, ye proud and great of the
earthif we have taken life, it hath been at your
bidding; but we have naught of this on our
consciences
.
The deed hath been the work of the
rapacious and violentit is no deed of revenge.
In what manner are we to know that what
thou sayest is true? asked the chtelain, who had
advanced near the altar, in order to watch the
effects of the trial to which he had put Balthazar
and his wife.
I am not surprised at thy question, Herr Ch
atelain
,
for nothing comes quicker to the minds of
the honored and happy than the thought of
resenting
an evil turn. It is not so with the despised.
Revenge would be an idle remedy for us. Would
it raise us in men's esteem? should we forget our
own degraded condition? should we be a whit
nearer respect after the deed was done than we
were before?
This may be true, but the angered do not
reason. Thou art not suspected, Marguerite,
except
as having heard the truth from thy husband
since the deed has been committed, but thine own
discernment will show that naught is more probable
than that a hot contention about the past may have
led Balthazar, who is accustomed to see blood, into
the commission of this act?
Here is thy boasted justice! Thine own laws
are brought in support of thine own oppression.
Didst thou know how much pains his father had
in teaching Balthazar to strike, how many long
and anxious visits were paid between his parent
and mine in order to bring up the youth in the way
of his dreadful calling, thou wouldst not think him
so apt! God unfitted him for his office, as he has
unfitted many of higher and different pretensions
for duties that have been cast upon them in virtue
of their birthrights. Had it been I, chtelain, thy
suspicions would have a better show of reason. I
am formed with strong and quick feelings, and
reason has often proved too weak for passion,
though the rebuke that has been daily received
throughout a life hath long since tamed all of pride
that ever dwelt in me.
Thou hast a daughter present?
Marguerite pointed to the group which held her
child.
The trial is severe, said the judge, who began
to feel compunctions that were rare to one of his
habits, but it is as necessary to your own future
peace, as it is to justice itself, that the truth should
be known. I am compelled to order thy daughter
to advance to the body.
Marguerite received this unexpected command
with cold womanly reserve. Too much wounded
to complain, but trembling for the conduct of her
child, she went to the cluster of females, pressed
Christine to her heart, and led her silently forward.
She presented her to the chtelain, with a dignity
so calm and quiet, that the latter found it
oppressive
!
This is Balthazar's child, she said. Then
folding her arms, she retired herself a step, an
attentive
observer of what passed.
The judge regarded the sweet pallid face of the
trembling girl with an interest he had seldom felt
for any who had come before him in the discharge
of his unbending duties. He spoke to her kindly,
and even encouragingly, placing himself
intentionally
between her and the dead, momentarily hiding
the appalling spectacle from her view, that she
might have time to summon her courage.
Marguerite
blessed him in her heart for this small grace,
and was better satisfied.
Thou wert betrothed to Jacques Colis?
demanded
the chtelain, using a gentleness of voice
that was singularly in contrast with his former
stern interrogatories.
The utmost that Christine could reply was to
bow her head.
Thy nuptials were to take place at the late
meeting of the Abbaye des Vigneronsit is our
unpleasant duty to wound where we could wish
to healbut thy betrothed refused to redeem his
pledge?
The heart is weak, and sometimes shrinks from
its own good purposes, murmured Christine. He
was but human, and he could not withstand the
sneers of all about him.
The chtelain was so entranced by her gentle
and sweet manner that he leaned forward to listen,
lest a syllable of what she whispered might escape
his ears.
Thou acquittest, then, Jacques Colis of any
false intention?
He was less strong than he believed himself,
mein Herr; he was not equal to sharing our
disgrace
,
which was put rudely and too strongly
before
him.
Thou hadst consented freely to the marriage
thyself, and wert well disposed to become his
wife?
The imploring look and heaving respiration of
Christine were lost on the blunted sensibilities of a
criminal judge.
Was the youth dear to thee? he repeated,
without perceiving the wound he was inflicting on
female reserve.
Christine shuddered. She was not accustomed
to have affections which she considered the most
sacred of her short and innocent existence so
rudely
probed; but, believing that the safety of her
father depended on her frankness and sincerity, by
an effort that was nearly superhuman, she was
enabled to reply. The bright glow that suffused
her face, however, proclaimed the power of that
sentiment which becomes instinctive to her sex,
arraying her features in the lustre of maiden shame.
I was little used to hear words of praise, Herr
Chtelain,and they are so soothing to the ears
of the despised! I felt as a girl acknowledges the
preference of a youth who is not disagreeable to
her. I thought he loved meandwhat would
you more, mein Herr?
None could hate thee, innocent and abused
child! murmured the Signor Grimaldi.
You forget that I am Balthazar's daughter,
mein Herr; none of our race are viewed with
favor.
Thou, at least, must be an exception!
Leaving this aside, continued the chtelain,
I would know if thy parents showed resentment
at the misconduct of thy betrothed; whether aught
was said in thy presence, that can throw light on
this unhappy affair?
The officer of the Valais turned his head aside,
for he met the surprised and displeased glance of
the Genoese, whose eye expressed a gentleman's
opinion at hearing a child thus questioned in a
matter
that so nearly touched her father's life. But the
look and the improper character of the examination
escaped the notice of Christine. She relied with
filial confidence on the innocence of the author of
her being, and, so far from being shocked, she
rejoiced
with the simplicity and confidence of the
undesigning at being permitted to say anything that
might vindicate him in the eyes of his judges.
Herr Chtelain, she answered eagerly, the
blood that had mounted to her cheeks from female
weakness, deepening to, and warming, her very
temples with a holier sentiment: Herr Chtelain,
we wept together when alone; we prayed for our
enemies as for ourselves, but naught was said to
the prejudice of poor Jacquesno, not a whisper.
Vol. II. R
Wept and prayed! repeated the judge, looking
from the child to the father, in the manner of a
man that fancied he did not hear aright.
I said both, mein Herr; if the former was a
weakness, the latter was a duty.
This is strange language in the mouth of a
headsman's child!
Christine appeared at a loss, for a moment, to
comprehend his meaning; but, passing a hand
across her fair brow, she continued.
I think I understand what you would say, mein
Herr, she said; the world believes us to be
without feeling and without hope. We are what
we seem in the eyes of others because the law
makes it so, but we are in our hearts like all around
us, Herr Chtelainwith this difference, that,
feeling
our abasement among men, we lean more
closely and more affectionately on God. You may
condemn us to do your offices and to bear your
dislike, but you cannot rob us of our trust in the
justice of heaven. In that, at least, we are the
equals of the proudest baron in the cantons!
The examination had better rest here, said
the prior, advancing with glistening eyes to
interpose
between the maiden and her interrogator.
Thou knowest, Herr Bourrit, that we have other
prisoners.
The chtelain, who felt his own practised
obduracy
of feeling strangely giving way before the
innocent and guileless faith of Christine, was not
unwilling himself to change the direction of the
inquiries
.
The family of Balthazar was directed to
retire, and the attendants were commanded to bring
forward Pippo and Conrad.
CHAPTER XIII.
And when thou thus
Shalt stand impleaded at the high tribunal
Of hood wink'd Justice, who shall tell thy audit?
Cotton
.
The
buffoon and the pilgrim, though of a general
appearance likely to excite distrust, presented
themselves
with the confidence and composure of
innocence
.
Their examination was short, for the
account they gave of their movements was clear
and connected. Circumstances that were known
to the monks, too, greatly aided in producing a
conviction that they could have had no agency in
the murder. They had left the valley below some
hours before the arrival of Jacques Colis, and they
reached the convent, weary and foot-sore, as was
usual with all who ascended that long and toilsome
path, shortly after the commencement of the storm.
Measures had been taken by the local authorities,
during the time lost in waiting the arrival of the
bailiff and the chtelain, to ascertain all the minute
facts which it was supposed would be useful in
ferreting out the truth; and the results of these
inquiries
had also been favorable to these itinerants,
whose habits of vagabondism might otherwise
very justly have brought them within the pale of
suspicion.
The flippant Pippo was the principal speaker in
the short investigation, and his answers were
given with a ready frankness, that, under the
circumstances
,
did him and his companion infinite
service. The buffoon, though accustomed to
deception
and frauds, had sufficient mother-wit to
comprehend the critical position in which he was
now placed, and that it was wiser to be sincere,
than to attempt effecting his ends by any of the
usual means of prevarication. He answered the
judge, therefore, with a simplicity which his
ordinary
pursuits would not have given reason to
expect
,
and apparently with some touches of feeling
that did credit to his heart.
This frankness is thy friend, added the ch
atelain
,
after he had nearly exhausted his questions,
the answers having convinced him that there was
no ground of suspicion, beyond the adventitious
circumstance of their having been travellers on
the same road as the deceased; it has done much
towards convincing me of thy innocence, and it is
in general the best shield for those who have
committed
no crime. I only marvel that one of thy
habits should have had the sense to discover it!
Suffer me to tell you, Signor Castellano, or
Podest, whichever may be your eccellenza's
proper
title, that you have not given Pippo credit for
the wit he really hath. It is true I live by throwing
dust into men's eyes, and by making others think
the wrong is the right; but mother Nature has
given us all an insight into our own interests, and
mine is quite clear enough to let me know when
the true is better than the false.
Happy would it be if all had the same faculty
and the same disposition to put it in use.
I shall not presume to teach one as wise and
as experienced as yourself, eccellenza, but if an
humble man might speak freely in this honorable
presence, he would say that it is not common to
meet with a fact without finding it a very near
neighbor to a lie. They pass for the wisest and
the most virtuous who best know how to mix the
two so artfully together, that, like the sweets we
put upon healing bitters, the palatable may make
the useful go down. Such at least is the opinion
of a poor street buffoon, who has no better claim
to merit than having learned his art on the Mole
and in the Toledo of Bellissima Napoli, which, as
everybody knows, is a bit of heaven fallen upon
earth!
The fervor with which Pippo uttered the
customary
eulogium on the site of the ancient
Parthenope
was so natural and characteristic as to
excite a smile in the judge, in spite of the solemn
duty in which he was engaged, and it was
believed
to be an additional proof of the speaker's
innocence
.
The chtelain then slowly recapitulated
the history of the buffoon and the pilgrim to his
companions, the purport of which was as follows.
Pippo navely admitted the debauch at Vvey,
implicating the festivities of the day and the known
frailty of the flesh as the two influencing causes.
Conrad, however, stood upon the purity of his life
and the sacred character of his calling, justifying
the company he kept on the respectable plea of
necessity, and on that of the mortifications to
which a pilgrimage should, of right, subject him
who undertakes it. They had quitted Vaud
together
as early as the evening of the day of the
abbaye's ceremonies, and, from that time to the
moment of their arrival at the convent, had made
a diligent use of their legs, in order to cross the
Col before the snows should set in and render the
passage dangerous. They had been seen at
Martigny
,
at Liddes, and St. Pierre, alone and at
proper hours, making the best of their way towards
the hospice; and, though of necessity their
progress
and actions, for several hours after quitting
the latter place, were not brought within the
observation
of any but of that all-seeing eye which
commands a view of the recesses of the Alps
equally with those of more frequented spots, their
arrival at the abode of the monks was sufficiently
R 2
seasonable to give reason to believe that no
portion
of the intervening time had been wasted by
the way. Thus far, their account of themselves
and their movements was distinct, while, on the
other hand, there was not a single fact to implicate
either, beyond the suspicion that was more or less
common to all who happened to be on the
mountain
at the moment the crime was committed.
The innocence of these two men would seem
so clear, and their readiness to appear and answer
to our questions is so much in their favor,
observed
the experienced chtelain, that I do not deem
it just to detain them longer. The pilgrim, in
particular, has a heavy trust; I understand he
performs
his penance as much for others as for
himself
,
and it is scarce decent in us, who are believers
and servants of the church, to place obstacles in
his path. I will suggest the expediency, therefore,
of giving him at least permission to depart.
As we are near the end of the inquiries,
interrupted
the Signor Grimaldi, gravely, I would
suggest, with due deference to a better opinion and
more experience, the propriety that all should
remain
,
ourselves included, until we have come to a
better understanding of the truth.
Both Pippo and the pilgrim met this suggestion
with ready declarations of their willingness to
continue at the convent until the following
morning
.
This little concession, however, had no great
merit, for the lateness of the hour rendered it
imprudent
to depart immediately; and the affair was
finally settled by ordering them to retire, it being
understood that, unless previously called for, they
might depart with the reappearance of the dawn.
Maso was the next and the last to be examined.
Il Maledetto presented himself with perfect
steadiness
of nerve. He was accompanied by Nettuno,
the mastiffs of the convent having been kennelled
for the night. It had been the habit of the dog of
late to stray among the rocks by day, and to
return
to the convent in the evening in quest of food,
the sterile St. Bernard possessing nothing whatever
for the support of man or beast except that which
came from the liberality of the monks, every
animal
but the chamois and the lmmergeyer refusing
to ascend so near the region of eternal snows. In
his master, however, Nettuno found a steady friend,
never failing to receive all that was necessary to
his wants from the portion of Maso himself; for
the faithful beast was admitted at his periodical
visits to the temporary prison in which the latter
was confined.
The chtelain waited a moment for the little stir
occasioned by the entrance of the prisoner to
subside
,
when he pursued the inquiry.
Thou art a Genoese of the name of Thomaso
Santi? he asked, consulting his notes.
By this name, Signore, am I generally known.
Thou art a mariner, and it is said one of
courage
and skill. Why hast thou given thyself the
ungracious appellation of Il Maledetto?
Men call me thus. It is a misfortune, but not
a crime, to be accursed.
He that is so ready to abuse his own fortunes
should not be surprised if others are led to think
he merits his fate. We have some accounts of
thee in Valais; 't is said thou art a free-trader?
The fact can little concern Valais or her
government
,
since all come and go unquestioned in
this free land.
It is true, we do not imitate our neighbors in
all their policy; neither do we like to see so often
those who set at naught the laws of friendly states.
Why art thou journeying on this road?
Signore, if I am what you say, the reason of
my being here is sufficiently plain. It is
probably
because the Lombard and Piedmontese are
more exacting of the stranger than you of the
mountains.
Your effects have been examined, and they
offer nothing to support the suspicion. By all
appearances
,
Maso, thou hast not much of the goods
of life to boast of; but, in spite of this, thy
reputation
clings to thee.
Ay, Signore, this is much after the world's
humor. Let it fancy any quality in a man, and
he is sure to get more than his share of the same,
whether it be for or against his interest. The
rich man's florin is quickly coined into a sequin
by vulgar tongues, while the poor man is lucky if
he can get the change of a silver mark for an
ounce of the better metal. Even poor Nettuno
finds it difficult to get a living here at the convent,
because some difference in coat and instinct has
given him a bad name among the dogs of St.
Bernard!
Thy answer agrees with thy character; thou
art said to have more wit than honesty, Maso,
and thou art described as one that can form a
desperate resolution and act up to its decision at
need?
I am as Heaven willed at the birth, Signor
Castellano, and as the chances of a pretty busy
life have served to give the work its finish. That I
am not wanting in manly qualities on occasion,
perhaps these noble travellers will be willing to
testify, in consideration of some activity that I may
have shown on the Leman, during their late
passage
of that treacherous water.
Though this was said carelessly, the appeal to
the recollection and gratitude of those he had
served was too direct to be overlooked. Melchior
de Willading, the pious clavier, and the Signor
Grimaldi, all testified in behalf of the prisoner,
freely admitting that, without his coolness and
skill, the Winkelried and all she held would
irretrievably
have been lost. Sigismund was not
content
with so cold a demonstration of his feelings.
He owed not only the lives of his father and
himself
to the courage of Maso, but that of one dearer
than all; one whose preservation, to his youthful
imagination, seemed a service that might nearly
atone for any crime, and his gratitude was in
proportion
.
I will testify more strongly to thy merit, Maso,
in face of this or any tribunal; he said, grasping
the hand of the Italian. One who showed so much
bravery and so strong love for his fellows, would
be little likely to take life clandestinely and like a
coward. Thou mayest count on my testimony in
this straitif thou art guilty of this crime, who
can hope to be innocent?
Maso returned the friendly grasp till their
fingers
seemed to grow into each other. His eye,
too, showed he was not without wholesome native
sympathies, though education and his habits might
have warped them from their true direction. A
tear, in spite of his effort to suppress the weakness,
started from its fountain, rolling down his sunburnt
cheek like a solitary rivulet trickling through a
barren and rugged waste.
This is frank, and as becomes a soldier,
Signore
,
he said, and I receive it as it is given, in
kindness and love. But we will not lay more stress
upon the affair of the lake than it deserves. This
keen-sighted chtelain need not be told that I could
not be of use in saving your lives, without saving
my own; and, unless I much mistake the meaning
of his eye, he is about to say that we are
fashioned
like this wild country in which chance has
brought us together, with our spots of generous
fertility mingled with much unfruitful rock, and
that he who does a good act to-day may forget
himself by doing an evil turn to-morrow.
Thou givest reason to all who hear thee to
mourn that thy career has not been more
profitable
to thyself and the public, answered the judge;
one who can reason so well, and who hath this
clear insight into his own disposition, must err less
from ignorance than wantonness!
There you do me injustice, Signor Castellano,
and the laws more credit than they deserve. I
shall not deny that justiceor what is called
justice
and
I have some acquaintance. I have been
the tenant of many prisons before this which has
been furnished by the holy canons, and I have seen
every stage of the rogue's progress, from him who
is still startled by his first crime, dreaming heavy
dreams, and fancying each stone of his cell has
an eye to reproach him, to him who no sooner
does a wrong than it is forgotten in the wish to
find the means of committing another; and I call
Heaven as a witness, that more is done to help
along the scholar in his study of vice, by those
who are styled the ministers of justice, than by
his own natural frailties, the wants of his habits, or
the strength of his passions. Let the judge feel
a father's mildness, the laws possess that pure
justice
which is of things that are not perverted, and
society become what it claims to be, a community
of mutual support, and, my life on it, chtelain,
thy functions will be lessened of most of their
weight and of all their oppression.
This language is bold, and without an object.
Explain the manner of thy quitting Vvey, Maso,
the road thou hast travelled, the hours of thy
passages
by the different villages, and the reason why
thou wert discovered near the Refuge, alone, and
why thou quittedst the companions with whom
thou hadst passed the night so early and so
clandestinely
?
The Italian listened attentively to these several
interrogatories; when they were all put, he gravely
and calmly set about furnishing his answers. The
history of his departure from Vvey, his
appearance
at St. Maurice, Martigny, Liddes, and St.
Pierre, was distinctly given, and it was in perfect
accordance with the private information that had
been gleaned by the authorities. He had passed
the last habitation on the mountain, on foot and
alone, about an hour before the solitary horseman,
who was now known to be Jacques Colis, was
seen to proceed in the same direction; and he
admitted
that he was overtaken by the latter, just as
he reached the upper extremity of the plain
beneath
Vlan, where they were seen in company,
though at a considerable distance, and by a
doubtful
light, by the travellers who were conducted by
Pierre.
Thus far the account given of himself by Maso
was in perfect conformity with what was already
known to the chtelain; but, after turning the rock
already mentioned in a previous chapter, all was
buried in mystery, with the exception of the
incidents
that have been regularly related in the
narrative
.
The Italian, in his further explanations,
added that he soon parted with his companion, who,
impatient of delay, and desirous of reaching the
convent before night, had urged his beast to greater
speed, while he himself had turned a little aside
from the path to rest himself, and to make a few
preparations that he had deemed necessary before
going directly to the convent.
The whole of this short history was delivered
with a composure as great as that which had just
been displayed by Pippo and the pilgrim; and it
was impossible for any present to detect the slight
est improbability or contradiction in the tale. The
meeting with the other travellers in the storm
Maso ascribed to the fact of their having passed
him while he was stationary, and to his greater
speed when in motion; two circumstances that
were quite as likely to be true as all the rest of the
account. He had left the Refuge at the first
glimpse of dawn, because he was behind his time,
and it had been his intention to descend to Aoste
that night, an exertion that was necessary in order
to repair the loss.
This may be true, resumed the judge; but
how dost thou account for thy poverty? In
searching
thy effects, thou art found to be in a condition
little better than that of a mendicant. Even thy
purse is empty, though known to be a successful
and desperate
trisler
with the revenue, in all those
states where the entrance duty is enforced.
He that plays deepest, Signore, is most likely
to be stripped of his means. What is there new
or unlooked-for in the fact that a dealer in the
contraband should lose his venture?
This is more plausible than convincing. Thou
art signalled as being accustomed to transport
articles of the jewellers from Geneva into the
adjoining
states, and thou art known to come from the
head-quarters of these artisans. Thy losses must
have been unusual, to have left thee so naked. I
much fear that a bootless speculation in thy usual
trade has driven thee to repair the loss by the
murder of this unhappy man, who left his home
well supplied with gold, and, as it would seem, with
a valuable store of jewelry, too. The particulars
are especially mentioned in this written account
of his effects, which the honorable bailiff bringeth
from his friends.
Maso mused silently, and in deep abstraction.
He then desired that the chapel might be cleared
of all but the travellers of condition, the monks, and
his judges. The request was granted, for it was
expected that he was about to make an important
confession, as indeed, in a certain degree, proved
to be the fact.
Should I clear myself of the charge of poverty,
Signor Castellano, he demanded, when all the
inferiors
had left the place, shall I stand acquitted
in your eyes of the charge of murder?
Surely not: still thou wilt have removed one
of the principal grounds of temptation, and in that
thou wilt be greatly the gainer, for we know that
Jacques Colis hath been robbed as well as slain.
Maso appeared to deliberate again, as a man is
apt to pause before he takes a step that may
materially
affect his interests. But suddenly deciding,
like a man of prompt opinions, he called to
Nettuno
,
and, seating himself on the steps of one of the
side-altars, he proceeded to make his revelation
with great method and coolness. Removing some
of the long shaggy hair of the dog, Il Maledetto
showed the attentive and curious spectators that a
belt of leather had been ingeniously placed about
the body of the animal, next its skin. It was so
concealed as to be quite hid from the view of those
who did not make particular search, a process that
Nettuno, judging by the scowling looks he threw
at most present, and the manner in which he
showed his teeth, would not be likely to permit to
a stranger. The belt was opened, and Maso laid a
glittering necklace of precious stones, in which
rubies and emeralds vied with other gems of price,
with some of a dealer's coquetry, under the strong
light of the lamp.
There you see the fruits of a life of hazards
and hardships, Signor Chtelain, he said; if my
purse is empty, it is because the Jewish Calvinists
Vol. II. S
of Geneva have taken the last liard in payment of
the jewels.
This is an ornament of rare beauty and
exceeding
value, to be seen in the possession of one
of thy appearance and habits, Maso! exclaimed
the frugal Valaisan.
Signore, its cost was a hundred doppie of pure
gold and full weight, and it is contracted for with
a young noble of Milano, who hopes to win his
mistress by the present, for a profit of fifty. Affairs
were getting low with me in consequence of
sundry
seizures and a total wreck, and I took the
adventure
with the hope of sudden and great gain.
As there is nothing against the laws of Valais in
the matter, I trust to stand acquitted, chtelain,
for my frankness. One who was master of this
would be little likely to shed blood for the
trisle
that would be found on the person of Jacques Colis.
Thou hast more, observed the judge,
signing
with his hand as he spoke; let us see all
thou hast.
Not a brooch, or so much as a worthless
garnet.
Nay, I see the belt which contains them among
the hairs of the dog.
Maso either felt or feigned a well-acted surprise.
Nettuno had been placed in a convenient attitude
for his master to unloosen the belt, and, as it was
the intention of the latter to replace it, the animal
still lay quietly in the same position, a circumstance
which displaced his shaggy coat, and allowed the
chtelain to detect the object to which he had just
alluded.
Signore, said the smuggler, changing color,
but endeavoring to speak lightly of a discovery
which all the others present evidently considered
to be grave, it would seem that the dog,
accustomed
to do these little offices in behalf of his
master, has been tempted by success to undertake
a speculation on his own account. By my patron
saint and the Virgin! I know nothing of this
second
adventure.
Trifle not, but undo the belt, lest I have the
beast muzzled that it may be performed by others,
sternly commanded the chtelain.
The Italian complied, though with an ill grace
that was much too apparent for his own interest.
Having loosened the fastenings, he reluctantly gave
the envelope to the Valaisan. The latter cut the
cloth, and laid some ten or fifteen different pieces
of jewelry on the table. The spectators crowded
about the spot in curiosity, while the judge eagerly
referred to the written description of the effects of
the murdered man.
A ring of brilliants, with an emerald of price,
the setting chased and heavy, read the Valaisan.
Thank God, it is not here! exclaimed the
Signor Grimaldi. One could wish to find so true
a mariner innocent of this bloody deed!
The chtelain believed he was on the scent of a
secret that had begun to perplex him, and as few
are so inherently humane as to prefer the
advantage
of another to their own success, he heard both
the announcement and the declaration of the noble
Genoese with a frown.
A cross of turquoise of the length of two
inches
,
with pearls of no great value intermixed,
continued
the judge.
Sigismund groaned and turned away from the
table.
Unhappily, here is that which too well answers
to the description! slowly and with evident
reluctance
,
escaped from the Signor Grimaldi.
Let it be measured, demanded the prisoner.
The experiment was made, and the agreement
was found to be perfect.
Bracelets of rubies, the stones set in foil, and
six in number, continued the methodical ch
atelain
,
whose eye now lighted with the triumph of
victory.
These are wanting! cried Melchior de
Willading
,
who, in common with all whom he had
served, took a lively interest in the fate of Maso.
There are no jewels of this description here!
Come to the next, Herr Chtelain, put in
Peterchen
,
leaning to the side of the law's triumph;
let us have the next, o' God's name!
A brooch of amethyst, the stone of our own
mountains, set in foil, and the size of one-eighth of
an inch; form oval.
It was lying on the table, beyond all possibility
of dispute. All the remaining articles, which
were chiefly rings of the less prized stones, such
as jasper, granite, topaz, and turquoise, were also
identified, answering perfectly to the description
furnished by the jeweller, who had sold them to
Jacques Colis the night of the fte, when, with
Swiss thrift, he had laid in this small stock in trade,
with a view to diminish the cost of his intended
journey.
It is a principle of law, unfortunate man,
remarked
the chtelain, removing the spectacles he
had mounted in order to read the list, that effects
wrongly taken from one robbed criminate him in
whose possession they are found, unless he can
render a clear account of the transfer. What hast
thou to say on this head?
Not a syllable, Signore; I must refer you and
all others to the dog, who alone can furnish the
history of these baubles. It is clear that I am
little
known in the Valais, for Maso never deals in
trifles insignificant as these.
The pretext will not serve thee, Maso; thou
triflest in an affair of life and death. Wilt thou
confess thy crime, ere we proceed to
extremities
?
That I have been long at open variance with
the law, Signor Castellano, is true, if you will have
it so; but I am as innocent of this man's death as
the noble Baron de Willading here. That the
Genoese
authorities were looking for me, on account
of some secret understanding that the republic
has with its old enemies, the Savoyards, I frankly
allow too; but it was a matter of gain, and not
of blood. I have taken life in my time, Signore,
but it has been in fair combat, whether the cause
was just or not.
Enough has been proved against thee already
to justify the use of the torture in order to have
the rest.
Nay, I do not see the necessity of this
appeal
,
remarked the bailiff. There lies the dead,
here is his property, and yonder stands the
criminal
.
It is an affair that only wants the forms,
methinks
,
to be committed presently to the axe.
Of all the foul offences against God and man,
resumed the Valaisan, in the manner of one that
is about to sentence, that which hastens a living
soul, unshrived, unconfessed, unprepared, and with
all its sins upon it, into another state of being and
into the dread presence of his Almighty Judge, is
the heaviest, and the last to be overlooked by the
law. There is less excuse for thee, Thomaso
Santi
,
for thy education has been far superior to they
fortunes, and thou hast passed a life of vice and
violence in opposition to thy reason and what was
taught thee in youth. Thou hast, therefore, little
ground for hope, since the state I serve loves
justice
in its purity above all other qualities.
S 2
Nobly spoken! Herr Chtelain, cried the
bailiff
,
and in a manner to send repentance like a
dagger into the criminal's soul. What is thought
and said in Valais we echo in Vaud, and I would
not that any I love stood in thy shoes, Maso, for
the honors of the emperor!
Signori, you have both spoken, and it is as
men whom fortune hath favored since childhood.
It is easy for those who are in prosperity to be
upright in all that touches money, though by the
light of the blessed Maria's countenance! I do
think there is more coveted by those who have
much than by the hardy and industrious poor. I
am no stranger to that which men call justice,
and know how to honor and respect its decrees as
they deserve. Justice, Signori, is the weak man's
scourge and the strong man's sword: it is a
breastplate
and back-plate to the one and a weapon to
be parried by the other. In short, it is a word of
fair import on the tongue, but of most unequal
application in the deed.
We overlook thy language in consideration of
the pass to which thy crimes have reduced thee,
unhappy man, though it is an aggravation of thy
offences, since it proves thou hast sinned equally
against thyself and us. This affair need go no
farther; the headsman and the other travellers may
be dismissed: we commit the Italian to the irons.
Maso heard the order without alarm, though he
appeared to be maintaining a violent struggle with
himself. He paced the chapel rapidly, and muttered
much between his teeth. His words were not
intelligible
,
though they were evidently of strong, if
not violent, import. At length he stopped short, in
the manner of one who had decided.
This matter grows serious, he said: it will
admit of no farther hesitation. Signor Grimaldi,
command all to leave the chapel in whose
discretion
you have not the most perfect confidence.
I see none to be distrusted, answered the
surprised Genoese.
Then will I speak.
CHAPTER XIV.
Thy voice to us is wind among still woods.
Shelley
Notwithstanding
the gravity of the facts which
were accumulating against him, Maso had
maintained
throughout the foregoing scene much of
that steady self-possession and discernment which
were the fruits of adventure in scenes of danger,
long exposure, and multiplied hazards. To these
causes of coolness, might be added the iron-like
nerves inherited from nature. The latter were not
easily disturbed, however critical the state to which
he was reduced. Still he had changed color, and
his manner had that thoughtful and unsettled air
which denote the consciousness of being in
circumstances
that require uncommon wariness and
judgment
.
But his final opinion appeared to be formed
when he made the appeal mentioned in the close
of the last chapter, and he now only waited for
the two or three officials who were present to retire,
before he pursued his purpose. When the door
was closed, leaving none but his examiners,
Sigismund
Balthazar, and the group of females in the
side-chapel, he turned, with singular respect of
manner, and addressed himself exclusively to the
Signor Grimaldi, as if the judgment which was to
decide his fate depended solely on his will.
Signore, he said, there has been much secret
allusion between us, and I suppose that it is
unnecessary
for me to say, that you are known to me.
I have already recognized thee for a
countryman
,
coldly returned the Genoese; it is vain,
however, to imagine the circumstance can avail a
murderer. If any consideration could induce me
to forget the claims of justice, the recollection of
thy good service on the Leman would prove thy
best friend. As it is, I fear thou hast naught to
expect from me.
Maso was silent. He looked the other steadily
in the face, as if he would study his character,
though he guardedly prevented his manner from
losing its appearance of profound respect.
Signore, the chances of life were greatly with
you at the birth. You were born the heir of a
powerful house, in which gold is more plenty than
woes in a poor man's cabin, and you have not been
made to learn by experience how hard it is to keep
down the longings for those pleasures which the
base metal will purchase, when we see others
rolling in its luxuries.
This plea will not avail thee, unfortunate man;
else were there an end of human institutions. The
difference of which thou speakest is a simple
consequence
of the rights of property; and even the
barbarian admits the sacred duty of respecting that
which is another's.
A word from one like you, illustrious Signore,
would open for me the road to Piedmont,
continued
Maso, unmoved: once across the frontiers,
it shall be my care never to molest the rocks of
Valais again. I ask only what I have been the
means of saving, eccellenza,life.'
The Signor Grimaldi shook his head, though it
was very evident that he declined the required
intercession
with much reluctance. He and old
Melchior de Willading exchanged glances; and
all who noted this silent intercourse understood it
to say, that each considered duty to God a higher
obligation than gratitude for a service rendered to
themselves.
Ask gold, or what thou wilt else, but do not
ask me to aid in defeating justice. Gladly would
I have given for the asking, twenty times the value
of those miserable baubles for whose possession,
Maso, thou hast rashly taken life; but I cannot
become a sharer of thy crime, by refusing
atonement
to his friends. It is too late: I cannot
befriend
thee now, if I would.
Thou hearest the answer of this noble
gentleman
,
interposed the chtelain; it is wise and
seemly, and thou greatly overratest his influence
or that of any present, if thou fanciest the laws
can be set aside at pleasure. Wert thou a noble
thyself, or the son of a prince, judgment would
have its way in the Valais!
Maso smiled wildly; and yet the expression of
his glittering eye was so ironical as to cause
uneasiness
in his judge. The Signor Grimaldi, too,
observed the audacious confidence of his air with
distrust, for his spirit had taken secret alarm on
a subject that was rarely long absent from his
thoughts.
If thou meanest more than has been said,
exclaimed
the latter, for the sake of the blessed
Maria be explicit!
Signor Melchior, continued Maso, turning to
the baron, I did you and your daughter fair
service
on the lake!
That thou didst, Maso, we are both willing to
admit, and were it in Berne,but the laws are
made equally for all, the great and the humble,
they who have friends, and they who have none.
I have heard of this act on the lake, put in
Peterchen; and unless fame liethwhich, Heaven
knows, fame is apt enough to do, except in giving
their just dues to those who are in high trusts,
thou didst conduct thyself in that affair, Maso, like
a loyal and well-taught mariner: but the honorable
chtelain has well remarked, that holy justice must
have way before all other things. Justice is
represented
as blind, in order that it may be seen she is
no respecter of persons; and wert thou an Avoyer,
the decree must come. Reflect maturely,
therefore
,
on all the facts, and thou wilt come, in time,
to see the impossibility of thine own innocence.
First, thou left the path, being ahead of Jacques
Colis, to enter it at a moment suited to thy
purposes
:
then thou took'st his life for gold
But this is believing that to be true, Signor
Bailiff, which is only yet supposed, interrupted
Il Maledetto; I left the path to give Nettuno his
charge apart from curious eyes; and, as for the
gold of which you speak, would the owner of a
necklace of that price be apt to barter his soul
against a booty like this which comes of Jacques
Colis!
Maso spoke with a contempt which did not serve
his cause; for it left the impression among the
auditors
,
that he weighed the morality and
immorality
of his acts simply by their result.
It is time to bring this to an end, said the
Signor Grimaldi, who had been thoughtful and
melancholy while the others spoke: thou hast
something to address particularly to me, Maso;
but if thy claim is no better than that of our
common
country, I grieve to say, it cannot be
admitted
.
Signore, the voice of a Doge of Genoa is not
often raised in vain, when he would use it in behalf
of another!
At this sudden announcement of the traveller's
rank, the monks and the chtelain started in
surprise
,
and a low murmur of wonder was heard in
the chapel. The smile of Peterchen, and the
composure
of the Baron de Willading, however,
showed
that they, at least, learned nothing new. The
bailiff whispered the prior significantly, and from
that moment his deportment towards the Genoese
took still more of the character of formal and
official respect. On the other hand, the Signor
Grimaldi remained composed, like one accustomed
to receive deference, though his manner lost the
slight degree of restraint that had been imposed by
the observance of the temporary character he had
assumed.
The voice of a Doge of Genoa should not be
used in intercession, unless in behalf of the
innocent
,
he replied, keeping his severe eye fastened
on the countenance of the accused.
Again Il Maledetto seemed laboring with some
secret that struggled on his tongue.
Speak, continued the Prince of Genoa; for it
was, in truth, that high functionary, who had
journeyed
incognito, in the hope of meeting his ancient
friend at the sports of Vvey. Speak, Maso, if
thou hast aught serious to urge in favor of thyself;
time presses, and the sight of one to whom I owe
so much in this great jeopardy, without the power
to aid him, grows painful.
Signor Doge, though deaf to pity, you cannot
be deaf to nature.
The countenance of the Doge became livid; his
lips trembled even to the appearance of
convulsions
.
Deal no longer in mystery, man of blood! he
said with energy. What is thy meaning?
I entreat your eccellenza to be calm.
Necessity
forces me to speak; for, as you see, I stand
between this revelation and the blockI am
Bartolo
Contini!
The groan that escaped the compressed lips of
the Doge, the manner in which he sank into a seat,
and the hue of death that settled over his aged
countenance, until it was more ghastly even than
that of the unhappy victim of violence, drew all
present, in wonder and alarm, around his chair.
Signing for those who pressed upon him to give
way, the Prince sat gazing at Maso, with eyes
that appeared ready to burst from their sockets.
Thou Bartolomeo! he uttered huskily, as if
horror had frozen his voice.
I am Bartolo, Signore, and no other. He who
goes through many scenes hath occasion for many
names. Even your Highness travels at times
under a cloud.
The Doge continued to stare on the speaker with
the fixedness of regard that one might be supposed
to fasten on a creature of unearthly existence.
Melchior, he said slowly, turning his eyes
from one to the other of the forms that filled them,
for Sigismund had advanced to the side of Maso,
in kind concern for the old man's condition,
Melchior, we are but feeble and miserable
creatures
in the hand of one who looks upon the
proudest
and happiest of us, as we look upon the worm
that crawls the earth! What are hope, and honor,
and our fondest love, in the great train of events
that time heaves from its womb, bringing forth to
our confusion? Are we proud? fortune revenges
itself for our want of humility by its scorn. Are
we happy? it is but the calm that precedes the
storm. Are we great? it is but to lead us into
abuses that will justify our fall. Are we honored?
stains tarnish our good names, in spite of all our
care!
He who puts his trust in the Son of Maria need
never despair! whispered the worthy clavier,
touched nearly to tears by the sudden distress of
one whom he had learned to respect. Let the
fortunes of the world pass away, or change as
they will, his chastening love outliveth time!
The Signor Grimaldi, for, though the elected of
Genoa, such was in truth the family name of the
Doge, turned his vacant gaze for an instant on the
Augustine, but it soon reverted to the forms and
faces of Maso and Sigismund, who still stood
before
him, filling his thoughts even more than his
sight.
Yes, there is a power he resumed, a great
and beneficent Being to equalize our fortunes here,
and when we pass into another state of being,
loaded with the wrongs of this, we shall have
justice
!
Tell me, Melchior, thou who knew my
youth, who read my heart when it was open as
day, what was there in it to deserve this
punishment
?
Here is Balthazar, come of a race of
executioners
a
man condemned of opinionthat
prejudice
besets with a hedge of hatredthat men
point at with their fingers, and whom the dogs are
ready to baythis Balthazar is the father of that
gallant youth, whose form is so perfect, whose
spirit is so noble, and whose life so pure; while I,
the last of a line that is lost in the obscurity of
time, the wealthiest of my land, and the chosen of
my peers, am accursed with an outcast, a common
brigand, a murderer, for the sole prop of my
decaying
housewith this Il Maledettothis man
accursedfor a son!
A movement of astonishment escaped the listeners,
even the Baron de Willading not suspecting the
real cause of his friend's distress. Maso alone was
unmoved; for while the aged father betrayed the
keenness of his anguish, the son discovered none
of that sympathy of which even a life like his might
be supposed to have left some remains in the heart
Vol. II. T
of a child. He was cold, collected, observant, and
master of his smallest action.
I will not believe this, exclaimed the Doge,
whose very soul revolted at this unfeeling apathy,
even more than at the disgrace of being the father
of such a child; thou art not he thou pretendest to
be; this foul lie is uttered that my natural feelings
may interpose between thee and the block! Prove
thy truth, or I abandon thee to thy fate.
Signore, I would have saved this unhappy
exhibition
,
but you would not. That I am Bartolo
this signet, your own gift sent to be my protection
in a strait like this, will show. It is, moreover,
easy for me to prove what I say, by a hundred
witnesses who are living in Genoa.
The Signor Grimaldi stretched forth a hand
that trembled like an aspen to receive the ring, a
jewel of little price, but a signet that he had, in
truth, sent to be an instrument of recognition
between
him and his child, in the event of any
sudden
calamity befalling the latter. He groaned as
he gazed at its well-remembered emblems, for its
identity was only too plain.
MasoBartoloGaetanofor such,
miserable
boy, is thy real appellationthou canst not
know how bitter is the pang that an unworthy
child brings to the parent, else would thy life have
been different. Oh! Gaetano! Gaetano! what a
foundation art thou for a father's hopes! What
a subject for a father's love! I saw thee last a
smiling innocent cherub, in thy nurse's arms, and I
find thee with a blighted soul, the pure fountain of
thy mind corrupted, a form sealed with the stamp
of vice, and with hands dyed in blood;
prematurely
old in body, and with a spirit that hath already
the hellish taint of the damned!
Signore, you find me as the chances of a wild
life have willed. The world and I have been at
loggerheads this many a year, and in trifling with
its laws, I take my revenge of its abuse
warmly
returned Il Maledetto, for his spirit began to be
aroused. Thou bear'st hard upon me, Doge
fatheror what thou wiltand I should be little
worthy of my lineage, did I not meet thy charges
as they are made. Compare thine own career
with mine, and let it be proclaimed by sound of
trumpet if thou wilt, which hath most reason to be
proud, and which to exult. Thou wert reared in
the hopes and honors of our name; thou passed
thy youth in the pursuit of arms according to thy
fancy, and when tired of change, and willing to
narrow thy pleasures, thou looked about thee for a
maiden to become the mother of thy successor;
thou turned a wishing eye on one young, fair, and
noble, but whose affections, as her faith, were
solemnly, irretrievably plighted to another.
The Doge shuddered and veiled his eye; but he
eagerly interrupted Maso.
Her kinsman was unworthy of her love, he
cried; he was an outcast, and little better than
thyself, unhappy boy, except in the chances of
condition.
It matters not, Signore; God had not made
you the arbiter of her fate. In tempting her
family
by your greater riches, you crushed two hearts,
and destroyed the hopes of your fellow-creatures.
In her was sacrificed an angel, mild and pure as
this fair creature who is now listening so
breathlessly
to my words; in him a fierce untamed spirit,
that had only the greater need of management,
since it was as likely to go wrong as right.
Before
your son was born, this unhappy rival, poor
in hopes as in wealth, had become desperate; and
the mother of your child sank a victim to her
ceaseless regrets, at her own want of faith as much
as for his follies.
Thy mother was deluded, Gaetano; she never
knew the real qualities of her cousin, or a soul
like hers would have lothed the wretch.
Signore, it matters not, continued Il
Maledetto
,
with a ruthless perseverance of intention,
and a coolness of manner that would seem to
merit the description which had just been given
his spirit, that of possessing a hellish taint; she
loved him with a woman's heart; and with a
woman's
ingenuity and confidence, she ascribed his
fall to despair for her loss.
Oh, Melchior! Melchior! this is fearfully true!
groaned the Doge.
It is so true, Signore, that it should be written
on my mother's tomb. We are children of a fiery
climate; the passions burn in our Italy like the hot
sun that glows there. When despair drove the
disappointed lover to acts that rendered him an
outlaw, the passage to revenge was short. Your
child was stolen, hid from your view, and cast
upon the world under circumstances that left little
doubt of his living in bitterness, and dying under
the contempt, if not the curses, of his fellows. All
this, Signor Grimaldi, is the fruit of your own
errors. Had you respected the affections of an
innocent girl, the sad consequences to yourself and
me might have been avoided.
Is this man's history to be believed, Gaetano?
demanded the baron, who had more than once
betrayed a wish to check the rude tongue of the
speaker.
I do notI cannot deny it; I never saw my
own conduct in this criminal light before, and yet
now it all seems frightfully true!
Il Maledetto laughed. Those around him thought
his untimely merriment resembled the mockery of
a devil.
This is the manner in which men continue to
sin, while they lay claim to the merit of innocence!
he added. Let the great of the earth give but
half the care to prevent, that they show to punish,
offences against themselves, and what is now called
justice will no longer be a stalking-horse to
enable
a few to live at the cost of the rest. As for
me, I am proof of what noble blood and illustrious
ancestry can do for themselves! Stolen when a
child, Nature has had fair play in my temperament,
which I own is more disposed to wild adventure
and manly risks than to the pleasures of marble
halls. Noble father of mine, were this spirit dressed
up in the guise of a senator, or a doge, it might
fare badly with Genoa!
Unfortunate man, exclaimed the indignant
prior, is this language for a child to use to his
father? Dost thou forget that the blood of Jacques
Colis is on thy soul?
Holy Augustine, the candor with which my
general frailties are allowed, should gain me credit
when I speak of particular accusations. By the
hopes and piety of the reverend canon of Aoste,
thy patron saint and founder! I am guiltless of this
crime. Question Nettuno as you will, or turn the
affair in every way that usage warrants, and let
appearances take what shape they may, I swear
to you my innocence. If ye think that fear of
punishment tempts me to utter a lie, under these
holy appeals, (he crossed himself with reverence,)
ye do injustice both to my courage and to my love
of the saints. The only son of the reigning Doge of
Genoa hath little to fear from the headsman's blow!
Again Maso laughed. It was the confidence of
one who knew the world, and who was too
audacious
even to consult appearances unless it suited
his humor, breaking out in very wantonness. A
man who had led his life, was not to learn at this
late day, that the want of eyes in Justice oftener
T 2
means blindness to the faults of the privileged, than
the impartiality that is assumed by the pretending
emblem. The chtelain, the prior, the bailiff, the
clavier, and the Baron de Willading, looked at each
other like men bewildered. The mental agony of
the Doge formed a contrast so frightful with the
heartless and cruel insensibility of the son, that the
sight chilled their blood. The sentiment was only
the more common, from the silent but general
conviction
,
that the unfeeling criminal must be
permitted
to escape. There was, indeed, no precedent
for leading the child of a prince to the block,
unless
it were for an offence which touched the
preservation
of the father's interests. Much was said
in maxims and apophthegms of the purity and
necessity
of rigid impartiality in administering the
affairs of life, but neither had attained his years
and experience without obtaining glimpses of
practical
things, that taught them to foresee the impunity
of Maso. Too much violence would be done to a
factitous and tottering edifice, were it known that
a prince's son was no better than one of the vilest,
and the lingering feelings of paternity were certain
at last to cast a shield before the offender.
The embarrassment and doubt attending such a
state of things was happily, but quite unexpectedly,
relieved by the interference of Balthazar. The
headsman, until this moment, had been a silent and
attentive listener to all that passed; but now he
pressed himself into the circle, and looking, in his
quiet manner, from one to the other, he spoke with
the assurance that the certainty of having
important
intelligence to impart, is apt to give even to
the meekest, in the presence of those whom they
habitually respect.
This broken tale of Maso, he said, is
removing
a cloud that has lain, for near thirty years,
before my eyes. Is it true, illustrious Doge, for
such it appears is your princely state, that a son
of your noble stock was stolen and kept in secret
from your love, through the vindictive enmity of a
rival?
True!alas, too true! Would it had pleased
the blessed Maria, who so cherished his mother, to
call his spirit to Heaven, ere the curse befell him
and me!
Your pardon, great Prince, if I press you
with questions at a moment so painful. But it is
in your own interest. Suffer that I ask in what
year this calamity befell your family?
The Signor Grimaldi signed for his friend to
assume the office of answering these extraordinary
interrogatories, while he buried his own venerable
face in his cloak, to conceal his anguish from
curious
eyes. Melchior de Willading regarded the
headsman in surprise, and for an instant he was
disposed to repel questions that seemed
importunate
;
but the earnest countenance and mild, decent
demeanor of Balthazar, overcame his repugnance
to pursue the subject.
The child was seized in the autumn of the year
1693, he answered, his previous conferences with
his friend having put him in possession of all the
leading facts of the history.
And his age?
Was near a twelvemonth.
Can you inform me what became of the
profligate
noble who committed this foul robbery?
The fate of the Signore Pantaleone Serrani has
never been truly known; though there is a dark
rumor that he died in a brawl in our own
Switzerland
.
That he is dead, there is no cause to doubt.
And his person, noble Freiherra description
of his person is now wanting to throw the
light of a noon-day sun, on what has so long been
night!
I knew the unlucky Signore Pantaleone well
in early youth. At the time mentioned his years
might have been thirty, his form was seemly and
of middle height, his features bore the Italian
outline
,
with the dark eye, swarthy skin and glossy
hair of the climate. More than this, with the
exception
of a finger lost in one of our affairs in
Lombardy, I cannot say.
This is enough, returned the attentive
Balthazar
.
Dismiss your grief, princely Doge, and
prepare your heart for a new-found joy. Instead
of being the parent of this reckless freebooter, God
at length pities and returns your real son in
Sigismund
,
a child that might gladden the heart of any
parent, though he were an emperor!
This extraordinary declaration was made to
stunned and confounded listeners. A cry of alarm
bust from the lips of Marguerite, who approached
the group in the centre of the chapel, trembling
and anxious as if the grave were about to rob her
of a treasure.
What is this I hear! exclaimed the mother,
whose sensitiveness was the first to take alarm.
Are my half-formed suspicions then too true,
Balthazar
?
Am I, indeed, without a son? I know thou
wouldst not trifle with a mother, or mislead this
stricken noble in a thing like this! Speak, again,
that I may know the truthSigismund!
Is not our child, answered the headsman,
with an impress of truth in his manner that went
far to bring conviction; our own boy died in the
blessed state of infancy, and, to save thy feelings,
this youth was substituted in his place by me
without
thy knowledge.
Marguerite moved nearer to the young man.
She gazed wistfully at his flushed, excited features,
in which pain at being so unexpectedly torn from
the bosom of a family he had always deemed his
own, was fearfully struggling with a wild and
indefinite
delight at finding himself suddenly relieved
from a load he had long found so grievous to be
borne. Interpreting the latter expression with
jealous affection, she bent her face to her bosom,
and retreated in silence among her companions to
weep.
In the mean time a sudden and tumultuous
surprise
took possession of the different listeners, which
was modified and exhibited according to their
respective
characters, or to the amount of interest
that each had in the truth or falsehood of what
had just been announced. The Doge clung to the
hope, improbable as it seemed, with a tenacity
proportioned
to his recent anguish, while Sigismund
stood like one beside himself. His eye wandered
from the simple and benevolent, but degraded, man,
whom he had believed to be his father, to the
venerable
and imposing-looking noble who was now
so unexpectedly presented in that sacred character.
The sobs of Marguerite reached his ears, and
first recalled him to recollection. They came
blended with the fresh grief of Christine, who felt
as if ruthless death had now robbed her of a
brother
.
There was also the struggling emotion of
one whose interest in him had a still more tender
and engrossing claim.
This is so wonderful! said the trembling Doge,
who dreaded lest the next syllable that was uttered
might destroy the blessed illusion, so wildly
improbable
,
that, though my soul yearns to believe it,
my reason refuses credence. It is not enough to
utter this sudden intelligence, Balthazar; it must
be proved. Furnish but a moiety of the evidence
that is necessary to establish a legal fact, and I
will render thee the richest of thy class in
Christendom
!
And thou, Sigismund, come close to my heart,
noble boy, he added, with outstretched arms, that
I may bless thee, while there is hopethat I may
feel one beat of a father's pulsesone instant of
a father's joy!
Sigismund knelt at the venerable Prince's feet,
and receiving his head on his shoulder, their tears
mingled. But even at that precious moment both
felt a sense of insecurity, as if the exquisite pleasure
of so pure a happiness were too intense to last.
Maso looked upon this scene with cold displeasure.
His averted face denoting a stronger feeling than
disappointment, though the power of natural
sympathy
was so strong as to draw evidences of its
force from the eyes of all the others present.
Bless thee, bless thee, my child, my dearly
beloved
son! murmured the Doge, lending himself
to the improbable tale of Balthazar for a delicious
instant, and kissing the cheeks of Sigismund as
one would embrace a smiling infant; may the
God of heaven and earth, his only Son, and the
holy Virgin undefiled, unite to bless thee, here and
hereafter, be thou whom thou mayest! I owe thee one
precious instant of happiness, such as I have never
tasted before. To find a child would not be enough
to give it birth; but to believe thee to be that son
touches on the joys of paradise!
Sigismund fervently kissed the hand that had
rested affectionately on his head during this
diction
;
then, feeling the necessity of having some
guarantee for the existence of emotions so sweet,
he arose and made a warm and strong appeal to
him who had so long passed for his father to be
more explicit, and to justify his new-born hopes
by some evidence better than his simple
asseveration
;
for solemnly as the latter had been made,
and profound as he knew to be the reverence for
truth which the despised headsman not only
entertained himself but inculcated in all in
whom he had any interest, the revelation he had
just made seemed too improbable to resist the
doubts of one who knew his happiness to be the
fruit or the forfeiture of its veracity.
CHAPTER XV.
We resta dream has power to poison sleep;
We riseone wandering thought pollutes the day;
We feel, conceive or reason, laugh or weep;
Embrace fond woe, or cast our cares away.
Shelley
.
The
tale of Balthazar was simple but eloquent.
His union with Marguerite, in spite of the world's
obloquy and injustice, had been blest by the wise
and merciful Being who knew how to temper the
wind to the shorn lamb.
We knew we were all to each other, he
continued
,
after briefly alluding to the early history of
their births and love; and we felt the necessity
of living for ourselves. Ye that are born to honors,
who meet with smiles and respectful looks in all ye
meet, can know little of the feeling which binds
together the unhappy. When God gave us our
first-born, as he lay a smiling babe in her lap,
looking up into her eye with the innocence that
most likens man to angels, Marguerite shed bitter
tears at the thought of such a creature's being
condemned
by the laws to shed the blood of men. The
reflection that he was to live for ever an outcast
from his kind was bitter to a mother's heart. We
had made many offers to the canton to be released
ourselves, from this charge; we had prayed them
Herr Melchior, you should know how earnestly
we have prayed the council, to be suffered to live
like others, and without this accursed doombut
they would not. They said the usage was ancient,
that change was dangerous, and that what God
willed must come to pass. We could not bear that
the burthen we found so hard to endure ourselves
should go down for ever as a curse upon our
descendants
,
Herr Doge, he continued, raising his
meek face in the pride of honesty; it is well for
those who are the possessors of honors to be proud
of their privileges; but when the inheritance is one
of wrongs and scorn, when the evil eyes of our
fellows are upon us, the heart sickens. Such was
our feeling when we looked upon our first-born.
The wish to save him from our own disgrace was
uppermost, and we bethought us of the means.
Ay! sternly interrupted Marguerite, I parted
with my child, and silenced a mother's longings,
proud nobles, that he might not become the tool
of your ruthless policy; I gave up a mother's joy
in nourishing and in cherishing her young, that the
little innocent might live among his fellows, as
God had created him, their equal and not their
victim!
Balthazar paused, as was usual with him
whenever
his energetic wife manifested any of her strong
and masculine qualities, and then, when deep silence
had followed her remark, he proceeded.
We wanted not for wealth; all we asked was
to be like others in the world's respect. With our
money it was very easy to find those in another
canton, who were willing to take the little
Sigismund
into their keeping. After which, a feigned
death, and a private burial, did the rest. The deceit
was easily practised, for as few cared for the griefs
as for the happiness of the headsman's family!
The child had drawn near the end of its first year,
when I was called upon to execute my office on a
stranger. The criminal had taken life in a drunken
brawl in one of the towns of the canton, and he
was said to be a man that had trifled with the
precious
gifts of birth, it being suspected that he was
noble. I went with a heavy heart, for never did
I strike a blow without praying God it might be
the last; but it was heavier when I reached the
place where the culprit awaited his fate. The
tidings of my poor son's death reached me as I
put foot on the threshold of the desolate prison, and
I turned aside to weep for my own woes, before I
entered to see my victim. The condemned man
had great unwillingness to die; he had sent for me
many hours before the fatal moment, to make
acquaintance
,
as he said, with the hand that was to
dispatch him to the presence of his last and eternal
judge.
Balthazar paused; he appeared to meditate on
a scene that had probably left indelible impressions
on his mind. Shuddering involuntarily, he raised
his eyes from the pavement of the chapel, and
continued
the recital, always in the same subdued and
tranquil manner.
I have been the unwilling instrument of many
a violent deathI have seen the most reckless
sinners
in the agonies of sudden and compelled
repentance
,
but never have I witnessed so wild and
fearful a struggle between earth and heaventhe
world and the gravepassion and the rebuke of
Providenceas attended the last hours of that
unhappy man! There were moments in which the
mild spirit of Christ won upon his evil mood 'tis
true; but the picture was, in general, that of
revenge so fierce, that the powers of hell alone
could give it birth in a human heart. He had with
him an infant of an age just fitted to be taken from
the breast. This child appeared to awaken the
fiercest conflicting feelings; he both yearned over
it and detested its sight, though hatred seemed
most to prevail.
Vol. II. U
This was horrible! murmured the Doge.
It was the more horrible, Herr Doge, that it
should come from one who was justly condemned
to the axe. He rejected the priests; he would
have naught of any but me. My soul lothed the
wretchyet so few ever showed an interest in
usand it would have been cruel to desert a
dying
man! At the end, he placed the child in my
care, furnishing more gold than was sufficient to
rear it frugally to the age of manhood, and
leaving
other valuables which I have kept as proofs
that might some day be useful. All I could learn
of the infant's origin was simply this. It came
from Italy, and of Italian parents; its mother died
soon after its birth,a groan escaped the Doge
its father still lived, and was the object of the
criminal's implacable hatred, as its mother had
been of his ardent love; its birth was noble, and
it had been baptized in the bosom of the church by
the name of Gaetano.
It must be he!it isit must be my beloved
son! exclaimed the Doge, unable to control
himself any longer. He spread wide his arms,
and Sigismund threw himself upon his bosom,
though there still remained fearful apprehensions
that all he heard was a dream. Go ongo on
excellent Balthazar, added the Signor Grimaldi,
drying his eyes, and struggling to command
himself
.
I shall have no peace until all is revealed
to the last syllable of thy wonderful, thy glorious
tale!
There remains but little more to say, Herr
Doge. The fatal hour arrived, and the criminal
was transported to the place where he was to give
up his life. While seated in the chair in which
he received the fatal blow, his spirit underwent
infernal torments. I have reason to think that
there were moments when he would gladly have
made his peace with God. But the demons
prevailed
;
he died in his sins! From the hour when
he committed the little Gaetano to my keeping, I
did not cease to entreat to be put in possession of
the secret of the child's birth, but the sole answer
I received was an order to appropriate the gold to
my own uses, and to adopt the boy as my own.
The sword was in my hand, and the signal to
strike was given, when, for the last time, I asked
the name of the infant's family and country, as a
duty I could not neglect. `He is thinehe is
thine' was the answer; `tell me, Balthazar, is
thy office hereditary, as is wont in these regions?
I was compelled, as ye know, to say it was. `Then
adopt the urchin; rear him to fatten on the blood
of his fellows!' It was mockery to trifle with such
a spirit. When his head fell, it still had on its fierce
features traces of the infernal triumph with which
his spirit departed!
The monster was a just sacrifice to the laws
of the canton! exclaimed the single-minded
bailiff
.
Thou seest, Herr Melchior, that we do well
in arming the hand of the executioner, in spite of
all the sentiment of the weak-minded. Such a
wretch was surely unworthy to live.
This burst of official felicitation from
Peterchen
,
who rarely neglected an occasion to draw
a conclusion favorable to the existing order of
things, like most of those who reap their exclusive
advantage, and to the prejudice of innovation,
produced
little attention; all present were too much
absorbed in the facts related by Balthazar, to turn
aside to speak, or think, of other matters.
What became of the boy? demanded the
worthy clavier, who had taken as deep an interest
as the rest, in the progress of the narrative.
I could not desert him, father; nor did I wish
to. He came into my guardianship at a moment
when God, to reprove our repinings at a lot that
he had chosen to impose, had taken our own little
Sigismund to heaven. I filled the place of the
dead infant with my living charge; I gave to him
the name of my own son, and I can say
confidently
,
that I transferred to him the love I had borne
my own issue; though time, and use, and a
knowledge
of the child's character, were perhaps
necessary
to complete the last. Marguerite never
knew the deception, though a mother's instinct and
tenderness took the alarm and raised suspicions.
We have never spoken freely on this together, and
like you, she now heareth the truth for the first
time.
'T was a fearful mystery between God and
my own heart! murmured the woman; I
forbore
to trouble itSigismund, or Gaetano, or
whatever
you will have his name, filled my affections,
and I strove to be satisfied. The boy is dear to
me, and ever will be, though you seat him on a
throne; but Christinethe poor stricken Christine
is truly the child of my bosom!
Sigismund went and knelt at the feet of her
whom he had ever believed his mother, and
earnestly
begged her blessing and continued affection.
The tears streamed from Marguerite's eyes, as she
willingly bestowed the first, and promised never to
withhold the last.
Hast thou any of the trinkets or garments
that were given thee with the child, or canst
render
an account of the place where they are still
to be found? demanded the Doge, whose whole
mind was too deeply set on appeasing his doubts
to listen to aught else.
They are all here in the convent. The gold
has been fairly committed to Sigismund, to form
his equipment as a soldier. The child was kept
apart, receiving such education as a learned priest
could give, till of an age to serve, and then I sent
him to bear arms in Italy, which I knew to be the
country of his birth, though I never knew to what
Prince his allegiance was due. The time had now
come when I thought it due to the youth to let him
know the real nature of the tie between us; but I
shrank from paining Marguerite and myself, and
I even did his heart the credit to believe that he
would rather belong to us, humble and despised
though we be, than find himself a nameless
outcast
,
without home, country, or parentage. It was
necessary, however, to speak, and it was my
purpose
to reveal the truth, here at the convent, in
the presence of Christine. For this reason, and
to enable Sigismund to make inquiries for his
family, the effects received from the unhappy
criminal with the child were placed among his
baggage secretly. They are, at this moment, on
the mountain.
The venerable old prince trembled violently;
for, with the intense feeling of one who dreaded
that his dearest hopes might yet be disappointed, he
feared, while he most wished, to consult these
mute but veracious witnesses.
Let them be produced!let them be instantly
produced and examined! he whispered eagerly to
those around him. Then turning slowly to the
immovable
Maso, he demandedAnd thou, man
of falsehood and of blood! what dost thou reply
to this clear and probable tale?
Il Maledetto smiled, as if superior to a weakness
that had blinded the others. The expression of
his countenance was filled with that look of calm
superiority which certainty gives to the
well-informed
over the doubting and deceived.
I have to reply, Signore, and honored father,
he coolly answered, that Balthazar hath right
cleverly related a tale that hath been ingeniously
U 2
devised. That I am Bartolo, I repeat to thee, can
be proved by a hundred living tongues in Italy.
Thou best knowest who Bartolo Contini is, Doge
of Genoa.
He speaks the truth, returned the prince,
dropping his head in disappointment. Oh!
Melchior
,
I have had but too sure proofs of what he
intimates! I have long been certain that this
wretched Bartolo is my son, though never before
have I been cursed with his presence. Bad as I
was taught to think him, my worst fears had not
painted him as I now find the truth would
warrant
.
Has there not been some fraudart thou not
the dupe of some conspiracy of which money has
been the object?
The Doge shook his head, in a way to prove
that he could not possibly flatter himself with such
a hope.
Never: my offers of money have always been
rejected.
Why should I take the gold of my father?
added Il Maledetto; my own skill and courage
more than suffice for my wants.
The nature of the answer, and the composed
demeanor of Maso, produced an embarrassing
pause.
Let the two stand forth and be confronted,
said the puzzled clavier at length; nature often
reveals the truth when the uttermost powers of
man are at faultif either is the true child of the
prince, we should find some resemblance to the
father to support his claim.
The test, though of doubtful virtue, was eagerly
adopted, for the truth had now become so involved,
as to excite a keen interest in all present. The
desire to explain the mystery was general, and the
slightest means of attaining such an end became of
a value proportionate to the difficulty of effecting
the object. Sigismund and Maso were placed
beneath
the lamp, where its light was strongest, and
every eye turned eagerly to their countenances, in
order to discover, or to fancy it discovered, some
of those secret signs by which the mysterious
affinities
of nature are to be traced. A more puzzling
examination could not well have been essayed.
There was proof to give the victory to each of the
pretenders, if such a term may be used with
propriety
as it concerns the passive Sigismund, and
much to defeat the claims of the latter. In the
olive-colored tint, the dark, rich, rolling eye, and
in stature, the advantage was altogether with
Maso, whose outline of countenance and
penetrating
expression had also a resemblance to those of
the Doge, so marked as to render it quite apparent
to any who wished to find it. The habits of the
mariner had probably diminished the likeness, but
it was too obviously there to escape detection.
That hardened and rude appearance, the
consequence
of exposure, which rendered it difficult to
pronounce within ten years of his real age,
contributed
a little to conceal what might be termed the
latent character of his countenance, but the
features
themselves were undeniably a rude copy of
the more polished lineaments of the Prince.
The case was less clear as respects Sigismund.
The advantage of ruddy and vigorous youth
rendered
him such a resemblance of the Dogein the
points where it existedas we find between the
aged and those portraits which have been painted
in their younger and happier days. The bold
outline
was not unlike that of the noble features of the
venerable Prince, but neither the eye, the hair, nor
the complexion, had the hues of Italy.
Thou seest, said Maso, tauntingly, when the
disappointed clavier admitted the differences in
the latter particulars, this is an imposition that
will not pass. I swear to you, as there is faith in
man, and hope for the dying Christian, that so far
as any know their parentage, I am the child of
Gaetano Grimaldi, the present Doge of Genoa, and
of no other man! May the saints desert me!
the blessed Mother of God be deaf to my
prayers
!and
all men hunt me with their curses, if I
say aught in this but holy truth!
The fearful energy with which Maso uttered
this solemn appeal, and a certain sincerity that
marked his manner, and perhaps we might even
say his character, in spite of the dissolute
recklessness
of his principles, served greatly to weaken
the growing opinion in favor of his competitor.
And this noble youth? asked the sorrowing
Dogethis generous and elevated boy, whom I
have already held next to my heart, with so much
of a father's joywho and what is he?
Eccellenza, I wish to say nothing against the
Signor Sigismondo. He is a gallant swimmer,
and a staunch support in time of need. Be he
Swiss, or Genoese, either country may be proud
of him; but self-love teaches us all to take care of
our own interests before those of another. It
would be far pleasanter to dwell in the
Palazzo
Grimaldi, on our warm and sunny gulf,
honored and esteemed as the heir of a noble name,
than to be cutting heads in Berne; and honest
Balthazar does but follow his instinct, in seeking
preferment for his son!
Each eye now turned on the headsman, who
quailed not under the scrutiny, but maintained the
firm front of one conscious that he had done no
wrong.
I have not said that Sigismund is the child of
any, he answered in his meek manner, but with
a steadiness that won him credit with the listeners.
I have only said that he belongs not to me. No
father need wish a worthier son, and heaven knows
that I yield my own claims with a sorrow that it
would be grievous to bear, did I not hope a better
fortune for him than any which can come from a
connexion with a race accursed. The likeness
which is seen in Maso, and which Sigismund is
thought to want, proves little, noble gentlemen and
reverend monks; for all who have looked closely
into these matters know that resemblances are as
often found between the distant branches of the
same family, as between those who are more nearly
united. Sigismund is not of us, and none can see
any trace of either my own or of Marguerite's
family in his person or features.
Balthazar paused that there might be an
examination
of this fact, and, in truth, the most ingenious
fancy could not have detected the least affinity in
looks, between either of those whom he had so long
thought his parents and the young soldier.
Let the Doge of Genoa question his memory,
and look farther than himself. Can he find no
sleeping smile, no color of the hair, nor any other
common point of appearance, between the youth
and some of those whom he once knew and loved?
The anxious prince turned eagerly towards
Sigismund
,
and a gleam of joy lighted his face again,
as he studied the young man's features.
By San Francesco! Melchior, the honest
Balthazar
is right. My grandmother was a Venetian,
and she had the fair hair of the boythe eye too,
is hersandoh! bending his head aside and
veiling his eyes with his hand, I see the anxious
gaze that was so constant in the sainted and injured
Angiolina, after my greater wealth and power had
tempted her kinsmen to force her to yield an
unwilling
hand!Wretch! thou art not Bartolo;
thy tale is a wicked deception, invented to shield
thee from the punishment due to thy crime!
Admitting that I am not Bartolo, eccellenza,
does the Signor Sigismondo claim to be he? Have
you not assured yourself that a certain Bartolo
Contini, a man whose life is passed in open hostility
to the laws, is your child? Did you not employ
your confidant and secretary to learn the facts?
Did he not hear from the dying lips of a holy priest,
who knew all the circumstances, that `Bartolo
Contini is the son of Gaetano Grimaldi'? Did not
the confederate of your implacable enemy,
Cristofero
Serrani, swear the same to you? Have you
not seen papers that were taken with your child
to confirm it all, and did you not send this signet
as a gage that Bartolo should not want your aid,
in any strait that might occur in his wild manner
of living, when you learned that he resolutely
preferred
remaining what he was, to becoming an
image of sickly repentance and newly-assumed
nobility, in your gorgeous palace on the Strada
Balbi?
The Doge again bowed his head in dismay, for
all this he knew to be true beyond a shadow of
hope.
Here is some sad mistake, he said with bitter
regret. Thou hast received the child of some
other bereaved parent, Balthazar; but, though I
cannot hope to prove myself the natural father of
Sigismund, he shall at least find me one in affection
and good offices. If his life be not due to me, I
owe him mine; the debt shall form a tie between
us little short of that to which nature herself could
give birth.
Herr Doge, returned the earnest headsman,
let us not be too hasty. If there are strong facts
in favor of the claims of Maso, there are many
circumstances, also, in favor of those of Sigismund.
To me, the history of the last is probably more
clear than it can be to any other. The time, the
country, the age of the child, the name, and the
fearful revelations of the criminal, are all strong
proofs in Sigismund's behalf. Here are the effects
that were given me with the child; it is possible
that they, too, may throw weight into his scale.
Balthazar had taken means to procure the
package
in question from among the luggage of
Sigismund
,
and he now proceeded to expose its contents,
while a breathless silence betrayed the interest
with which the result was expected. He first laid
upon the pavement of the chapel a collection of
child's clothing. The articles were rich, and
according
to the fashions of the times; but they
contained no positive proofs that could go to
substantiate
the origin of the wearer, except as they
raised the probability of his having come of an
elevated rank in life. As the different objects were
placed upon the stones, Adelheid and Christine
kneeled beside them, each too intently absorbed
with the progress of the inquiry to bethink
themselves
of those forms which, in common, throw a
restraint upon the manners of their sex. The latter
appeared to forget her own sorrows, for a moment,
in a new-born interest in her brother's fortunes,
while the ears of the former drank in each syllable
that fell from the lips of the different speakers, with
an avidity that her strong sympathy with the youth
could alone give.
Here is a case containing trinkets of value,
added Balthazar. The condemned man said they
were taken through ignorance, and he was
accustomed
to suffer the child to amuse himself with
them in the prison.
These were my first offerings to my wife, in
return for the gift she had made me of the precious
babe! said the Doge, in such a smothered voice
as we are apt to use when examining objects that
recall the presence of the deadBlessed
Angiolina
!
these jewels are so many tokens of thy pale
but happy countenance; thou felt a mother's joy
at that sacred moment, and could even smile on
me!
And here is a talisman in sapphire, with many
Eastern characters; I was told it had been an
heirloom
in the family of the child, and was put about
his neck at the birth, by the hands of his own
father.
I ask no moreI ask no more! God be praised
for this, the last and best of all his mercies! cried
the Prince, clasping his hands with devotion. This
jewel was worn by myself in infancy, and I placed
it around the neck of the babe with my own hands,
as thou sayestI ask no more.
And Bartolo Contini! uttered Il Maledetto.
Maso! exclaimed a voice, which until then
had been mute in the chapel. It was Adelheid
who had spoken. Her hair had fallen in wild
profusion
over her shoulders, as she still knelt over
the articles on the pavement, and her hands were
clasped entreatingly, as if she deprecated the rude
interruptions which had so often dashed the cup
from their lips, as they were about to yield to the
delight of believing Sigismund to be the child of
the Prince of Genoa.
Thou art another of a fond and weak sex, to
swell the list of confiding spirits that have been
betrayed by the selfishness and falsehood of men,
answered the mocking mariner. Go to, girl!
make thyself a nun; thy Sigismund is an impostor.
Adelheid, by a quick but decided interposition
of her hand, prevented an impetuous movement of
the young soldier, who would have struck his au
dacious rival to his feet. Without changing her
kneeling attitude, she then spoke, modestly but with
a firmness which generous sentiments enable women
to assume even more readily than the stronger sex,
when extraordinary occasions call for the sacrifice
of that reserve in which her feebleness is ordinarily
intrenched.
I know not, Maso, in what manner thou hast
learned the tie which connects me with
Sigismund
,
she said; but I have no longer any wish
to conceal it. Be he the son of Balthazar, or be
he the son of a prince, he has received my troth
with the consent of my honored father, and our
fortunes will shortly be one. There might be
forwardness
in a maiden thus openly avowing her
preference for a youth; but here, with none to
own him, oppressed with his long-endured wrongs,
and assailed in his most sacred affections,
Sigismund
has a right to my voice. Let him belong
to whom else he may, I speak by my venerable
father's authority, when I say he belongs to us.
Melchior, is this true? cried the Doge.
The girl's words are but an echo of what my
heart feels, answered the baron, looking about
him proudly, as if he would browbeat any who
should presume to think that he had consented to
corrupt the blood of Willading by the measure.
I have watched thine eye, Maso, as one nearly
interested in the truth, continued Adelheid, and
I now appeal to thee, as thou lovest thine own soul,
to disburthen thyself! While thou may'st have
told some truth, the jealous affection of a woman
has revealed to me that thou hast kept back part.
Speak, then, and relieve the soul of this venerable
prince from torture,
And deliver my own body to the wheel! This
may be well to the warm imagination of a
love-sick
girl, but we of the contraband have too much
practice in men uselessly to throw away an
advantage
.
Vol. II. V
Thou mayest have confidence in our faith.
I have seen much of thee within the last few
days, Maso, and I wish not to think thee capable
of the bloody deed that hath been committed on
the mountain, though I fear thy life is only too
ungoverned; still I will not believe that the hero
of the Leman can be the assassin of St. Bernard.
When thy young dreams are over, fair one,
and thou seest the world under its true colors, thou
wilt know that the hearts of men come partly of
Heaven and partly of Hell.
Maso laughed in his most reckless manner as he
delivered this opinion.
'T is useless to deny that thou hast sympathies,
continued the maiden steadily; thou hast in
secret
more pleasure in serving than in injuring
thy race. Thou canst not have been in such
straits in company with the Signor Sigismondo,
without imbibing some touch of his noble
generosity
.
You have struggled together for our
common
good, you come of the same God, have the
same manly courage, are equally stout of heart,
strong of hand, and willing to do for others. Such
a heart must have enough of noble and human
impulses to cause you to love justice. Speak,
then, and I pledge our sacred word, that thou shalt
fare better for thy candor than by taking refuge
in thy present fraud. Bethink thee, Maso, that
the happiness of this aged man, of Sigismund
himself, if thou wilt, for I blush not to say itof
a weak and affectionate girl, is in thy keeping.
Give us truth holy; sacred truth, and we pardon
the past.
Il Maledetto was moved by the beautiful
earnestness
of the speaker. Her ingenuous interest in
the result, with the solemnity of her appeal, shook
his purpose.
Thou know'st not what thou say'st, lady; thou
ask'st my life, he answered, after pondering in a
way to give a new impulse to the dying hopes of
the Doge.
Though there is no quality more sacred than
justice, interposed the chtelain, who alone could
speak with authority in the Valais; it is fairly
within the province of her servants to permit
her to go unexpiated, in order that greater good
may come of the sacrifice. If thou wilt prove
aught that is of grave importance to the interests
of the Prince of Genoa, Valais owes it to the love
it bears his republic to requite the service.
Maso listened, at first, with a cold ear. He
felt the distrust of one who had sufficient
knowledge
of the world to be acquainted with the
thousand
expedients that were resorted to by men, in
order to justify their daily want of faith. He
questioned
the chtelain closely as to his meaning, nor
was it until a late hour, and after long and weary
explanations on both sides, that the parties came
to an understanding.
On the part of those who, on this occasion, were
the representatives of that high attribute of the
Deity which among men is termed justice, it was
sufficiently apparent that they understood its
exercise
with certain reservations that might be made
at pleasure in favor of their own views; and, on
the part of Maso, there was no attempt to
conceal
the suspicions he entertained to the last, that
he might be a sufferer by lessening in any degree
the strength of the defences by which he was at
present shielded, as the son, real or fancied, of a
person so powerful as the Prince of Genoa.
As usually happens when there is a mutual wish
to avoid extremities, and when conflicting
interests
are managed with equal address, the
negotiation
terminated in a compromise. As the result
will be shown in the regular course of the
narrative
,
the reader is referred to the closing chapter
for the explanation.
CHAPTER XVI.
Speak, oh, speak!
And take me from the rack.
Young
.
It
will be remembered that three days were
passed in the convent in that interval which
occurred
between the arrival of the travellers and
those of the chtelain and the bailiff. The
determination
of admitting the claims of Sigismund, so
frankly announced by Adelheid in the preceding
chapter, was taken during this time. Separated
from the world, and amid that magnificent solitude
where the passions and the vulgar interests of life
sank into corresponding insignificance as the
majesty
of God became hourly more visible, the baron
had been gradually won upon to consent. Love
for his child, aided by the fine moral and personal
qualities of the young man himself, which here
stood out in strong relief, like one of the stern
piles of those Alps that now appeared to his eyes
so much superior, in their eternal beds, to all the
vine-clad hills and teeming valleys of the lower
world, had been the immediate and efficient agents
in producing this decision. It is not pretended
that the Bernese made an easy conquest over his
prejudices, which was in truth no other than a
conquest over himself, he being, morally
considered
,
little other than a collection of the narrow
opinions and exclusive doctrines which it was then
the fashion to believe necessary to high
civilization
.
On the contrary, the struggle had been
severe
;
nor is it probable that the gentle
blandishments
of Adelheid, the eloquent but silent appeals
to his reason that were constantly made by
Sigismund
in his deportment, or the arguments of his
old comrade, the Signor Grimaldi, who, with a
philosophy that is more often made apparent in
our friendships than in our own practice, dilated
copiously on the wisdom of sacrificing a few
worthless and antiquated opinions to the happiness
of an only child, would have prevailed, had the
Baron been in a situation less abstracted from the
ordinary circumstances of his rank and habits,
than that in which he had been so accidentally
thrown. The pious clavier, too, who had obtained
some claims to the confidence of the guests of the
convent by his services, and by the risks he had
run in their company, came to swell the number
of Sigismund's friends. Of humble origin himself,
and attached to the young man not only by his
general merits, but by his conduct on the lake, he
neglected no good occasion to work upon
Melchior's
mind, after he himself had become acquainted
with the nature of the young man's hopes. As they
paced the brown and naked rocks together, in the
vicinity of the convent, the Augustine discoursed
on the perishable nature of human hopes, and on
the frailty of human opinions. He dwelt with
pious fervor on the usefulness of recalling the
thoughts from the turmoil of daily and contracted
interests, to a wider view of the truths of existence.
Pointing to the wild scene around them, he likened
the confused masses of the mountains, their
sterility
,
and their ruthless tempests, to the world with
its want of happy fruits, its disorders, and its
violence
.
Then directing the attention of his
companion
to the azure vault above them, which, seen
at that elevation and in that pure atmosphere,
resembled
a benign canopy of the softest tints and
colors, he made glowing appeals to the eternal and
holy tranquillity of the state of being to which
they were both fast hastening, and which had its
type in the mysterious and imposing calm of that
tranquil and illimitable void. He drew his moral
in favor of a measured enjoyment of our
advantages
here, as well as of rendering love and justice
to all who merited our esteem, and to the
disadvantage
of those iron prejudices which confine the
best sentiments in the fetters of opinions founded
in the ordinances and provisions of the violent and
selfish.
It was after one of these interesting dialogues
that Melchior de Willading, his heart softened and
his soul touched with the hopes of heaven, listened
with a more indulgent ear to the firm declaration
of Adelheid, that unless she became the wife of
Sigismund, her self-respect, no less than her
affections
,
must compel her to pass her life unmarried.
We shall not say that the maiden herself
philosophized
on premises as sublime as those of the good
monk, for with her the warm impulses of the heart
lay at the bottom of her resolution; but even she
had the respectable support of reason to sustain
her cause. The baron had that innate desire to
perpetuate his own existence in that of his
descendants
,
which appears to be a property of
nature
.
Alarmed at a declaration which threatened
annihilation to his line, while at the same time he
was more than usually under the influence of his
better feelings, he promised that if the charge of
murder could be removed from Balthazar, he
would no longer oppose the union. We should be
giving the reader an opinion a little too favorable
of the Herr von Willading, were we to say that
he did not repent having made this promise soon
after it was uttered. He was in a state of mind
that resembled the vanes of his own towers, which
changed their direction with every fresh current
of air, but he was by far too honorable to think
seriously of violating a faith that he had once
fairly
plighted. He had moments of unpleasant
misgivings
as to the wisdom and propriety of his
promise, but they were of that species of regret,
which is known to attend an unavoidable evil. If
he had any expectations of being released from
his pledge, they were bottomed on certain vague
impressions that Balthazar would be found guilty,
though the constant and earnest asseverations
of Sigismund in favor of his father had
greatly
succeeded in shaking his faith on this point.
Adelheid had stronger hopes than either; the
fears of the young man himself preventing him
from fully participating in her confidence, while
her father shared her expectations on that
tormenting
principle, which causes us to dread the worst.
When, therefore, the jewelry of Jacques Colis was
found in the possession of Maso, and Balthazar
was unanimously acquitted, not only from this
circumstance
,
which went so conclusively to
criminate
another, but from the want of any other
evidence
against him than the fact of his being found
in the bone-house instead of the Refuge, an
accident
that might well have happened to any other
traveller in the storm, the baron resolutely
prepared
himself to redeem his pledge. It is scarcely
necessary to add how much this honorable
sentiment
was strengthened by the unexpected
declaration
of the headsman concerning the birth of
Sigismund
.
Notwithstanding the asseveration of
Maso that the whole was an invention conceived to
favor the son of Balthazar, it was supported by
proofs so substantial and palpable, to say nothing
of the natural and veracious manner in which the
tale was related, as to create a strong probability
in the minds of the witnesses, that it might be true.
Although it remained to be discovered who were
the real parents of Sigismund, few now believed
that he owed his existence to the headsman.
A short summary of the facts may aid the read
er in better understanding, the circumstances on
which so much dnouement depends.
It has been revealed in the course of the
narrative
that the Signor Grimaldi had wedded a lady
younger than himself, whose affections were
already
in the possession of one that, in moral qualities,
was unworthy of her love, but who in other
respects
was perhaps better suited to become her
husband
,
than the powerful noble to whom her family
had given her hand. The birth of their son was soon
followed by the death of the mother, and the
abduction
of the child. Years had passed, when the
Signor Grimaldi was first apprized of the existence
of the latter. He had received this important
information
at a moment when the authorities of
Genoa were most active in pursuing those who
had long and desperately trifled with the laws, and
the avowed motive for the revelation was an
appeal
to his natural affection in behalf of a son,
who was likely to become the victim of his
practices
.
The recovery of a child under such
circumstances
was a blow severer than his loss, and
it will readily be supposed that the truth of the
pretension of Maso, who then went by the name
of Bartolomeo Contini, was admitted with the
greatest caution. Reference had been made by
the friends of the smuggler to a dying monk, whose
character was above suspicion, and who
corroborated
,
with his latest breath, the statement of
Maso, by affirming before God and the saints that
he knew him, so far as man could know a fact like
this, to be the son of the Signor Grimaldi. This
grave testimony, given under circumstances of
such solemnity, and supported by the production
of important papers that had been stolen with the
child, removed the suspicions of the Doge. He
secretly interposed his interest to save the criminal,
though, after a fruitless attempt to effect a
reformation
of his habits by means of confidential agents,
he had never consented to see him.
Such then was the nature of the conflicting
statements. While hope and the pure delight of
finding himself the father of a son like Sigismund,
caused the aged prince to cling to the claims of the
young soldier with fond pertinacity, his cooler
and more deliberate judgment had already been
formed in favor of another. In the long private
examination which succeeded the scene in the
chapel, Maso had gradually drawn more into
himself
,
becoming vague and mysterious, until he
succeeded
in exciting a most painful state of doubt
and expectation in all who witnessed his
deportment
.
Profiting by this advantage, he suddenly
changed his tactics. He promised revelations of
importance, on the condition that he should first
be placed in security within the frontiers of
Piedmont
.
The prudent chtelain soon saw that the
case was getting to be one in which Justice was
expected to be blind in the more politic
signification
of the term. He, therefore, drew off his
loquacious
coadjutor, the bailiff, in a way to leave
the settlement of the affair to the feelings and
wishes of the Doge. The latter, by the aid of
Melchior and Sigismund, soon effected an
understanding
,
in which the conditions of the mariner
were admitted; when the party separated for the
night. Il Maledetto, on whom weighed the entire
load of Jacques Colis' murder, was again
committed
to his temporary prison, while Balthazar, Pippo,
and Conrad, were permitted to go at large, as
having successfully passed the ordeal of
examination
.
Day dawned upon the Col long ere the shades
of night had deserted the valley of the Rhone. All
in the convent were in motion before the
appearance
of the sun, it being generally understood that
the event which had so much disturbed the order
of its peaceful inmates' lives, was to be brought
finally to a close, and that their duties were about
to return into the customary channels. Orisons
are constantly ascending to heaven from the pass
of St. Bernard, but, on the present occasion, the
stir in and about the chapel, the manner in which
the good canons hurried to and fro through the
long corridors, and the general air of excitement,
proclaimed that the offices of the matins possessed
more than the usual interest of the regular daily
devotion.
The hour was still early when all on the pass
assembled in the place of worship. The body of
Jacques Colis had been removed to a side chapel,
where, covered with a pall, it awaited the mass
for the dead. Two large church candles stood
lighted on the steps of the great altar, and the
spectators, including Pierre and the muleteers, the
servants of the convent, and others of every rank
and age, were drawn up in double files in its front.
Among the silent spectators appeared Balthazar
and his wife, Maso, in truth a prisoner, but with
the air of a liberated man, the pilgrim, and Pippo.
The good prior was present in his robes, with all
of his community. During the moments of
suspense
which preceded the rites, he discoursed
civilly with the chtelain and the bailiff, both of
whom returned his courtesies with interest, and in
the manner in which it becomes the dignified and
honored to respect appearances in the presence of
their inferiors. Still the demeanor of most was
feverish and excited, as if the occasion were one
of compelled gaiety, into which unwelcome and
extraordinary circumstances of alloy had thrust
themselves unbidden.
On the opening of the door a little procession
entered
,
headed by the clavier. Melchior de Willading
led his daughter, Sigismund came next, followed by
Marguerite and Christine, and the venerable Doge
brought up the rear. Simple as was this wedding
train, it was imposing from the dignity of the
principal
actors, and from the evidences of deep feeling
with which all in it advanced to the altar.
Sigismund
was firm and self-possessed. Still his
carriage
was lofty and proud, as if he felt that a cloud
still hung over that portion of his history to which
the world attached so much importance, and he
had fallen back on his character and principles for
support. Adelheid had lately been so much the
subject of strong emotions, that she presented
herself
before the priest with less trepidation than was
usual for a maiden; but the fixed regard, the
colorless
cheek, and an air of profound reverence,
announced
the depth and solemn character of the
feelings with which she was prepared to take the
vows.
The marriage rites were celebrated by the good
clavier, who, not content with persuading the
baron to make this sacrifice of his prejudices, had
asked permission to finish the work he had so
happily
commenced, by pronouncing the nuptial
benediction
.
Melchior de Willading listened to the
short ceremony with silent self-approval. He felt
disposed at that instant to believe he had wisely
sacrificed the interests of the world to the right, a
sentiment that was a little quickened by the
uncertainty
which still hung over the origin of his new
son, who might yet prove to be all that he could
hope, as well as by the momentary satisfaction he
found in manifesting his independence by
bestowing
the hand of his daughter upon one whose merit
was so much better ascertained than his birth. In
this manner do the best deceive themselves,
yielding
frequently to motives that would not support
investigation when they believe themselves the
strongest in the right. The good-natured clavier
had observed the wavering and uncertain
character
of the baron's decision, and he had been
induced
to urge his particular request to be the
officiating
priest by a secret apprehension that, descended
again into the scenes of the world, the relenting
father might become, like most other parents of
these nether regions, more disposed to consult the
temporal advancement than the true happiness of
his child.
As one of the parties was a Protestant, no mass
was said, an omission, however, that in no degree
impaired the legal character of the engagement.
Adelheid plighted her unvarying love and fidelity
with maiden modesty, but with the steadiness of a
woman whose affections and principles were
superior
to the little weaknesses which, on such
occasions
,
are most apt to unsettle those who have the
least of either of these great distinctive essentials
of the sex. The vows to cherish and protect
were uttered by Sigismund in deep manly sincerity,
for, at that moment, he felt as if a life of devotion
to her happiness would scarcely requite her
single-minded
,
feminine, and unvarying truth.
May God bless thee, dearest, murmured old
Melchior, as, bending over his kneeling child, he
struggled to keep down a heart which appeared
disposed to mount into his throat, in spite of its
master's inclinations; bless theebless thee, love,
now and for ever. Providence has dealt sternly
with thy brothers and sisters, but in leaving thee,
it has still left me rich in offspring. Here is our
good friend, Gaetano, toohis fortune has been
still harderbut we will hopewe will hope.
And thou, Sigismund, now that Balthazar hath
disowned
thee, thou must accept such a father as
Heaven sends. All accidents of early life are
forgotten
,
and Willading, like my old heart, hath
gotten
a new owner and a new lord!
The young man exchanged embraces with the
baron, whose character he knew to be kind in the
main, and for whom he felt the regard which was
natural to his present situation. He then turned,
with a hesitating eye, to the Signor Grimaldi. The
Doge succeeded his friend in paying the
compliments
of affection to the bride, and had just
released
Adelheid with a warm paternal kiss.
I pray Maria and her holy Son in thy behalf!
said the venerable Prince with dignity. Thou
enterest on new and serious duties, child, but the
spirit and purity of an angel, a meekness that does
not depress, and a character whose force rather
relieves than injures the softness of thy sex, can
temper the ills of this fickle world, and thou may'st
justly hope to see a fair portion of that felicity
which thy young imagination pictures in such
golden
colors. And thou, he added, turning to meet
the embrace of Sigismund, whoever thou art by
the first disposition of Providence, thou art now
rightfully dear to me. The husband of Melchior
de Willading's daughter would ever have a claim
upon his most ancient and dearest friend, but we
are united by a tie that has the interest of a
singular
and solemn mystery. My reason tells me that
I am punished for much early and wanton pride
and wilfulness, in being the parent of a child that
few men in any condition of life could wish to
claim, while my heart would fain flatter me with
being the father of a son of whom an emperor
might be proud! Thou art, and thou art not, of
Vol. II. W
my blood. Without these proofs of Maso's, and
the testimony of the dying monk, I should proclaim
thee to be the latter without hesitation; but be
thou what thou may'st by birth, thou art entirely
and without alloy of my love. Be tender of this
fragile flower that Providence hath put under thy
protection, Sigismund; cherish it as thou valuest
thine own soul; the generous and confiding love
of a virtuous woman is always a support,
frequently
a triumphant stay, to the tottering
principles
of man. Oh! had it pleased God earlier to
have given me Angiolina, how different might
have been our lives! This dark uncertainty would
not now hang over the most precious of human
affections, and my closing hour would be blessed.
Heaven and its saints preserve ye both, my
children
,
and preserve ye long in your present
innocence
and affection!
The venerable Doge ceased. The effort which
had enabled him to speak gave way, and he turned
aside that he might weep in the decent reserve that
became his station and years.
Until now Marguerite had been silent, watching
the countenances, and drinking in with avidity the
words, of the different speakers. It was now her
turn. Sigismund knelt at her feet, pressing her
hands to his lips in a manner to show that her
high, though stern character, had left deep traces
in his recollection. Releasing herself from his
convulsed grasp, for just then the young man felt
intensely the violence of severing those early ties
which, in his case, had perhaps something of wild
romance from their secret nature, she parted the
curls on his ample brow, and stood gazing long at
his face, studying each lineament to its minutest
shade.
No, she said mournfully shaking her head,
truly thou art not of us, and God hath dealt
mercifully
in taking away the innocent little creature
whose place thou hast so long innocently usurped!
Thou wert dear to me, Sigismundvery dear
for I thought thee under the curse of my race; do
not hate me, if I say my heart is now in the grave
of
Mother! exclaimed the young man
reproachfully
.
Well I am still thy mother, answered
Marguerite
,
smiling, though painfully; thou art a
noble boy, and no change of fortune can ever alter
thy soul. 'T is a cruel parting, Balthazar, and I
know not, after all, that thou didst well to deceive
me; for I have had as much grief as joy in the
youthgrief, bitter grief, that one like him should
be condemned to live under the curse of our race
but it is ended nowhe is not of usno, he is no
longer of us!
This was uttered so plaintively that Sigismund
bent his face to his hands and sobbed aloud.
Now that the happy and proud weep, 'tis time
that the wretched dried their tears, added the wife
of Balthazar, looking about her with a sad mixture
of agony and pride struggling in her countenance;
for, in spite of her professions, it was plain that
she yielded her claim on the noble youth with deep
yearnings and an intense agony of spirit. We
have one consolation, at least, Christineall that
are not of our blood will not despise us now! Am
I right, Sigismundthou too wilt not turn upon us
with the world, and hate those whom thou once
loved?
Mother, mother, for the sake of the Holy
Virgin
,
do not harrow my soul!
I will not distrust thee, dear; thou didst not
drink at my breast, but thou hast taken in too
many lessons of the truth from my lips to despise
usand yet thou art not of us; thou mayest
possibly
prove a Prince's son, and the world so
hardens
the heartand they who have been sorely
pressed upon become suspicious
For the love of God, cease, mother, or thou
wilt break my heart!
Come hither, Christine. Sigismund, this
maiden
goes with thy wife: we have the greatest
confidence
in the truth and principles of her thou hast
wedded, for she has been tried and not found
wanting
.
Be tender to the child; she was once thy
sister, and then thou used to love her.
Motherthou wilt make me curse the hour I
was born!
Marguerite, while she could not overcome the
cold distrust which habit had interwoven with all
her opinions, felt that she was cruel, and she said
no more. Stooping, she kissed the cold forehead
of the young man, gave a warm embrace to her
daughter, over whom she prayed fervently for a
minute, and then placed the insensible girl into the
open arms of Adelheid. The awful workings of
nature were subdued by a superhuman will, and
she turned slowly towards the silent, respectful
crowd, who had scarcely breathed during this
exhibition
of her noble character.
Doth any here, she sternly asked, suspect
the innocence of Balthazar?
None, good woman, none! returned the
bailiff
,
wiping his eyes; go in peace to thy home, o'
Heaven's sake, and God be with thee!
He stands acquitted before God and man!
added the more dignified chtelain.
Marguerite motioned for Balthazar to precede
her, and she prepared to quit the chapel. On the
threshold she turned and cast a lingering look at
Sigismund and Christine. The two latter were
weeping in each other's arms, and the soul of
Marguerite
yearned to mingle her tears with those she
loved so well. But, stern in her resolutions, she
stayed the torrent of feeling which would have
been so terrible in its violence had it broken loose,
and followed her husband, with a dry and glowing
eye. They descended the mountain with a vacuum
in their hearts which taught even this persecuted
pair, that there are griefs in nature that surpass all
the artificial woes of life.
The scene just related did not fail to disturb the
spectators. Maso dashed his hand across his eyes,
and seemed touched with a stronger working of
sympathy than it accorded with his present policy
to show, while both Conrad and Pippo did credit
to their humanity, by fairly shedding tears. The
latter, indeed, showed manifestations of a
sensibility
that is not altogether incompatible with
ordinary recklessness and looseness of principle.
He even begged leave to kiss the hand of the
bride, wishing her joy with fervor, as one who
had gone through great danger in her company.
The whole party then separated with an exchange
of cordial good feeling which proves that,
however
much men may be disposed to jostle and
discompose their fellows in the great highway of
life, nature has infused into their composition
some great redeeming qualities to make us regret
the abuses by which they have been so much
perverted
.
On quitting the chapel, the whole of the
travellers
made their dispositions to depart. The bailiff
and the chtelain went down towards the Rhone,
as well satisfied with themselves as if they had
discharged their trust with fidelity by committing
Maso to prison, and discoursing as they rode along
on the singular chances which had brought a son
of the Doge of Genoa before them, in a condition
so questionable. The good Augustines helped the
travellers who were destined for the other
descent
W 2
into their saddles, and acquitted themselves
of the last act of hospitality by following the
footsteps
of the mules, with wishes for their safe
arrival
at Aoste.
The path across the Col has been already
described
.
It winds along the margin of the little
lake, passing the site of the ancient temple of
Jupiter
at the distance of a few hundred yards from
the convent. Sweeping past the northern
extremity
of the little basin, where it crosses the frontiers
of Piedmont, it cuts the ragged wall of rock, and,
after winding
en corniche
for a short distance by
the edge of a fearful ravine, it plunges at once
towards
the plains of Italy.
As there was a desire to have no unnecessary
witnesses of Maso's promised revelations, Conrad
and Pippo had been advised to quit the mountain
before the rest of the party, and the muleteers
were requested to keep a little in the rear. At the
point where the path leaves the lake, the whole
dismounted, Pierre going ahead with the beasts,
with a view to make the first precipitous pitch from
the Col on foot. Maso now took the lead. When
he reached the spot where the convent is last in
view, he stopped and turned to gaze at the
venerable
and storm-beaten pile.
Thou hesitatest, observed the Baron de
Willading
,
who suspected an intention to escape.
Signore, the look at even a stone is a
melancholy
office, when it is known to be the last. I
have often climbed to the Col, but I shall never
dare do it again; for, though the honorable and
worthy chtelain, and the most worthy bailiff, are
willing to pay their homage to a Doge of Genoa
in his own person, they may be less tender of his
honor when he is absent. Addio, caro San
Bernardo
!
Like me, thou art solitary and
weather-beaten
,
and like me, though rude of aspect, thou
hast thy uses. We are both beaconsthou to tell
the traveller where to seek safety, and I to warn
him where danger is to be avoided.
There is a dignity in manly suffering, that
commands
our sympathies. All who heard this
apostrophe
to the abode of the Augustines were struck
with its simplicity and its moral. They followed
the speaker in silence, however, to the point where
the path makes its first sudden descent. The spot
was favorable to the purpose of Il Maledetto.
Though still on the level of the lake, the convent,
the Col, and all it contained, with the exception
of a short line of its stony path, were shut from
their view, by the barrier of intervening rock.
The ravine lay beneath, ragged, ferruginous, and
riven into a hundred faces by the eternal action of
the seasons. All above, beneath, and around, was
naked, and chaotic as the elements of the globe
before they received the order-giving touch of the
Creator. The imagination could scarce picture a
scene of greater solitude and desolation.
Signore, said Maso, respectfully raising his
cap, and speaking with calmness, this confusion
of nature resembles my own character. Here
everything is torn, sterile, and wild; but patience,
charity, and generous love, have been able to
change even this rocky height into an abode for
those who live for the good of others. There is
none so worthless that use may not be made of
him. We are types of the earth our mother;
useless
,
and savage, or repaying the labor, that we
receive, as we are treated like men, or hunted like
beasts. If the great, and the powerful, and the
honored, would become the friends and monitors
of the weak and ignorant, instead of remaining so
many watch-dogs to snarl at and bite all that they
fear may encroach on their privileges, raising the
cry of the wolf each time that they hear the wail
of the timid and bleating lamb, the fairest works
of God would not be so often defaced. I have
lived, and it is probable that I shall die an outlaw;
but the severest pangs I ever know come from the
the mockery which accuses my nature of abuses
that are the fruits of your own injustice. That
stone, kicking a bit of rock from the path into
the ravine beneath, is as much master of its
direction
after my foot has set its mass in motion,
as the poor untaught being who is thrown upon
the world, despised, unaided, suspected, and
condemned
even before he has sinned, has the
command
of his own course. My mother was fair
and good. She wanted only the power to
withstand
the arts of one, who, honored in the opinions
of all around her, undermined her virtue. He was
great, noble, and powerful; while she hath little
beside her beauty and her weakness. Signori,
the odds against her were too much. I was the
punishment of her fault. I came into a world then,
in which every man despised me before I had done
any act to deserve its scorn.
Nay, this is pushing opinions to extremes!
interrupted
the Signor Grimaldi, who had scarce
breathed, in his eagerness to catch the syllables as
they came from the other's tongue.
We began, Signori, as we have ended;
distrustful
,
and struggling to see which could do the
other the most harm. A reverend and holy monk,
who knew my history, would have filled a soul
with heaven that the wrongs of the world had
already
driven to the verge of hell. The experiment
failed. Homily and precept, Maso smiled bitterly
as he continued, are but indifferent weapons to
fight with against hourly wrongs; instead of
becoming
a cardinal and the counsellor of the head
of the church, I am the man ye see. Signor
Grimaldi
,
the monk who gave me his care was Father
Girolamo. He told the truth to thy secretary, for
I am the son of poor Annunziata Altieri, who was
once thought worthy to attract thy passing notice.
The deception of calling myself another of thy
children was practised for my own security. The
means were offered by an accidental confederacy
with one of the instruments of thy formidable
enemy and cousin, who furnished the papers that
had been taken with the little Gaetano. The truth
of what I say shall be delivered to you at Genoa.
As for the Signor Sigismondo, it is time we ceased
to be rivals. We are brothers, with this difference
in our fortunes, that he comes of wedlock, and I of
an unexpiated, and almost an unrepented, crime!
A common cry, in which regret, joy, and
surprise
were wildly mingled, interrupted the speaker.
Adelheid threw herself into her husband's arms,
and the pale and conscience-stricken Doge stood
with extended arms, an image of contrition, delight,
and shame. His friends pressed around him with
consolation on their tongues, and the blandishments
of affection in their manner, for the regrets of the
great rarely pass away unheeded, like the moans
of the low.
Let me have air! exclaimed the prince; give
me air or I suffocate! Where is the child of
Annunziata
?I
will at least atone to him for the
wrong done his mother!
It was too late. The victim of another's fault
had cast himself over the edge of the precipice
with reckless hardihood, and he was already
beyond
the reach of the voice, in his swift descent,
by a shorter but dangerous path, towards Aoste.
Nettuno was at his heels. It was evident that he
endeavored to outstrip Pippo and Conrad, who were
trudging ahead by the more beaten road. In a few
minutes he turned the brow of a beetling rock, and
was lost to view.
This was the last that was known of Il
Maledetto
.
At Genoa, the Doge secretly received the
confirmation of all that he had heard, and
Sigismund
was legally placed in possession of his
birthright
.
The latter made many generous but useless
efforts to discover and to reclaim his brother.
With a delicacy that could hardly be expected, the
outlaw had withdrawn from a scene which he now
felt to be unsuited to his habits, and he never
permitted
the veil to be withdrawn from the place of
his retreat.
The only consolation that his relatives ever
obtained
,
arose from an event which brought Pippo
under the condemnation of the law. Before his
execution, the buffoon confessed that Jacques Colis
fell by the hands of Conrad and himself, and that,
ignorant of Maso's expedient on his own account,
they had made use of Nettuno to convey the
plundered
jewelry undetected across the frontiers of
Piedmont.
THE END.